NATIONAL  SCIENCE  FOUNDATION  BUDGET

AND  MANAGEMENT  CHALLENGES

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH
COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

MARCH  9,  2005

Serial No. 109–7

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

99–574PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2005

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE

HON.  SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York,  Chairman
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee
JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
SHEILA  JACKSON  LEE,  Texas
BRAD  SHERMAN,  California
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
JIM  COSTA,  California
AL  GREEN,  Texas
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
VACANCY

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
GIL  GUTKNECHT,  Minnesota
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
WAYNE  T.  GILCHREST,  Maryland
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TIMOTHY  V.  JOHNSON,  Illinois
J.  RANDY  FORBES,  Virginia
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
JOHN  J.H.  ‘‘JOE’’  SCHWARZ,  Michigan
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
VACANCY
VACANCY

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH

BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina,  Chairman

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
GIL  GUTKNECHT,  Minnesota
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TIMOTHY  V.  JOHNSON,  Illinois
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
VACANCY
SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York

DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
VACANCY
VACANCY
VACANCY
VACANCY

BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

DAN  BYERS  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

JIM  WILSON  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

DAVID  FINGER  Professional  Staff  Member/Chairman’s  Designee

ELIZABETH  GROSSMAN,  KARA  HAAS  Professional  Staff  Members

JAMES  HAGUE  Staff  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

March  9,  2005

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Bob  Inglis,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  Re-
search, Committee on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Darlene  Hooley,  Ranking  Minority  Member,
Subcommittee  on  Research,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Rep-
resentatives ...........................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson, Member, Sub-
committee  on  Research,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives .......................................................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Russ  Carnahan,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Research,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives .......................................................................................................................

Witnesses:

Dr. Arden L. Bement, Jr., Director, National Science Foundation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Mark  S.  Wrighton,  Chairman  of  the  Committee  on  Audit  and  Oversight,

National Science Board; Chancellor, Washington University, St. Louis

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................

Dr. Christine C. Boesz, Inspector General, National Science Foundation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Dr. Arden L. Bement, Jr., Director, National Science Foundation ......................
Dr.  Mark  S.  Wrighton,  Chairman  of  the  Committee  on  Audit  and  Oversight,
National Science Board; Chancellor, Washington University, St. Louis .........
Dr. Christine C. Boesz, Inspector General, National Science Foundation ..........

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Letter  to  Dr.  Arden  Bement  from  Chairman  Sherwood  Boehlert,  dated  April
13, 2005 .................................................................................................................
Letter  of  Response  to  Chairman  Sherwood  Boehlert  from  Dr.  Arden  Bement,
dated May 23, 2005 ..............................................................................................

(III)

14
15

16
17

18

19

20
22
28

28
30
35

36
37
43
43

58

69
71

74

76

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

National Science Board Members 2005 .................................................................

Page
81

IV

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

NATIONAL  SCIENCE  FOUNDATION  BUDGET

AND  MANAGEMENT  CHALLENGES

WEDNESDAY,  MARCH  9,  2005

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:10  a.m.,  in  Room
2318 of the Rayburn House Office Building, Hon. Bob Inglis [Chair-
man of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

National Science Foundation Budget

and Management Challenges

WEDNESDAY, MARCH 9, 2005

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

On  Wednesday,  March  9,  2005,  the  Research  Subcommittee  of  the  Committee  on
Science  of  the  House  of  Representatives  will  hold  a  hearing  to  examine  the  fiscal
year 2006 (FY06) budget request for the National Science Foundation (NSF), as well
as longer-term budget and management challenges facing the Foundation.
2. Witnesses
Dr.  Arden  L.  Bement  is  the  Director  of  NSF.  Prior  to  his  appointment  as  NSF
Director, Dr. Bement was Director of the National Institute of Standards and Tech-
nology  and  before  that  he  was  Professor  and  Head  of  the  School  of  Nuclear  Engi-
neering at Purdue University.
Dr.  Mark  S.  Wrighton  is  Chairman  of  the  Audit  and  Oversight  Committee  of  the
National  Science  Board  and  the  Chancellor  of  Washington  University  in  St.  Louis,
where he also serves as Professor of chemistry.
Dr. Christine C. Boesz is Inspector General of the NSF. Prior to joining NSF, she
served  as  Head  of  Regulatory  Accountability  at  Aetna  U.S.  Healthcare,  and  before
that she held several government compliance and oversight positions within the De-
partment of Health and Human Services.

3. Overarching Questions

• In  developing  the  request,  how  were  priorities  determined  across  and  within
various  agency  budget  accounts,  programs,  objectives,  and  priorities?  If  NSF
were  to  receive  additional  funding  in  FY06  beyond  the  President’s  request,
where should it be directed?
• What  are  the  most  important  short-term  and  long-term  budget  and  manage-
• What can NSF do to ensure that limited research and management resources

ment challenges facing NSF, and how should they be addressed?

are allocated most effectively?

4. Brief Overview

• NSF  is  the  primary  source  of  federal  funding  for  non-medical  basic  research
conducted  at  U.S.  colleges  and  universities.  In  addition,  NSF  is  the  principal
federal  agency  charged  with  supporting  K–12  and  undergraduate  science,
math,  and  engineering  education,  and  NSF  fellowships  and  research
assistantship programs support many graduate and post-doctoral students.
• NSF funds basic research across nearly all disciplines of science and engineer-
ing. In many disciplines, such as mathematics, computer science, and the so-
cial  sciences,  NSF  is  the  primary  source  of  federal  support  for  university  re-
searchers.  Further,  NSF  supports  research  in  emerging  fields,  such  as  com-
puting  and  information  technology  since  the  1960’s,  and  nanotechnology
today.
• The FY06 budget request for NSF is $5.61 billion, an increase of 2.4 percent,
or  $132  million  over  the  FY05  level.  However,  because  NSF  received  a  3.1
percent  ($180  million)  cut  in  FY05,  the  overall  request  level  for  FY06  is  ap-
proximately  one  percent  below  the  FY04  level.  In  addition,  the  increase  in-
cludes  a  proposed  transfer  of  $48  million  from  the  U.S.  Coast  guard  for  ice

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

breaking  expenses  in  support  of  Antarctic  research,  so  the  increase  for  NSF
in  reality  is  about  1.5  percent.  These  flat  budgets  have  forced  NSF  to  make
difficult decisions on priorities among its many programs and placed increas-
ing pressure on the agency to ensure that programmatic and management re-
sources are allocated as efficiently as possible.
• The  FY06  budget  request  recommends  major  cuts  to  the  Education  and
Human  Resources  (EHR)  account.  The  request  of  $737  million  for  EHR  is
$104 million, or 12 percent, below the FY05 level and $207 million, or 22 per-
cent,  below  the  FY04  level.  The  cuts  are  concentrated  largely  on  elementary
and  secondary  education  programs,  and,  to  a  lesser  extent,  undergraduate
programs.  NSF  has  indicated  that  the  reductions  are  part  of  a  conscious  pol-
icy to significantly pare its role in program implementation, allowing work in
this area to migrate to the Department of Education.

5. Background
About the National Science Foundation

NSF  was  created  by  Congress  in  1950  ‘‘to  promote  the  progress  of  science;  to  ad-
vance  the  national  health,  prosperity,  and  welfare;  to  secure  the  national  de-
fense.. . .’’ Roughly 200,000 people—including senior researchers, postdoctoral asso-
ciates, graduate and undergraduate students, and K–12 teachers and students—are
involved in NSF activities each year. NSF funds approximately 10,000 awards annu-
ally through a highly respected competitive, merit-review process. In addition to pro-
viding grants to support research projects, NSF also funds the construction and op-
erations  for  major  research  facilities1 (such  as  telescopes  and  ocean  research  ves-
sels),  supports  all  levels  of  science  and  engineering  education,  and  funds  programs
to increase the size and proficiency of the U.S. scientific and technological workforce.
Since  its  inception  in  1950,  NSF  has  supported  123  of  America’s  Nobel  Prize  win-
ners, including about 50 percent of winners in Chemistry and Physics and about 60
percent of winners in Economics.

NSF is organized into directorates that support specific disciplines of science and
engineering research and education: Biological Sciences; Computer and Information
Science  and  Engineering;  Geosciences;  Engineering;  Mathematics  and  Physical
Sciences; Social, Behavioral and Economic Sciences; and Education and Human Re-
sources.  In  addition,  a  number  of  separate  offices  support  various  specific  program
and  management  functions.  (See  Chart  1  for  a  diagram  of  NSF’s  organizational
structure.)

By law, NSF leadership has two major components: a director, who oversees NSF
staff and management and is responsible for program administration, merit review,
planning,  budget  and  day-to-day  operations;  and  the  24-member  National  Science
Board  that  oversees  and  establishes  policies  for  the  Foundation.  The  Board  mem-
bers, who are Presidentially-appointed and Senate-confirmed, are supported in part
by  the  work  of  the  Office  of  the  Inspector  General  (OIG)  of  the  NSF.  The  OIG  rec-
ommends policies to promote economy, efficiency, and effectiveness in administering
NSF  programs  and  operations.  The  OIG  reports  directly  to  the  National  Science
Board and to Congress.

NSF  has  continued  to  receive  high  marks  from  the  Office  of  Management  and
Budget (OMB) for the quality of its management and the excellence of its programs.
For example, in the FY06 budget request, NSF was one of only seven agencies that
were  awarded  three  green  lights  on  the  Executive  Branch  Management  Scorecard.
In addition, eight NSF programs were examined using OMB’s Program Assessment
Rating  Tool  (PART),2 and  all  eight  programs  received  ratings  of  ‘‘Effective’’  (the
highest rating). NSF was the only agency in the Federal Government to receive the
highest rating on every program that underwent a PART review.
The Merit Review Process

The  merit  review  process  is  a  critical  element  of  NSF  activities.  No  research  is
performed at NSF by NSF employees; the Foundation’s role is to solicit, select, and
support the best projects proposed by the research and education communities. NSF
currently  receives  more  than  40,000  proposals  per  year.  NSF  then  uses  a  merit  re-
view  process  to  determine  which  proposals  receive  funding.  In  this  process,  pro-
posals are evaluated by a panel of independent reviewers consisting of scientists, en-

1 NSF-funded major research facilities are constructed and operated by outside consortia.
2 PART  is  described  by  the  budget  as  a  tool  ‘‘developed  to  assess  and  improve  program  per-
formance so that the Federal Government can achieve better results. A PART review helps iden-
tify a program’s strengths and weaknesses to inform funding and management decisions aimed
at making the program more effective.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

gineers  and  educators,  who  do  not  work  at  NSF  or  for  the  institution  that  employs
the  proposing  researchers.3 The  reviewers  assess  the  intellectual  merit  and  quality
of  the  proposed  activity,  taking  into  consideration  other  factors  such  as  the  impact
of  the  work  on  enhancing  scientific  knowledge,  providing  educational  opportunities
and  societal  benefits,  and  broadening  participation  by  under-represented  groups.
The  reviewers’  recommendations  are  then  passed  on  to  NSF  program  officers  for  a
final decision on whether an award should be issued.
NSF Authorization

In 2002, Congress passed, and the President signed, the National Science Founda-
tion Authorization Act of 2002 (P.L. 107–368). The Act authorized research and edu-
cations programs and appropriations for NSF from FY03 to FY07, and strengthened
management  and  oversight  of  the  Foundation.  The  cornerstone  funding  rec-
ommendation  in  the  Act  placed  the  overall  NSF  budget  on  a  five-year  doubling
track,  a  goal  that  Congress  and  the  President  have  fallen  far  short  of  (Table  1  in-
cludes the authorization levels set forth in P.L. 107–368).
6. Issues Facing NSF

In  the  current  tight  budget  environment,  NSF  faces  difficult  challenges  in  deter-
mining priorities among its many programs that are deserving of increased funding.
For example, NSF must determine the right balance between:

— education and research activities;
— increasing grant size and duration and supporting more scientists;
— facilities construction and operations and research;
— K–12, undergraduate, and graduate education; and
— multi-investigator, interdisciplinary projects and single-investigator research

in core disciplines.

In  addition  to  these  difficult  decisions  regarding  program  priorities,  budget  con-
straints  also  force  NSF  to  tackle  difficult  questions  about  allocating  resources  for
management  tasks.  Below  are  outlined  several  notable  programmatic  and  manage-
ment challenges facing NSF.
Decreasing Funding for Education Programs

The  programs  in  the  NSF  EHR  directorate  are  designed  to  support  and  improve
U.S. science, technology, engineering and mathematics (STEM) education at all lev-
els and in all settings (both formal and informal).

Of the seven budget categories within the Education and Human Resources Direc-
torate, four would receive major budget cuts in the FY06 request: Math and Science
Partnerships  (down  24  percent),  Elementary,  Secondary,  and  Informal  Education
(down  23  percent),  Undergraduate  Education  (down  12  percent),  and  Research,
Evaluation,  and  Communication  (down  43  percent)  (see  Table  2).  Most  programs
within  these  accounts  are  planning  reductions  in  the  number  of  new  awards  in
2006,  and  two—Math  and  Science  Partnerships  and  Research,  Evaluation,  and
Communication—will not make any new awards.

NSF  has  indicated  that  the  reductions  in  elementary,  secondary  and  under-
graduate education are part of a conscious policy to significantly pare its role in pro-
gram  implementation,  allowing  these  to  migrate  to  the  U.S.  Department  of  Edu-
cation.  However,  NSF’s  education  programs  are  unique  in  their  capacity  to  develop
new  and  improved  materials  and  assessments,  create  better  teacher  training  tech-
niques  and  move  promising  ideas  from  research  to  practice.  An  example  of  the  dif-
ferent  roles  NSF  and  the  Department  of  Education  play  can  be  seen  in  their  Math
and Science Partnerships (MSP) programs. The Department of Education’s program
awards  funds  to  states  on  a  formula  basis  and  focuses  primarily  on  secondary-level
mathematics,  while  NSF’s  program  provides  competitive,  merit-reviewed  grants  to
universities  and  school  districts  to  explore  innovative  ideas  and  improve  math  and
science proficiency for students of all grades. Some education policy experts have ex-
pressed  concern  that  disinvesting  in  NSF  K–12  education  will  deprive  states,  dis-
tricts and schools of the tools and ideas they need to achieve the goals of proficiency
under the No Child Left Behind Act.
Decreasing Success Rates for Grant Proposals

The  total  funding  for  NSF  has  increased  significantly  (approximately  40  percent)
over  the  past  six  years,  but  the  total  number  of  proposals  NSF  receives  has  risen

3 NSF  selects  the  reviewers  from  among  the  national  pool  of  experts  in  each  field  and  their
evaluations are confidential. On average, about 50,000 experts give their time to serve on review
panels each year.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

dramatically  as  well,  from  under  30,000  to  over  44,000.  This  increase  in  proposals,
coupled  with  a  recent  concerted  effort  to  increase  the  size  and  duration  of  NSF
grants, has led to a drop in ‘‘success rate’’—the percentage of proposals that receive
funding  has  declined  from  33  percent  in  FY00  to  an  estimated  20  percent  in  FY05.
The  National  Science  Board  has  estimated  that  each  year  NSF  is  unable  to  fund
1,500  to  2,000  research  proposals  (about  $1.5  billion  worth)  that  receive  reviewer
ratings as good as those being funded.4

For  FY06,  NSF  has  set  a  goal  of  halting  the  decline  in  the  success  rate  while
maintaining  grant  size  and  duration.5 Given  this  constraint,  and  the  relatively  flat
budget  requested  for  FY06,  NSF  plans  to  try  to  reduce  the  number  of  proposals  it
receives,  in  part  by  reducing  the  number  of  solicitations  the  agency  issues,  nar-
rowing  the  areas  covered  in  those  solicitations,  and  requiring  ‘‘pre-proposals’’  for
some programs.6

NSF’s efforts to reduce the number of proposals and increase the success rate are
motivated by three goals: to be able to fund more of the high quality proposals they
receive, to use researchers’ time more effectively (putting together proposals is very
time-consuming),  and  to  reduce  the  administrative  burden  on  NSF  staff.  However,
there  is  some  concern  that  narrowing  the  pool  of  proposals  has  the  potential  to
lower  the  overall  quality  of  the  pool  and  hence  the  quality  of  the  research  NSF
funds. In addition, it is not clear whether this effort will conflict with NSF’s overall
goal of broadening participation in NSF programs.
Funding  for  Major  Research  Equipment  and  Facilities  Construction,  Oversight,  Op-

erations, and Research

One  of  NSF’s  core  missions  is  to  provide  scientists  and  engineers  with  the  tools
they  need  to  perform  research  in  a  wide  variety  of  fields.  These  tools  range  from
the  desktop  computers  and  tabletop  laboratory  equipment  used  by  a  single  re-
searcher to scanning electron microscopes, mass spectrometers, and small supercom-
puters  shared  by  multiple  departments  on  a  university  campus,  to  large  national
(or  international)  facilities,  such  as  radio  telescopes  and  aircraft  for  environmental
and atmospheric sampling.

In the 1990’s, NSF created a special budget account for the largest facilities with
the  greatest  cost,  complexity,  and  scientific  impact.  Known  as  Major  Research
Equipment  and  Facilities  Construction  (MREFC)  projects,  these  proposals  must  go
through  a  special  review  and  approval  process—including  merit  review  of  the  pro-
posal  quality,  internal  review  by  NSF  scientific  and  financial  staff,  and  final  ap-
proval  by  the  National  Science  Board—before  they  can  be  proposed  to  Congress  for
funding.  While  Congress  has  historically  had  concerns  about  the  transparency  and
rigor  of  this  process,  it  appears  NSF  has  made  significant  progress  recently  in  for-
malizing selection and oversight for MREFC projects (see below).

In the current budget situation, the key challenge will be determining how to ap-
propriately balance the need to provide cutting-edge, large-scale research equipment
with  the  need  to  fund  research.  Due  to  the  multi-year  nature  of  MREFC  construc-
tion projects, and their long lifetime of use (usually 10–30 years), each project start
is  a  serious  commitment  by  NSF  to  provide  construction,  operations,  maintenance,
and  research  funding  for  many  years  to  come.  While  the  FY06  budget  request  does
not  propose  any  new  MREFC  starts,  five  MREFC  projects  are  ongoing,  five  have
been  completed  in  the  past  two  years,  and  four  more  have  been  approved  by  the
National  Science  Board  and  are  in  the  queue  for  future  funding  (Table  3).  Setting
aside  support  for  these  projects  is  placing  increasing  budget  pressure  on  core  re-
search activities, and NSF faces a difficult and growing challenge in balancing these
two needs.
Management  and  Oversight  of  the  Construction  and  Operations  of  Large  Research

Facilities

As  noted  above,  Congress  has  historically  had  concerns  about  the  transparency
and  rigor  of  NSF’s  processes  for  selecting  and  overseeing  large  research  facilities.
For  example,  the  relative  priorities  among  projects—and  the  rationale  supporting
those priorities—have not always been clear. Also, clear guidelines for development,
management, and oversight of large facilities, and responsibility within NSF for en-
suring  compliance  with  those  guidelines—both  key  components  of  effective  imple-
mentation—did not exist.

4 Fulfilling the Promise: A Report to Congress on the Budgetary and Programmatic Expansion

of the National Science Foundation (National Science Board, January 2004), page 6.

5 The average NSF research award provides about $137,000 per year for three years.
6 A  short  ‘‘pre-proposal’’  is  designed  to  allow  NSF  to  quickly  evaluate  the  general  quality  and
ideas  within  a  potential  proposal  so  that  only  people  with  a  reasonably  probability  of  success
have to go through the trouble of putting together a full proposal.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

NSF is making progress in addressing these shortcomings, and four significant ef-
forts  to  improve  the  situation  are  at  various  levels  of  implementation.  First,  NSF
is now required (per P.L. 107–368) to maintain a prioritized list of pending projects
that includes the criteria and rationale used in developing the rankings. Second, in
2003  NSF  established  the  position  of  Deputy  Director  for  Large  Facility  Projects
within the NSF Office of Budget, Finance and Award Management. Third is the de-
velopment of a ‘‘Major Facilities Guide’’ to outline a process for NSF’s management
and  oversight  of  proposal,  construction,  and  operations  of  large  facilities  projects
and  of  a  document  describing  the  process  for  ‘‘Setting  Priorities  for  Large  Research
Facility Projects Supported by the National Science Foundation.’’ Both of these doc-
uments  have  been  drafted  and  are  scheduled  to  be  finalized  by  the  NSF  and  the
National Science Board this summer. Fourth, NSF has hired a contractor to develop
an automated central cost-tracking system specifically to enable full cost accounting
for  large  facilities  projects;  the  basic  elements  of  this  system  are  expected  be  in
place in September 2005, with the full system becoming operational in 2006.

These  are  all  important  steps  that  bear  careful  watching  going  forward.  Of  par-
ticular  concern  is  how  NSF  will  provide  the  Deputy  Director  for  Large  Facility
Projects with the resources and authorities needed to carry out his oversight respon-
sibilities.  Each  large  facility  project  has  program  management  staff  within  the  re-
search  directorate  that  spawned  the  project,  but  the  Deputy  Director  for  Large  Fa-
cility Projects is responsible for overseeing all of the projects. The completion of the
central  cost-accounting  system  should  certainly  provide  the  Deputy’s  office  with  a
valuable  tool,  but  support  staff  will  also  be  needed  to  help  gather  and  maintain  in-
formation  on,  and  assess  the  scientific  progress  and  financial  performance  of,  large
facility projects.7 Finally, the role that the Deputy will play in certifying to the Na-
tional  Science  Board  projects’  readiness  to  begin  construction  and  monitoring
projects’ progress is still to be finalized and implemented.
Workforce Planning

The  Office  of  Inspector  General  (OIG)  has  identified  workforce  planning  as  one
of  the  most  serious  management  challenges  facing  NSF.  The  effectiveness  of  NSF’s
current workforce of 1,700 permanent staff, visiting personnel, and contract employ-
ees  has  been  increasingly  hampered  by  rapidly  growing  workloads  and  limited
space.  For  example,  since  1999,  the  agency  has  seen  a  40  percent  increase  in  the
number  of  proposals  received  each  year,  including  a  14  percent  increase  last  year
alone.  As  a  result,  NSF  estimates  that  program  officers  now  spend  55  percent  of
their  time  reviewing  proposals,  leaving  less  time  for  other  duties  such  as  award
oversight and program planning.

While  the  OIG  reports  that  recent  steps  taken  by  NSF  to  lease  additional  office
space and add full-time employees has alleviated some of these pressures, a longer-
term solution is still needed. NSF asserts that its comprehensive, multi-year project
reviewing  internal  business  processes  (known  as  the  ‘‘Business  Analysis’’),  which  is
scheduled for completion by the end of FY05, will provide a long-term plan for iden-
tifying and addressing workforce needs.
Ice-breaking Services for NSF Facilities at the South Pole

The  NSF  manages  three  year-round  facilities  in  Antarctica,  where  research  in
physics, astronomy, ocean science, climate science, marine and land ecosystems, and
other  fields  is  performed.  To  access  these  facilities  for  resupply  missions,  NSF  uses
two large ice breaking ships owned and operated by the U.S. Coast Guard (USCG).
NSF reimburses the USCG for the incremental costs associated with this use. While
there  are  other  needs  for  these  ships  (such  as  military  preparedness,  law  enforce-
ment, and USCG training), over the past three years, support of NSF science activi-
ties has accounted for roughly 90 percent of the ships’ time. Therefore, in the FY06
budget  request,  the  Administration  proposes  shifting  the  base  funding  for  the  two
polar class ice breakers, as well as another ship,8 from the USCG to NSF.

Much  of  the  information  needed  to  evaluate  the  appropriateness  of  transferring
the responsibility and funding for the ice breakers from USCG to NSF remains elu-
sive.  In  the  short-term,  the  actual  costs  of  operations  and  maintenance  for  these
ships  has  not  been  determined,  and  it  is  unclear  if  the  transferred  $48  million  will
be  sufficient.  In  the  longer-term,  Congress  and  the  Administration  must  consider
how  best  to  replace  the  current  polar  class  ice-breaking  ships,  which  are  nearing
the end of their useful lives. It is not immediately clear which agencies should bear

7 Currently,  the  support  staff  for  the  Deputy  Director  for  Large  Facility  Projects  is  only  1.5

8 The  third  ship  is  the  Healy,  a  research  vessel  with  ice-breaking  capabilities  that  operates

full-time equivalents.

mainly in the Arctic.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

the costs and be responsible for refurbishment or replacement of the existing ships.
NSF and USCG, along with the Office of Science and Technology Policy and the Of-
fice  of  Management  and  Budget,  are  engaged  in  deliberations  on  these  questions.
Post-Award Administration

For  the  third  consecutive  year,  independent  audits  of  NSF’s  financial  statements
have identified post-award monitoring of grantee institutions as a ‘‘reportable condi-
tion.’’  The  OIG  reports  that  effective  post-award  monitoring  should  ensure  that:
‘‘awardees  are  complying  with  award  terms  and  conditions  and  federal  regulations;
adequate  progress  is  being  made  toward  achieving  the  objectives  and  milestones  of
the program; and expenditures listed on NSF’s financial statements are accurate.’’ 9
In  response,  NSF  has  taken  steps  to  address  some  of  the  post-award  monitoring
issues  identified  through  the  independent  audits,  such  as  establishing  a  risk-based
program  for  identifying  and  tracking  high-risk  awardees.  The  Foundation  has  also
noted that the expensive nature of site visits associated with post-award monitoring,
coupled with limited administrative and personnel resources, have hindered its abil-
ity  to  address  many  of  these  issues.  While  noting  that  progress  has  occurred,  and
recognizing  budget  limitations,  the  OIG  has  (1)  emphasized  that  NSF’s  measures
have been too narrowly focused on ‘‘high-risk awardees,’’ which constitute less than
0.1  percent  of  NSF’s  award  portfolio;  and  (2)  recommended  that  NSF  ‘‘apply  more
cost-effective  monitoring  procedures  such  as  desk  reviews  of  reports  from  awardees
and  computer-assisted  screening  to  medium  and  low-risk  awardees  on  a  random
basis.’’
7. Witness Questions

The  witnesses  were  asked  to  address  the  following  questions  in  their  testimony:

Questions for Dr. Arden Bement

• In  developing  the  request,  how  were  priorities  determined  across  budget  ac-
counts  (research,  education,  facilities,  and  administration),  within  accounts
(i.e., K–12, undergraduate, and graduate education; research directorates and
divisions),  and  among  related  agency  objectives  and  priorities  (i.e.,  success
rate,  grant  size  and  duration;  multi-  and  single-investigator  research;  facili-
ties  construction,  operation,  and  research)?  If  NSF  were  to  receive  additional
funding in FY06 beyond the President’s request, where should it be directed?
• What  are  the  most  important  short-term  and  long-term  budget  and  manage-
ment challenges facing NSF and how is the agency working to address them?
• The  FY06  budget  request  includes  a  goal  to  halt  this  precipitous  decline  in
the success rate while maintaining recent gains NSF has made in expanding
the average size and duration of its grants. What strategies will NSF employ
to  achieve  this?  How  will  NSF  ensure  that  efforts  to  reduce  the  number  of
proposals  does  not  conflict  with  efforts  to  broaden  participation  in  NSF  pro-
grams?  To  what  extent  would  a  strategy  of  narrowing  the  pool  of  proposals
lower  the  overall  quality  of  the  pool  and  hence  the  quality  of  the  research
NSF funds?

• As  an  increasing  number  of  Major  Research  Equipment  and  Facilities  Con-
struction  (MREFC)  projects  transition  out  of  the  construction  phase  and  into
operation,  how  will  NSF  balance  the  need  to  support  core  activities  in  its  re-
search accounts with the need to fully fund the operations and research costs
associated with new facilities?

• Within  NSF’s  Education  and  Human  Resources  (EHR)  directorate,  the  Divi-
sion  of  Research,  Evaluation,  and  Communication  receives  a  proposed  cut  of
43  percent  from  the  FY05  enacted  level  and  will  propose  no  new  awards.  Is
it NSF’s goal to provide funding for new awards in FY07 and beyond, or does
the  fact  that  no  new  awards  will  be  made  in  FY06  signal  a  planned  phase-
out of this division?

• What  actions  is  NSF  taking  to  address  the  management  and  performance
issues outlined in the Office of Inspector General’s (OIG) FY05 ‘‘Management
Challenges’’  letter,  particularly  those  related  to  workforce  planning,  post-
award administration, and large facilities projects?

9 NSF  Office  of  the  Inspector  General’s  Semiannual  Report  to  Congress  (September  2004),

page 52.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Questions for Dr. Mark Wrighton

9

• If NSF were to receive additional funding in FY06 beyond the President’s re-

quest, where should it be directed?

• What  are  the  most  important  short-term  and  long-term  budget  and  manage-
ment  challenges  facing  NSF  and  how  is  the  National  Science  Board  (NSB)
working  to  address  them?  Please  provide  a  summary  of  recent  policy  actions
that  the  Board  has  taken,  and  a  summary  of  other  current  issues  that  are
under consideration.

• How is the NSB working with NSF to address the management and perform-
ance issues outlined in the Office of Inspector General’s (OIG) FY05 ‘‘Manage-
ment  Challenges’’  letter,  particularly  those  related  to  workforce  planning,
post-award administration, and large facilities projects?

Questions for Dr. Christine Boesz

• Please provide an overview of NSF Inspector General (IG) responsibilities and

activities, and a summary of recent IG actions and reports.

• What  are  the  most  important  short-term  and  long-term  budget  and  manage-
ment  challenges  facing  NSF,  and  what  actions  should  NSF  be  taking  to  ad-
dress  those  challenges?  In  particular,  please  discuss  the  issues  related  to
workforce  planning,  post-award  administration,  and  large  facilities  planning.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

Chairman  INGLIS.  Thank  you  for  coming  to  this  morning’s  hear-
ing  on  the  National  Science  Foundation  Budget  and  Management
Challenges,  the  first  Research  Subcommittee  hearing  of  the  109th
Congress.

I want to extend a special welcome to my colleague, Ms. Hooley,
the  Ranking  Democrat  on  this  committee.  I  am  glad  that  the
Science  Committee  has  a  history  of  working  in  a  bipartisan  way.
It  is  a  new  thing  for  me,  having  been  on  Judiciary  and  Budget  in
my  previous  time  in  Congress,  so  it  is  very  refreshing  to  be  here
at Science.

I  spoke  recently  to  a  General  Electric  executive  in  the  course  of
a  plant  tour  in  Greenville,  South  Carolina.  They  have  2,600  em-
ployees and 1,000 of them are engineers in Greenville, South Caro-
lina.  We  are  very  happy  about  that.  And  I  asked  him,  ‘‘Could  you
hire more?’’ He said, ‘‘We could take 300 right away. The core prob-
lem,’’  he  said,  ‘‘those  are  just  not  available.’’  I  asked  him,  ‘‘Why
not?’’  He  said,  ‘‘It  is  the  teachers.’’  He  said,  ‘‘You  need  inspiration
in order to teach people engineering and science.’’

Well, that is what we are here about today. And to celebrate the

work of NSF and to provide for its future.

He  also  told  me  that  they  are  using  the  technology  in  their  gas
turbines, technology that is unique in the whole world. GE depends
on  their  ability  to  innovate  to  be  competitive.  For  most  American
companies, innovation is their only edge. To continue to win in this
world  of  commerce,  we  must  continue  to  create  new  and  improved
technologies.  If  we  want  to  lead  the  world  in  innovation,  we  must
train  the  Ph.D.s  whose  basic  research  fuels  technological  innova-
tion for the decades to come.

Basic research is surely the lifeblood of innovation. It used to be
that  our  large  companies  did  the  basic  research,  companies  like
Bell Labs, IBM, and Xerox. They were supplemented in their work
by the Department of Energy, and the Department of Defense, and
NSF.  Now,  market  pressures  and  the  need  to  return  bottom-line
numbers by their shareholders have pushed the burden almost en-
tirely to the Federal Government in basic research and increasingly
the  NSF.  Without  NSF  supporting  basic  research,  our  edge  in
science will slip, and our innovation gap will grow.

That  is  why  I  am  so  concerned  about  the  current  NSF  budget.
Although  there  is  a  slight  increase  for  this  year,  it  doesn’t  make
up  for  last  year’s  cuts,  and  it  is  far  below  the  promised  level  that
we  had  of  doubling  NSF’s  budget  over  five  years.  In  my  previous
stint in Congress, as I mentioned, I was on the Budget Committee,
and  I  am  quite  concerned  about  our  current  budget  deficit.  I
learned during those years, though, that it takes two things to bal-
ance the budget, and amazingly, we did it between 1993 and 1998.
We went from a $300 billion deficit to a slight surplus. Now we are
in  the  $400  billion  range,  and  we  need  to  get  to  a  slight  surplus
again, we hope. But what I learned, though, is it takes two things.
It  takes  spending  restraint,  plus  economic  growth.  Spending  re-
straint alone is not enough. You have got to have economic growth.
So  the  key,  I  think,  for  us,  is  to  figure  out  how  to  stop  simple
spending  and  start  thoughtful  investing.  And  that  is  what  we  are
here to talk about today with NSF.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

We have a need to train more scientists and engineers. We have
to  continue  the  stream  of  exciting  innovations  that  save  lives  and
improve  our  quality  of  life.  Just  as  it  would  be  shortsighted  for  a
company  not  to  plan  the  next  generation  of  products,  it  would  be
irresponsible  of  us  to  neglect  future  research  in  basic  science.  It  is
more important than ever, because it is the foundation of our inno-
vation economy.

The  NSF  has  been  a  key  force  for  innovation,  from  the  MRI  to
bar  code  scanners  to  the  creation  of  the  Internet  and  the  origins
of Google. The NSF has a track record of accountability and a focus
on  excellence,  and  we  have  to  seek  continuous  improvement.  The
standard for us is higher because the work—the nature of the work
is harder for many of us to understand.

I  will  tell  you  that  I  wonder  about  the  cuts  in  math  and  science
education and indications that some NSF activities may be migrat-
ing to the Department of Education. The NSF has a passion for ex-
cellence, while the Department of Education is arguably focused on
simple  proficiency.  Passion  isn’t  easily  transferred.  Are  we  invest-
ing enough in research? Are we simply spending on current needs?
If we continue down this path, will we be positioned in the global—
where will we be positioned in the global economy in 20 years? Will
the  modifications  to  merit  review  ultimately  reduce  the  quality  of
submissions? Also, what are the appropriate costs for Coast Guard
icebreaking  services,  and  are  these  activities  best  funded  through
the  NSF?  These  are  challenging  questions,  and  I  am  hopeful  that
we can get some answers today.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Inglis follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN BOB INGLIS

I want to welcome everyone and thank you for coming to this morning’s hearing—
the  first  Research  Subcommittee  hearing  of  the  109th  Congress.  I  want  to  extend
a special welcome to my esteemed colleague Congresswoman Hooley, who is the new
Ranking Member of the Subcommittee. I am glad that the Science Committee works
in such a bipartisan way, and I look forward to working with Ms. Hooley.

I recently spoke to an executive for General Electric. When I asked him if he had
enough qualified engineers to fill his research jobs, he said ‘‘No.’’ He could hire 300
tomorrow  if  they  were  available.  The  core  problem  is  teachers.  There  just  aren’t
enough  qualified  and  inspiring  teachers  to  produce  the  scientists  and  engineers  his
company needs.

He  also  told  me  about  the  technology  that  they  are  using  in  their  gas  turbines—
technology that is currently unique in the world. GE depends on their ability to in-
novate  to  be  competitive.  For  most  American  companies,  innovation  is  their  only
edge. To continue to win in this world of commerce, we must continue to create new
and  improved  technologies.  If  we  want  to  lead  the  world  in  innovation,  we  must
train  the  Ph.D.s  whose  basic  research  fuels  technological  innovation  in  decades  to
come.

Basic  research  is  the  lifeblood  of  innovation.  It  used  to  be  that  our  large  compa-
nies  did  the  basic  research—companies  like  Bell  Labs,  IBM,  and  Xerox.  They  were
supplemented by the work of the DOE, DOD, and NSF. Now, market pressures and
shifting  government  priorities  have  pushed  the  burden  almost  entirely  to  the  Fed-
eral  Government,  and,  increasingly,  NSF.  Without  NSF  supporting  basic  research,
our edge in science will slip away and an innovation gap will grow.

That’s  why  I’m  so  concerned  about  the  current  NSF  budget.  Although  there  is  a
slight  increase  this  year,  it  doesn’t  make  up  for  last  year’s  cuts,  and  is  still  below
the  FY04  level.  It  is  also  now  far  from  the  Congress’  promise  to  double  the  NSF
budget over five years. On my previous stint in Congress, I was on the Budget Com-
mittee  and  I  was  quite  concerned  about  our  budget  deficit.  I  learned  during  those
years  that  getting  it  balanced  requires  spending  restraint  and  economic  growth.
We’ve  got  to  stop  spending  and  start  investing.  Investing  in  basic  and  applied

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

science  research  makes  sense.  If  we  invest  wisely,  we  can  find  economic  growth
through innovation.

We  also  have  to  train  more  scientists  and  engineers.  We  have  to  continue  the
stream  of  exciting  innovations  that  save  lives  and  improve  our  quality  of  life.  Just
as it would be short-sighted for a company to not plan the next generation of prod-
ucts,  it  would  be  irresponsible  of  us  to  neglect  future  research  in  basic  science.  It’s
more  important  than  ever  because  it  is  the  foundation  of  our  innovation  economy.
The NSF has been a key force for innovation, from the MRI to bar code scanners,
from  the  creation  of  the  Internet  to  the  origins  of  Google.  The  NSF  has  a  track
record  of  accountability  and  a  focus  on  excellence,  and  we  have  to  seek  continuous
improvement. The standard for us is higher because the nature of the work is hard-
er for many to understand.

I wonder about the cuts in math and science education, and indications that some
NSF  activities  may  be  ‘‘migrating’’  to  the  Department  of  Education.  The  NSF  has
a  passion  for  excellence,  while  the  Department  of  Education  is  arguably  focused  on
proficiency.  Passion  isn’t  easily  transferred.  Are  we  investing  enough  in  research?
Or are we simply spending on current needs? If we continue down this path, where
will we be positioned in the global economy in twenty years? Will the modifications
to merit review ultimately reduce the quality of submissions? Also, what are the ap-
propriate  costs  for  Coast  Guard  ice-breaking  services,  and  are  these  activities  best
funded through NSF? These are challenging questions, and I’m hopeful that we can
get some answers today.

Chairman  INGLIS.  The  Chair  now  recognizes  Ms.  Hooley,  the
Ranking  Minority  Member  on  the  Subcommittee,  for  an  opening
statement.

Ms. HOOLEY. Mr. Chair, thank you, and I am looking forward to

working with you. Welcome back to Congress.

I,  too,  served  on  the  Budget  Committee  and  know  what  you  are
talking  about.  So  I  am  looking  forward  to  serving  on  this  com-
mittee and working in a bipartisan way.

I  want  to  welcome  our  witnesses.  Thank  you  very  much  for  tak-
ing  your  time  to  be  here,  and  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you.
The  thrust  of  this  hearing  is  on  the  fiscal  year  2006  budget  re-
quest  for  the  Foundation,  and  more  broadly,  on  policy  issues  that
affect  the  ability  of  the  Foundation  to  carry  out  its  historic  role  of
nurturing  the  research  and  education  capabilities  of  the  Nation  in
all fields of science and engineering.

I  must  say  at  the  onset  that  I  am  deeply  concerned  about  the
overall  level  of  the  resources  provided  for  our  NSF  in  the  Presi-
dent’s  budget.  The  budget  is  clearly  inadequate  to  meet  the  wide-
ranging  responsibilities  of  NSF.  It  was  just  a  little  over  two  years
ago  that  we  said  we  wanted  to  double  the  budget  over  five  years.
Congress  asked  the  National  Science  Board  to  report  back  on  how
the  increased  resources  authorized  by  legislation  would  be  used.
The  Board  subsequently  responded  and  made  the  case  that  valu-
able  as  the  budget  doubling  would  be,  it  would  still  be  inadequate
to  allow  NSF  to  satisfy  all  of  the  unmet  needs  in  basic  research
and education that would be required to sustain future U.S. leader-
ship in science and technology. The Board set the desired target as
a four-fold increase in the budget over five years.

The budget request before us would leave an accumulative short-
fall  of  $5.8  billion  in  meeting  just  the  doubling  goal,  let  alone
achieving  the  target  suggested  by  the  Science  Board.  I  recognize
what  our  budget  looks  like,  that  we  are  in  a  deficit.  And  without
commenting on the priorities and events that led to our current fis-
cal  situation,  I  believe  it  is  time  to  answer  the  many  calls  for
strengthening  federal  support  for  research  from  such  diverse
sources as former Presidential Science Advisor Alan Bromley, Fed-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

eral  Reserve  Chairman  Alan  Greenspan,  former  Speaker  of  the
House  Newt  Gingerich,  and  the  Hart-Rudman  Commission  on  Na-
tional Security.

Increased  funding  for  research  is  not  a  drain  on  the  budget,  but
rather it is a necessary investment to allow our country to succeed
in  an  increasingly  competitive  world.  Withholding  this  investment,
even  at  a  time  of  tight  budgets,  places  us  in  real  danger  of  losing
the  competitive  edge  that  we  have  enjoyed  for  so  long.  The  Presi-
dent’s Council of Advisors for Science and Technology has called for
adjusting the federal R&D budget upward for the physical sciences
and engineering to bring them in collective parity with life sciences
over the four-year budget cycle.

I  am  disappointed  that  the  current  budget  request  for  the  main
agencies  that  support  research  in  these  fields,  including  NSF,
makes  no  forward  progress  toward  achieving  this  goal.  In  addition
to  the  meager  levels  of  the  fiscal  year  2006  NSF  budget  request,
I  am  also  puzzled  and  concerned  about  the  lack  of  priority  it  af-
fords  to  science  education  activities.  NSF  K–12  education  funding
level, under this request, would drop by over 50 percent relative to
fiscal year 2004. Not only is the Math and Science Partnership Pro-
gram  targeted  for  a  close-out,  but  core  programs  are  slashed  that
support  teacher  professional  development  that  develop  improved
educational materials.

In  the  face  of  widespread  concerns  about  the  quality  of  science
and math in our schools, I am at a loss to imagine any reasonable
justification for these budget decisions. I would note that they seem
to  be  counter  to  the  position  that  the  National  Science  Board  has
taken on K–12 programs, particularly on the value and importance
of  the  Math  and  Science  Partnership  Program.  I  believe  NSF  is
making  a  serious  mistake  in  abandoning  its  long-time  role  in  K–
12 science education. I suspect this is not a policy change that will
be  viewed  favorably  by  many  Members  of  the  Science  Committee.
Adequate funding for basic research and education in science and
engineering  is  not  a  partisan  issue.  The  benefits  from  this  invest-
ment  flow  to  our  economy,  to  national  security,  and  to  the  well
being  of  our  citizens.  We  in  Congress  must  take  action  that  will
provide for a vigorous academic research enterprise for the Nation.
NSF is a key player in realizing this vision.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing  and
thank  our  witnesses  for  appearing  before  the  Subcommittee  today,
and I look forward to our discussion.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Hooley follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE DARLENE HOOLEY

Mr. Chairman, I am pleased to join you in welcoming our witnesses today to this
oversight  hearing  on  the  National  Science  Foundation.  I  want  to  congratulate  you
as  you  begin  your  chairmanship  of  the  Subcommittee  on  Research,  and  I  look  for-
ward to working with you.

The thrust of this hearing is on the fiscal year 2006 budget request for the Foun-
dation,  and  more  broadly,  on  policy  issues  that  affect  the  ability  of  the  Foundation
to  carry  out  its  historic  role  of  nurturing  the  research  and  education  capabilities  of
the Nation in all fields of science and engineering.

I must say at the outset that I am deeply concerned about the overall level of re-
sources  proposed  for  NSF  in  the  President’s  budget.  The  budget  is  clearly  inad-
equate  to  meet  the  wide  ranging  responsibilities  of  NSF.  It  was  only  a  little  over
two years ago that the Congress passed, and the President signed, legislation calling
for a five-year doubling of the NSF budget.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

Congress  asked  the  National  Science  Board  to  report  back  on  how  the  increased
resources  authorized  by  the  legislation  would  be  used  by  NSF.  The  Board  subse-
quently  responded,  and  made  the  case  that,  valuable  as  a  budget  doubling  would
be,  it  would  be  inadequate  to  allow  NSF  to  satisfy  all  of  the  unmet  needs  in  basic
research  and  education  that  would  be  required  to  sustain  future  U.S.  leadership  in
science  and  technology.  The  Board  set  the  desired  target  at  a  fourfold  increase  in
the budget over five years.

The  budget  request  before  us  would  leave  a  cumulative  shortfall  of  $5.8  billion
in  meeting  the  doubling  goal—let  alone  achieving  the  target  suggested  by  the
Science Board.

I recognize that we are facing a daunting budgetary outlook. Without commenting
on  the  priorities  and  events  that  led  to  the  current  fiscal  situation,  I  believe  it  is
time  to  answer  the  many  calls  for  strengthening  federal  support  for  research  from
such  diverse  sources  as  former  presidential  science  advisor  Allen  Bromley,  Federal
Reserve  Chairman  Alan  Greenspan,  former  speaker  of  the  House  Newt  Gingrich,
and the Hart-Rudman Commission on National Security.

Increased  funding  for  research  is  not  a  drain  on  the  budget.  But  rather  it  is  a
necessary  investment  to  allow  the  Nation  to  succeed  in  an  increasingly  competitive
world.

Withholding  this  investment,  even  in  a  time  of  tight  budgets,  places  us  in  real

danger of losing the competitive edge we have enjoyed for so long.

The President’s Council of Advisors for Science and Technology has called for ad-
justing  the  federal  R&D  budget  upward  for  the  physical  sciences  and  engineering
to  bring  them  collectively  to  parity  with  the  life  sciences  over  four  budget  cycles.
I am disappointed that the current budget requests for the main agencies that sup-
port  research  in  these  fields,  including  NSF,  make  no  forward  progress  toward
achieving this goal.

In  addition  to  the  meager  level  of  the  FY  2006  NSF  budget  request,  I  am  also
puzzled  and  concerned  about  the  lack  of  priority  it  affords  to  science  education  ac-
tivities.  NSF’s  K–12  education  funding  level  under  this  request  would  drop  by  over
50 percent relative to fiscal year 2004.

Not only is the Math and Science Partnership program still targeted for close-out,
but  core  programs  are  slashed  that  support  teacher  professional  development  and
that develop improved educational materials.

In  the  face  of  widespread  concerns  about  the  quality  of  science  and  math  edu-
cation in our schools, I am at a loss to imagine any reasonable justification for these
budget decisions. I would note that they also seem to be counter to the position the
National Science Board has taken on K–12 programs, particularly on the value and
importance of the Math and Science Partnership program.

I believe NSF is making a serious mistake in abandoning its long-time role in K–
12 science education. I suspect this is not a policy change that will be viewed favor-
ably by many Members of the Science Committee.

Adequate  funding  for  basic  research  and  education  in  science  and  engineering  is
not a partisan issue. The benefits from this investment flow to our economy, to na-
tional security, and to the well being of our citizens. We in Congress must take ac-
tion  that  will  provide  for  a  vigorous  academic  research  enterprise  for  the  Nation
and, thereby, will help fill the storehouse of basic knowledge that powers the future.
NSF is a key player in realizing this vision.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing  and  thank  our  wit-
nesses  for  appearing  before  the  Subcommittee  today.  I  look  forward  to  our  discus-
sion.

remarks.

Chairman  INGLIS.  Thank  you,  Ms.  Hooley.  Thank  you  for  those

And  any  additional  opening  statements  will  be  welcomed  by  the
Committee  and  may  be  submitted  by  the  Members  for  the  record.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Johnson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE EDDIE BERNICE JOHNSON

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  also  would  like  to  thank  our  witnesses  for  agreeing
to appear before us today. The purpose of this hearing is to provide an opportunity
to discuss the National Science Foundation’s budget for FY 2006.

I  am  very  excited  about  this  hearing  today  because  we  will  be  discussing  some-
thing that is very close to my heart, and that is National Science Foundation (NSF)
funding.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

Three  years  ago,  Congress  sent  the  President  a  bill  authorizing  a  doubling  of
NSF’s  program  over  five  years.  Despite  signing  that  bill  to  glowing  reviews,  the
President  has  sent  us  four  successive  budgets  that  fall  far  short  of  reaching  that
goal. This marks a fundamental breach of trust with our institutions of higher edu-
cation  and  with  our  children,  who  depend  on  NSF  to  fund  the  best  and  brightest
to  pursue  the  most  promising  scientific  insights.  The  only  thing  more  surprising  is
the continued phase out of the K–12 Math and Science Partnerships (MSP) program
(down $20 million) and additional cuts to the K–12 activities in the education direc-
torate.  With  funding  levels  down  another  24  percent  from  last  year,  we  are  dev-
astated our K–12 education programs.

With  this  budget,  what  messages  are  we  sending  to  our  children?  The  Nation
must  take  advantage  of  the  human  resource  potential  of  all  our  people  if  we  are
to  succeed  in  the  international  economic  competition  of  the  21st  century.  This  will
require that reform efforts in science and math education be founded on educational
materials and practices that are derived from rigorous research and that seek to en-
gage and cultivate the interest of all children.

For  my  entire  Congressional  career,  I  have  worked  to  increase  the  participation
by minorities and women in science, mathematics and engineering programs and in-
creased funding for institutions who actively recruit under-represented students for
these  paths  of  study.  It  is  time  to  take  action  to  ensure  the  best  possible  education
for our children.

Hopefully,  the  witnesses  today  can  discuss  ways  to  protect  the  future  of  our  chil-

dren’s education. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Carnahan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RUSS CARNAHAN

Mr.  Chairman  and  Ms.  Ranking  Member,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  holding  this

subcommittee hearing today.

I  am  pleased  to  have  Dr.  Mark  Wrighton,  Chancellor  of  Washington  University,
which  resides  in  my  congressional  district,  testifying  before  us.  ‘‘WashU’’  is  a  re-
markable  institution  and  I  am  blessed  to  represent  many  outstanding  minds  who
continually provide our nation with important scientific research.

Today’s  discussion  on  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  allows  us  to  exam-
ine our research and development priorities. I am disheartened to find much of our
budget  cuts  are  again  in  the  area  of  education,  specifically  K–12  science  education
programs.  Many  of  us  on  this  committee  and  in  the  larger  U.S.  House  have  noted
that  our  continuing  global  presence  in  science  and  technology  is  reliant  upon  a
strong  student  body,  well-versed  in  science  and  math  curricula.  Furthermore,  our
nation’s  economic  and  security  interests  will  be  affected  by  the  priorities  we  place
on  invigorating  our  science  and  technology.  I  sincerely  hope  that  we  can  recognize
the real value of science education when we make NSF’s budgetary decisions.

Dr. Wrighton, thank you for being here today. I look forward to hearing the testi-
mony of all our witnesses. However, I want to apologize that I must leave the hear-
ing early to attend a previously scheduled appointment.

Chairman INGLIS. At this point, I would like to introduce our wit-
nesses.  Dr.  Arden  Bement  is  the  Director  of  the  National  Science
Foundation  and  a  former  Director  of  NIST.  Dr.  Bement  and  I  first
met  at  the  R&D  budget  hearing  two  weeks  ago,  and  I  am  encour-
aged  by  his  vision  for  innovation  and  in  keeping  our  economy
strong. Dr. Mark Wrighton is also with us, and I am going to defer
to my colleague, Mr. Carnahan, for an introduction.

Mr. CARNAHAN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. It is an honor to wel-

come hometown St. Louis here today in Dr. Mark Wrighton.

I  am  pleased  to  have  you  here  before  the  Research  Sub-
committee. He is here in his capacity as Chairman of the Audit and
Oversight  Committee  of  the  National  Science  Board,  but  back
home,  he  is  our  Chancellor  at  the  Washington  University  in  St.
Louis  and  has  been  one  of  our  fine  local  leaders.  Not  only  do  they
have  a  national  reputation  at  Washington  University,  but  he  has
been  really  instrumental  in  developing  a  lot  of  our  science  and  re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Hooley and Members of the Subcommittee.

Thank you for this opportunity to provide you with some context
for our fiscal year 2006 budget request. I welcome you to your new
positions on the Research Subcommittee, and I look forward to con-
tinuing  the  close  and  productive  relationship  that  NSF  has  had
with the Congress over the past 55 years.

Let me get right to the questions in your invitation letter regard-

ing the management challenges we face.

20

search  technology  and  capability  in  the  St.  Louis  region.  So  it  is
great to have you here today.

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Mr. Carnahan.
And our third witness is Dr. Christine Boesz, the Inspector Gen-
eral of the National Science Foundation and performs there this in-
dispensable oversight work.

Thank  you  all  for  coming.  We  are  looking  forward  to  what  you
have to say. We would ask, if you can, to limit your remarks to five
minutes,  although  we  will  be  flexible  with  the  time  limits,  as  we
have  already  been  this  morning.  Afterwards,  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee will have five minutes each to ask their questions.

We will start with the testimony of Dr. Bement.

STATEMENT OF DR. ARDEN L. BEMENT, JR., DIRECTOR,

NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION

Dr.  BEMENT.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Inglis  and  Ranking  Member

The  first  of  them  deals  with  priorities,  how  they  are  set  both
within  and  across  accounts,  and  among  agency  objectives.  This  is
an  excellent  starting  point  for  gaining  a  perspective  on  NSF,  be-
cause setting priorities is at the core of what we do every day.

The  most  important  source  of  information  for  setting  priorities
comes  from  the  research  communities  themselves.  In  addition  to
proposals,  the  broader  research  communities  also  provide  contin-
uous  input  in  the  form  of  advice  from  National  Academy  reports,
analyses  by  professional  societies,  and  national  and  international
workshops and conferences.

Our directorate Advisory Committees and Committees of Visitors
provide  top-to-bottom  reviews  of  existing  programs  and  help  for-
malize research priorities within and across disciplines.

Ultimately,  the  priorities  reflected  in  our  budget  request  are  re-
fined through consultations with the Deputy Director, the Assistant
Directors,  the  National  Science  Board,  and  the  Office  of  Science
and Technology Policy. Finally, they are negotiated with the Office
of  Management  and  Budget  in  developing  the  President’s  budget
request to Congress.

This  year’s  budget  request  highlights  four  broad  priorities:
strengthening  core  disciplinary  research,  providing  broadly  acces-
sible  cyberinfrastructure  and  world-class  research  facilities,  broad-
ening  participation  in  the  science  and  engineering  workforce,  and
sustaining organizational excellence in NSF management practices.
This  last  priority  leads  directly  into  the  next  question  raised  in
your  invitation  letter  regarding  our  budget  and  management  chal-
lenges.

Nearly  three  years  ago,  NSF  initiated  an  independent  business
analysis  that  has  identified  a  number  of  important  management

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

challenges  in  the  areas  of  workforce  requirements,  information
technology, and business practices.

21

It may help to give you some examples of NSF’s workload.
In  1993,  NSF  had  1,205  full-time  equivalent  employees,  and  we
processed 29,000 proposals. In the intervening 12 years, our budget
has doubled, and the number of proposals we have processed grew
by more than 50 percent. But our FTEs have increased only by 5.7
percent.  We  have  dealt  with  this  increased  workload  by  relying  on
investments  in  technology.  But  the  need  for  additional  people  be-
comes an overriding need at some point, and we have reached that
point.

Last  year,  more  than  44,000  proposals  submitted  to  NSF  re-
ceived  approximately  250,000  reviews  by  outside  experts.  Yet,  in
some programs the success rate is 10 percent or less. So one of our
management challenges we face is being clearer in our solicitations
so  that  researchers  are  not  writing  proposals  that  are  unlikely  to
get funded.

Large  facilities  are  necessary  to  keep  NSF  at  the  frontier.  Al-
though  our  budget  does  not  request  any  new  starts  for  major  re-
search facilities, we will continue projects already underway.

While  new  starts  receive  a  great  deal  of  attention,  very  little  is
paid  to  research  facilities  that  are  phased  out  at  the  end  of  their
useful  life.  Over  the  past  five  years,  for  example,  we  have  phased
out  four  ocean  research  vessels,  two  aircraft,  and  two  accelerators.
These  decisions  were  based  on  the  scientific  value  of  these  plat-
forms,  as  well  as  their  operation  and  maintenance  costs.  Indeed,
the  operation  and  maintenance  costs  are  a  key  factor  in  the  deci-
sion-making process for approval of new research facilities.

When  we  set  priorities,  a  number  of  programs  in  our  Education
and  Human  Resources  directorate  were  protected  from  reductions.
We  are  maintaining  effective  programs  aimed  at  increasing  the
participation  of  women  and  under-represented  minorities  in  re-
search  fields.  We  are  also  maintaining  programs  to  increase  the
number of science and engineering baccalaureate degrees as well as
our  prestigious  fellowship  support  to  the  most  talented  U.S.  grad-
uate students.

After providing for high-priority areas, it is necessary to find off-
sets, and as you know, this is the most difficult part of priority set-
ting.  However,  it  is  important  that  we  focus  not  only  on  the  num-
bers, but look at the broader policies as well.

For example, we are proposing a significant reduction in the Re-
search,  Evaluations,  and  Communication  Division.  This  is  not  a
signal  that  we  are  no  longer  committed  to  evaluation.  Rather,  we
are  committed  to  building  evaluations  into  the  projects  we  fund
rather  than  treating  it  as  a  separate  activity.  Already,  we  have
used  this  approach  in  major  projects  to  great  advantage,  and  we
expect to expand this design throughout EHR.

NSF  faces  many  management  challenges,  including,  but  not  cer-
tainly  limited  to,  those  identified  by  the  Inspector  General.  We
have  been  steadily  implementing  the  recommendations  from  the
business  analysis  and  will  continue  to  do  so.  NSF  employees  and
I take very seriously the need to earn and maintain the taxpayers’
trust and to preserve the agency’s reputation.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

Mr.  Chairman,  I  hope  that  this  brief  overview  conveys  to  you
NSF’s commitment to advancing science and engineering in the na-
tional  interest.  I  am  very  aware  and  appreciate  the  Committee’s
long-standing bipartisan support for NSF, and I would be happy to
respond to any questions you have.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Bement follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ARDEN L. BEMENT, JR.

Chairman  Inglis,  Ranking  Member  Hooley,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,
thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  discuss  NSF’s  FY  2006  budget  Request.  It  is  a
pleasure  to  appear  before  you  today.  For  over  fifty  years,  NSF  has  been  charged
with being a strong steward of the scientific discovery and innovation that has been
crucial  to  increasing  America’s  economic  strength,  global  competitiveness,  national
security, and overall quality of life.

For many years, the United States economy has depended heavily on investments
in  research  and  development—and  with  good  reason.  America’s  sustained  economic
prosperity is based on technological innovation made possible, in large part, by fun-
damental  science  and  engineering  research.  Innovation  and  technology  are  the  en-
gines  of  the  American  economy,  and  advances  in  science  and  engineering  provide
the fuel.

Investments in science and technology—both public and private—have driven eco-
nomic  growth  and  improved  the  quality  of  life  in  America  for  the  last  200  years.
They have generated new knowledge and new industries, created new jobs, ensured
economic  and  national  security,  reduced  pollution  and  increased  energy  efficiency,
provided  better  and  safer  transportation,  improved  medical  care,  and  increased  liv-
ing standards for the American people.

Investments  in  research  and  development  are  among  the  highest-payback  invest-
ments a nation can make. Over the past 50 years technological innovation has been
responsible for as much as half of the Nation’s growth in productivity.

Sustaining  this  innovation  requires  an  understanding  of  the  factors  that  con-
tribute  to  it.  The  Council  on  Competitiveness,  a  consortium  of  industry,  university,
and labor leaders, has developed quantitative measures of national competitiveness:
the number of R&D personnel in the available workforce; total R&D investment; the
percentage  of  R&D  funded  by  private  industry;  the  percentage  of  R&D  performed
by  the  university  sector;  spending  on  higher  education;  the  strength  of  intellectual
property  protection,  openness  to  international  competition;  and  per  capita  gross  do-
mestic  product.  A  similar  set  of  indicators  has  been  developed  by  the  World  Bank
Group,  and  voluminous  data  have  been  compiled  by  NSF.  The  important  point  un-
derscored by these indicators is that, for America to remain a prosperous and secure
country, it must maintain its technological leadership in the world.

Perhaps  the  Council  on  Competitiveness’  2004  National  Innovation  Initiative  re-
port captured it best by simply stating, ‘‘Innovation has always been the way people
solved the great challenges facing society.’’

Often  the  connection  between  an  area  of  research,  or  even  a  particular  scientific
discovery,  and  an  innovation  may  be  far  from  obvious.  Fundamental  research  in
physics,  mathematics  and  high-flux  magnets  supported  by  NSF  led  to  the  develop-
ment  of  today’s  Magnetic  Resonance  Imaging  (MRI)  technology.  Today,  MRIs  are
used  widely  to  detect  cancer  and  internal  tissue  damage.  Fundamental  research  on
extremophiles, or microorganisms living in extreme environments, led to the polym-
erase  chain  reaction,  a  procedure  essential  to  modern  biotechnology,  as  well  as  one
that  allows  us  to  use  DNA  for  forensic  evidence.  Continuing  progress  in  basic
science  and  engineering  research  promises  more  discoveries  as  well  as  further  im-
provements in living standards and economic performance.

And  still,  science  and  engineering  is  becoming  an  ever-larger  portion  of  our  na-
tion’s  productivity.  In  the  early  1950s,  Jacob  Bronowski  wrote,  ‘‘The  world  today  is
powered by science.’’ I would take this premise one step farther, ‘‘No science; no eco-
nomic growth.’’ Our current level of scientific and technological productivity is what
keeps  us  ahead  of  our  global  competitors  as  the  playing  field  continues  to  become
more level.

NSF  has  helped  advance  America’s  basic  science  and  engineering  enterprise  for
over  fifty  years.  Despite  its  small  size,  NSF  has  an  extraordinary  impact  on  sci-
entific  and  engineering  knowledge  and  capacity.  While  NSF  represents  only  four
percent of the total federal budget for research and development, it accounts for fifty
percent  of  non-life  science  basic  research  at  academic  institutions.  In  fact,  NSF  is
the  only  federal  agency  that  supports  all  fields  of  science  and  engineering  research
and  the  educational  programs  that  sustain  them  across  generations.  NSF’s  pro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

grams  reach  over  2,000  institutions  across  the  Nation,  and  they  involve  roughly
200,000 researchers, teachers, and students.

NSF  specifically  targets  its  investments  in  fundamental  research  at  the  frontiers
of  science  and  engineering.  Here,  advances  push  the  boundaries  of  innovation,
progress and productivity.

Compared  to  other  commodities,  knowledge  generated  from  basic  science  invest-
ments  is  unique,  long  lasting  and  self-leveraging.  Knowledge  can  be  shared,  stored
and  distributed  easily,  and  it  does  not  diminish  by  use.  Incremental  advances  in
knowledge  are  synergistic  over  time.  NSF  is  proud  to  have  built  the  foundation  for
this knowledge base through decades of peer-reviewed, merit-based research.
Management Perspectives on the FY 2006 Budget Request

Before I get into the details of our FY 2006 request, let me first address the ques-
tions  you  have  raised  in  your  invitation  letter  so  that  you  can  see  how  we  plan  to
meet  the  challenges  we  face.  The  first  item  deals  with  priorities—how  they  are  set
both  across  and  within  accounts  and  among  agency  objectives.  This  is  an  excellent
starting  point  for  gaining  a  perspective  on  NSF,  because  setting  priorities  is  at  the
core of what we do every day.

The most important source of information for setting priorities comes from the re-
search  communities  themselves.  The  research  proposals  that  we  receive  help  iden-
tify the leading edge of research and areas ripe for greater investment. The broader
research communities also provide continuous input in the form of advice and anal-
yses from myriad National Academy reports, analyses by professional societies, and
national  and  international  workshops  and  conferences.  Our  Committees  of  Visitors
provide top-to-bottom reviews of existing programs and help formalize research pri-
orities within and across disciplines. Ultimately the priorities reflected in our budg-
et request are refined through consultations with the Deputy Director, the Assistant
Directors, the National Science Board, and the Office of Science and Technology Pol-
icy.  Finally,  they  are  negotiated  with  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  in  de-
veloping the President’s budget request to Congress.
This year’s budget request has four priority areas:

• Strengthening core disciplinary research;
• Providing  broadly  accessible  cyberinfrastructure  and  world-class  research  fa-
• Broadening participation in the science and engineering workforce; and
• Sustaining organizational excellence in NSF management practices.

cilities;

This  last  priority  leads  directly  into  the  next  question  raised  in  your  invitation
letter regarding our short and long-term budget and management challenges. Near-
ly  three  years  ago  NSF  initiated  an  independent  business  analysis  that  has  identi-
fied  a  number  of  important  management  challenges  in  the  areas  of  workforce  re-
quirements, information technology, and business practices.

It may help to give you some examples of NSF’s workload. In 1993 NSF had 1,205
full-time equivalent (FTE) employees and we processed 29,000 proposals. In the in-
tervening 12 years, our budget has doubled and the number of proposals we process
grew  by  more  than  50  percent.  But  our  FTEs  have  increased  by  only  5.7  percent.
To  put  it  another  way,  15,000  more  proposals  were  being  managed  with  69  addi-
tional people. We have managed this increased workload by relying on investments
in technology and other efficiency gains, but the need for additional people becomes
an overriding need at some point, and we have reached that point.

Last  year  the  more  than  44,000  proposals  submitted  to  NSF  received  approxi-
mately  250,000  reviews  by  outside  experts.  Yet  in  some  programs  the  success  rate
is 10 percent or less. So one of the management challenges we face is better calibra-
tion  of  our  solicitations  so  that  the  research  community  spends  less  time  writing
proposals  that  are  not  likely  to  get  funded.  We  expect  this  to  result  in  fewer  non-
competitive proposals and a more productive use of resources.

Another challenge we face is maintaining a healthy and vibrant science and engi-
neering  workforce.  To  do  so  means  encouraging  students  from  all  backgrounds  to
enter  into  science  and  engineering  careers.  We  are  protecting  effective  programs  at
NSF aimed at increasing the participation of women and under-represented minori-
ties in research fields, as well as programs to increase the number of science, engi-
neering  and  technology  baccalaureate  degrees,  and  our  prestigious  fellowship  sup-
port for the most talented U.S. graduate students.

An area that has received a great deal of attention in recent years is our support
of  large  research  facilities.  Our  budget  does  not  request  any  new  starts  for  major
research facilities, but we will continue construction and operation of projects under-
way.  While  new  starts  receive  a  great  deal  of  attention,  very  little  is  paid  to  re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

search  facilities  that  are  phased  out  at  the  end  of  their  useful  life.  Over  the  past
five years, for example, we have phased out or de-commissioned four ocean research
vessels,  two  aircraft,  and  two  accelerators.  These  decisions  were  based  on  the  sci-
entific  value  of  these  platforms  as  well  as  their  operation  and  maintenance  costs.
Indeed, the operation and maintenance costs are a key factor in the decision-making
process for approving new research facilities.

One of the most conspicuous aspects of our budget request is the change in fund-
ing  for  the  Education  and  Human  Resources  Directorate.  As  I  mentioned  earlier,
when we set priorities, we protected a number of programs in EHR from significant
reductions. After providing for high-priority areas, it is necessary to find offsets. As
you  know,  this  is  the  part  of  the  priority  setting  that  is  most  difficult.  However,  it
is important that we focus not only on the numbers, but look at the broader policies
as well.

For  example,  although  we  are  proposing  a  significant  reduction  in  the  Research,
Evaluations and Communication division, this is not a signal that we are no longer
committed to evaluation. Rather, we are committed to building evaluations into the
projects  we  fund,  rather  than  treating  it  as  a  separate  activity.  Already  we  have
used  this  approach  in  major  projects  to  great  advantage  and  we  expect  to  expand
this design throughout EHR.

NSF faces management challenges from a number of directions including, but cer-
tainly not limited to, those identified by the Inspector General. Earlier I mentioned
our  business  analysis.  We  undertook  this  as  a  proactive  measure  to  help  identify
workforce issues, business practices, and information technology needs that we are,
and  will  be,  confronting  in  the  future.  We  have  been  steadily  implementing  rec-
ommendations as they come forth and will continue to do so. In the year that I have
been at NSF I have been extremely impressed by the professionalism and dedication
that I have encountered. NSF employees, and I, take very seriously the need to earn
and maintain the taxpayers’ trust and preserve the agency’s reputation. A complete
list of agency actions in response to the management challenges is included in NSF’s
FY  2004  Performance  and  Accountability  Report,  and  would  be  pleased  to  include
a copy for the record.
FY 2006 Budget Request

Mr. Chairman, the Foundation’s FY 2006 budget Request reflects the Administra-
tion’s  confidence  in  our  continuing  with  this  mission.  In  light  of  the  tight  fiscal  cli-
mate,  NSF  fared  relatively  well.  For  the  coming  fiscal  year,  NSF  requests  $5.6  bil-
lion, an increase of $132 million, or 2.4 percent, over last year’s appropriated levels.
At  a  time  when  many  agencies  are  looking  at  budget  cuts,  an  increase  in  our
budget  underscores  the  Administration’s  support  of  NSF’s  science  and  engineering
programs, and reflects the agency’s excellent management and program results.

With  the  wealth  of  benefits  that  investments  in  science  and  engineering  bring  to
the  Nation,  perhaps  none  is  more  powerful  than  the  capability  to  respond  quickly
and  effectively  to  challenges  of  all  kinds.  NSF’s  programs  reach  over  2,000  institu-
tions  across  the  Nation,  and  they  involve  researchers,  teachers,  and  students  in  all
fields  of  science  and  engineering  and  at  all  levels  of  education.  They  also  keep  us
abreast  of  scientific  advances  throughout  the  world.  This  breadth  of  activity  in  and
of itself creates a vital national resource, as it provides the Nation with a constantly
invigorated  base  of  knowledge,  talent,  and  technology.  For  example,  in  areas  rang-
ing  from  terrorism  threats  to  natural  disasters,  NSF’s  ongoing  support  of  research
in  areas  such  as  advanced  information  technologies,  sensors,  and  earthquake  engi-
neering  ensures  a  broad  base  of  expertise  and  equipment  that  allows  the  science
and engineering community to respond quickly in times of need and in partnership
with scientists and engineers from other countries.

Four  funding  priorities  centering  this  year’s  request  are  designed  to  address  cur-
rent  national  challenges  and  strengthen  NSF’s  core  research  investments.  They  in-
clude:  (1)  Strengthening  core  disciplinary  research;  (2)  Providing  broadly  accessible
cyberinfrastructure  and  world-class  research  facilities;  (3)  Broadening  participation
in  the  science  and  engineering  workforce;  and  (4)  Sustaining  organizational  excel-
lence in NSF management practices.

This  year’s  investments  will  strengthen  the  core  disciplines  that  empower  every
step  of  the  process  from  discovery  at  the  frontier  to  the  development  of  products,
processes,  and  technologies  that  fuel  the  economy.  At  the  same  time,  NSF’s  invest-
ments  will  enable  increasing  connections  and  cross-fertilization  among  disciplines.
NSF’s  focus  on  a  clear  set  of  priorities  will  help  the  Nation  meet  new  challenges
and take advantage of promising opportunities, while at the same time spurring the
growth  and  prosperity  needed  to  secure  the  Nation’s  long-term  fiscal  balance.  The
FY  2006  budget  will  emphasize  investments  that  address  established  interagency
research  priorities,  meet  critical  needs  identified  by  the  science  and  engineering

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

community,  and  advance  the  fundamental  knowledge  that  strengthens  the  Nation’s
base of innovation and progress. NSF will respond to these challenges by supporting
the  best  people,  ideas,  and  tools  in  the  science  and  engineering  enterprise,  and  by
employing the best practices in organizational excellence.
Research and Related Activities Account

For FY 2006, total funding for NSF’s Research and Related Activities account in-
creases by $113 million—nearly three percent—to $4.33 billion. This increase large-
ly reflects NSF efforts to strengthen fundamental research in the core scientific dis-
ciplines  as  well  as  promote  emerging  areas  of  research.  The  FY  2006  portfolio  bal-
ances  research  in  established  disciplines  with  research  in  emerging  areas  of  oppor-
tunity  and  cross-disciplinary  projects.  The  most  fertile  opportunities  sometimes  lie
in novel approaches or a collaborative mix of disciplines.

Maintaining  a  strong  and  robust  core  is  critical  during  such  a  budget  climate  as
certain segments of the academic community rely heavily on NSF funding. In many
scientific  disciplines,  NSF  is  a  major  source  of  federal  funding  to  academic  institu-
tions, including mathematics (77 percent), computer sciences (86 percent), the social
sciences  (49  percent),  the  environmental  sciences  (50  percent),  engineering  (45  per-
cent) and the physical sciences (39 percent).

Research,  however,  is  only  part  of  the  NSF  equation.  Training  the  Nation’s  next
generation  of  scientists  and  engineers  is  another  key  component  of  NSF’s  mission,
and  critical  for  maintaining  economic  prosperity  and  global  competitiveness.  Here,
we  are  finding  ways  to  leverage  our  resources.  For  example,  as  we  strengthen  our
core disciplinary research programs, we will continue to encourage the types of part-
nerships  between  researchers  and  students  that  provide  hands-on  experience  while
ensuring  that  future  generations  gain  the  skills,  knowledge  and  insight  that  come
from working at the frontier of discovery.
Providing  Broadly  Accessible  Cyberinfrastructure  and  World-Class  Re-

search Facilities

Twenty-first  century  researchers  and  the  students  who  will  bring  new  skills  into
the workforce rely on cutting-edge tools. In FY 2006, NSF is placing a high priority
on investments in cyberinfrastructure and in unique, widely shared research equip-
ment and facilities.

An infrastructure of power grids, telephone systems, roads, bridges and rail lines
buttressed  this  nation’s  industrial  economy  and  allowed  it  to  prosper.  However,
cyberinfrastructure—a  networked  system  of  distributed  computer  information  and
communication  technology—is  the  lynchpin  of  today’s  knowledge-based  economy.  In
FY 2006, NSF cyberinfrastructure investments total $509 million, an increase of $36
million (7.6 percent) over the FY 2005 level.

Modeling,  simulation,  visualization,  data  storage  and  communication  are  rapidly
transforming  all  areas  of  research  and  education.  NSF 
in
cyberinfrastructure support a wide mix of projects and encourage participation from
broad  segments  of  the  research  community  that  rely  on  such  technology  as  they
tackle  increasingly  complex  scientific  questions.  Thanks  to  cyberinfrastructure  and
information systems, today’s scientific tool kit includes distributed systems of hard-
ware, software, databases and expertise that can be accessed in person or remotely.
In  fact,  programs  such  as  Teragrid,  a  multi-year  effort  to  create  the  world’s  largest
distributed  infrastructure  for  open  scientific  research,  are  specifically  designed  to
transcend geographic boundaries and accelerate virtual collaborations.

NSF  is  also  increasing  funding  for  the  Major  Research  Equipment  and  Facilities
Construction  by  $76  million  or  44  percent,  in  FY  2006  for  a  total  of  $250  million.
There  are  no  new  starts,  but  we  will  continue  to  fund  ongoing  projects.  Work  will
proceed  on  five  major  facilities  that  will  serve  a  spectrum  of  the  science  and  engi-
neering  community.  These  include  world-class  astronomy,  physics,  and  geosciences
observatories identified as the highest priorities for advancing science and engineer-
ing.

investments 

• The  Atacama  Large  Millimeter  Array  (ALMA),  in  Chile,  is  a  model  of  inter-
national collaboration. It will be the world’s largest, most sensitive radio tele-
scope.

• The  EarthScope  facility  is  a  multi-purpose  array  of  instruments  and  observ-
atories  that  will  greatly  expand  the  observational  capabilities  of  the  Earth
Sciences  and  permit  us  to  advance  our  understanding  of  the  structure,  evo-
lution and dynamics of the North American continent.

• Ice  Cube,  the  world’s  first  high-energy  neutrino  observatory,  will  be  located

under the ice at the South Pole.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

• RSVP,  the  Rare  Symmetry  Violating  Processes  Project,  will  enable  cutting
edge  physics  experiments  to  study  fundamental  properties  of  nature.  Studies
will probe questions ranging from the origins of our physical world to the na-
ture of dark matter.

• SODV, the Scientific Ocean Drilling Vessel, is a state-of-the-art ship that will
be  a  cornerstone  of  a  new  international  scientific  ocean-drilling  program.
Ocean  core  sediment  and  rock  collected  by  the  vessel  will  help  investigators
probe changes in the earth’s oceans and climate, and explore the planet’s geo-
logical history.

Additionally, In FY 2006, NSF will assume the responsibility, from the U.S. Coast
Guard, for funding the costs of ice-breakers that support scientific research in polar
regions; $48 million was transferred for those purposes.
Broadening Participation

To feed our knowledge-based economy, the Nation needs to capitalize on all of its
available  talent  to  produce  a  workforce  of  skilled  technologists,  scientists  and  engi-
neers.  That  means  developing  the  largely  untapped  potential  of  those  under-rep-
resented  in  the  science  and  engineering  workforce—minorities,  women  and  persons
with  disabilities.  It  also  means  supporting  science  education  and  training  in  all  re-
gions of the country—not just at large universities or in a handful of states.

To  achieve  these  goals,  the  FY  2006  Request  maintains  a  total  investment  of  al-
most $400 million. Funding will be targeted to programs with a proven track record
of progress in these areas. Included in this is $8 million in additional support from
the research directorates that will supplement the Education and Human Resources
Account  to  help  achieve  our  goal  of  broadening  science  and  engineering  participa-
tion.  Working  closely  with  the  directorates  offers  a  dual  benefit  of  providing  edu-
cational opportunities and hands-on research experience to prepare students for the
21st century workforce.

NSF will invest $396.5 million in a range of programs with proven track records.
Several  highly  successful  programs  for  broadening  participation—the  Louis  Stokes
Alliances  for  Minority  Participation,  the  Alliances  for  Graduate  Education  and  the
Professoriate,  the  Centers  for  Research  Excellence  in  Science  and  Technology
(CREST), Robert Noyce Scholarship program, STEM Talent Expansion Program and
EPSCoR—just  to  name  a  few,  are  secured  in  this  request.  Each  of  these  serve  as
models  for  integrating  educational  and  research  resources  to  improve  recruitment
and retention in science and engineering to all sectors of our diverse population.
Sustaining Organizational Excellence in NSF Management Practices

NSF  directly  supports  over  210,000  scientists,  educators  and  students  and  proc-
esses  over  40,000  proposals  a  year.  Balancing  the  needs  of  a  growing,  increasingly
complex portfolio with new requirements for e-business practices, security, account-
ability,  and  award  oversight  presents  a  challenge.  NSF  sets  high  standards  for  its
business  practices  and  strives  to  create  an  agile,  innovative  organization  through
state-of-the-art business conduct and continual review. In order to meet these man-
agement goals, NSF will be increasing funding for activities that advance organiza-
tional  excellence  by  $46  million,  to  a  total  of  $336  million.  In  addition  to  critically
needed  upgrades  to  our  information  technology  infrastructure,  this  increase  will
allow  for  the  recruitment  of  25  full-time  employees—23  for  NSF  and  one  each  for
the National Science Board and the Office of the Inspector General—which will im-
prove our ability to manage our increasingly complex portfolio.

Expanding  our  e-government  systems  and  the  implementing  of  our  ongoing  busi-

ness analysis recommendations are high priorities for FY 2006.

Over the past two years, as part of the Administrations Program Assessment Rat-
ing Tool, NSF has worked with OMB to rate eight of our investment categories. All
of these areas have received the highest rating of Effective. As such, NSF programs
fall within the top 15 percent of 600 government programs evaluated to date.
Crosscutting Activities

Beyond our budget priorities lie dozens of programs and initiatives that cut across
NSF  directorates  and  enrich  the  overall  science  and  research  enterprise.  NSF  sets
priorities  based  on  a  continual  dialogue  and  exchange  of  ideas  with  the  research
community,  NSF  management  and  staff  and  the  National  Science  Board.  Programs
are initiated based on several criteria: intellectual merit, broader impacts of the re-
search, balance across disciplines and synergy with research in other agencies. The
Committee  of  Visitors  process  ensures  a  continuous  evaluation  of  our  merit  review
process  and  feedback  on  how  NSF  programs  are  performing.  In  FY  2006,  NSF  will
emphasize four crosscutting areas.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

Crosscutting  areas  of  emerging  opportunity:  Over  several  years,  NSF  has  funded
exceptionally promising interdisciplinary efforts aimed at advancing our knowledge,
addressing  national  needs,  and  probing  the  grand  challenges  of  science.  The  FY
2006 request maintains or increases FY 2005 levels of funding for the following pri-
ority  areas:  $84  million  for  Biocomplexity  in  the  Environment,  $243  million  for
Nanoscale  Science  and  Engineering,  $89  million  for  the  Mathematical  Sciences  Pri-
ority Area and $39 million for Human and Social Dynamics.

International  Collaborations:  Science  and  engineering  research  are  increasingly
global  endeavors.  International  partnerships  are  critical  to  the  United  States  in
maintaining a competitive edge, capitalizing on global opportunities, and addressing
global  problems.  The  Office  of  International  Science  and  Engineering’s  recent  move
to the director’s office, and the budget request reflects this important trend. The FY
2006 budget provides $35 million for NSF’s Office of International Science and Engi-
neering.

The  recent  Indian  Ocean  Tsunami  disaster  represents  the  finest  in  international
cooperation—and  clearly  demonstrates  an  international  desire  to  develop  scientific
methods  for  natural  disaster  prediction  and  ways  to  reduce  losses  when  such  cata-
strophic  events  do  inevitably  occur.  A  network  of  more  than  128  sensors—which
NSF  has  a  20-year  investment  in—recorded  shock  waves  from  the  recent  earth-
quake as they traveled around the Earth. This network is the primary international
source of data for earthquake location and tsunami warning and its data forged the
critical  core  of  the  early  knowledge  of  this  event.  Within  days  of  the  disaster  NSF
research  teams  deployed  to  the  region  to  gather  critical  data  before  it  was  lost  to
nature  and  reconstruction.  Their  work  will  help  scientists  and  engineers  better  un-
derstand  the  warning  signs  of  natural  disasters,  the  design  of  safer  coastal  struc-
tures,  the  development  of  early  warning  and  response  systems,  and  effective  steps
for disaster recovery.

Interagency  Initiatives:  NSF  will  continue  to  play  a  lead  role  in  interagency  col-
laborations to address national needs and take advantage of economic growth oppor-
tunities. In FY 2006, NSF investments in the National Nanotechnology Initiative in-
crease  by  $6  million  over  FY  2005  levels  to  total  $344  million.  NSF  participation
in the Networking Information Technology Research and Development initiative will
increase  to  $803  million—$8  million  over  the  FY  2005  level.  The  NSF  contribution
to the Climate Change Science Program decreases slightly to $197 million.

Homeland Security Activities: The FY 2006 Request includes a $2 million increase
for  government-wide  efforts  in  homeland  security  research  and  development.  This
$344  million  investment  will  strengthen  NSF’s  commitment  to  cyber  security  by
supporting  innovations  to  secure  today’s  computer  and  networking  systems,  embed
cyber  security  into  future  systems  and  preparing  tomorrow’s  workforce  with  state-
of-the-art security skills.
Conclusion

Mr.  Chairman,  I’ve  only  touched  upon  the  variety  and  richness  of  the  NSF  port-
folio.  NSF  research  and  education  efforts  contribute  greatly  to  the  Nation’s  innova-
tion economy and help keep America at the forefront of science and engineering. At
the  same  time,  NSF  supported  researchers  produce  leading  edge  discoveries  that
serve society and spark the public’s curiosity and interest. Extraordinary discoveries
coming  from  dozens  of  NSF  programs  and  initiatives  are  enriching  the  entire
science and engineering enterprise, and making education fun, exciting and achieve-
ment-oriented.  In  fact,  just  this  month,  two  of  the  most  widely-read  and  e-mailed
stories  from  the  national  press  were  the  discoveries  of  NSF-supported  researchers.
In  one,  scientists  using  new  bio-bar-code  technology  created  a  detection  method
for  a  protein  implicated  in  Alzheimer’s  disease.  It’s  the  first  test  designed  for  use
in  living  patients  and  holds  promise  for  diagnosing  Alzheimer’s  at  an  early  stage.
In  the  second  development,  scientists  generated  an  entirely  new  classification  sys-
tem  for  the  brains  of  birds  based  on  recent  studies  showing  that  birds  are  much
closer  in  cognitive  ability  to  mammals  than  previously  thought.  The  new  scheme
will affect thousands of scientists, and help merge research efforts on both birds and
mammal.  These  two  examples,  fresh  off  the  press,  illustrate  NSF’s  motto  ‘‘Where
Discoveries Begin.’’

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee, I hope that this brief overview
conveys to you the extent of NSF’s commitment to advancing science and technology
in the national interest. I am very appreciative of the Subcommittee’s long-standing
bipartisan support for NSF. I look forward to working with you and your colleagues
in continuing the close and productive relationship that NSF has had with Congress
over the past 55 years.

I would be happy to respond to any questions that you have.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

BIOGRAPHY FOR ARDEN L. BEMENT, JR.

Arden L. Bement, Jr., became Director of the National Science Foundation on No-

vember 24, 2004. He had been Acting Director since February 22, 2004.

He  joined  NSF  from  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology,  where
he had been director since Dec. 7, 2001. Prior to his appointment as NIST director,
Bement served as the David A. Ross Distinguished Professor of Nuclear Engineering
and  Head  of  the  School  of  Nuclear  Engineering  at  Purdue  University.  He  has  held
appointments at Purdue University in the schools of Nuclear Engineering, Materials
Engineering,  and  Electrical  and  Computer  Engineering,  as  well  as  a  courtesy  ap-
pointment in the Krannert School of Management. He was Director of the Midwest
Superconductivity  Consortium  and  the  Consortium  for  the  Intelligent  Management
of the Electrical Power Grid.

Bement  served  as  a  member  of  the  U.S.  National  Science  Board  from  1989  to
1995.  The  board  guides  NSF  activities  and  also  serves  as  a  policy  advisory  body  to
the President and Congress. As NSF director, Bement will now serve as an ex officio
member of the NSB.

He  also  chaired  the  Commission  for  Engineering  and  Technical  Studies  and  the
National Materials Advisory Board of the National Research Council; was a member
of  the  Space  Station  Utilization  Advisory  Subcommittee  and  the  Commercialization
and  Technology  Advisory  Committee  for  NASA;  and  consulted  for  the  Department
of  Energy’s  Argonne  National  Laboratory  and  the  Idaho  National  Engineering  and
Environmental Laboratory.

Bement joined the Purdue faculty in 1992 after a 39-year career in industry, gov-
ernment,  and  academia.  These  positions  included:  Vice  President  of  Technical  Re-
sources  and  of  Science  and  Technology  for  TRW  Inc.  (1980–1992);  Deputy  Under
Secretary  of  Defense  for  Research  and  Engineering  (1979–1980);  Director,  Office  of
Materials Science, DARPA (1976–1979); Professor of Nuclear Materials, MIT (1970–
1976); Manager, Fuels and Materials Department and the Metallurgy Research De-
partment,  Battelle  Northwest  Laboratories  (1965–1970);  and  Senior  Research  Asso-
ciate, General Electric Co. (1954–1965).

He  has  been  a  director  of  Keithley  Instruments  Inc.  and  the  Lord  Corp.  and  was
a member of the Science and Technology Advisory Committee for the Howmet Corp.
(a division of ALCOA).

Bement  holds  an  Engineer  of  Metallurgy  degree  from  the  Colorado  School  of
Mines, a Master’s degree in Metallurgical Engineering from the University of Idaho,
a doctorate degree in metallurgical engineering from the University of Michigan, an
honorary  doctorate  degree  in  engineering  from  Cleveland  State  University,  and  an
honorary  doctorate  degree  in  science  from  Case  Western  Reserve  University.  He  is
a member of the U.S. National Academy of Engineering.
Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Dr. Bement.
Dr. Wrighton.
STATEMENT OF DR. MARK S. WRIGHTON, CHAIRMAN, AUDIT
AND OVERSIGHT COMMITTEE, NATIONAL SCIENCE BOARD
Dr.  WRIGHTON.  Chairman  Inglis,  Congresswoman  Hooley,  and
Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  appreciate  the  chance  to  be  here
this morning. I am Mark Wrighton, Chancellor of Washington Uni-
versity  in  St.  Louis.  My  testimony  today  is  in  my  capacity,  how-
ever,  as  a  member  of  the  National  Science  Board  and  chair  of  the
Audit and Oversight Committee.

As  Chairman  of  the  National  Science  Board,  Dr.  Warren  Wash-
ington  regrets  that  he  is  unable  to  be  here  to  give  this  testimony.
However,  he  did  ask  me  to  say  that  on  behalf  of  the  entire  Board
and  the  widespread  and  diverse  research  and  education  commu-
nities  that  we  serve,  that  he  thanks  the  House  for  its  long-term
commitment  to  a  broad  portfolio  of  investments  in  science,  engi-
neering, mathematics, and technology research and education.

The  Congress  established  the  National  Science  Board  in  1950
and gave it two key responsibilities: number one, to oversee the ac-
tivities  of  and  establish  policies  for  the  National  Science  Founda-
tion;  and  number  two,  to  serve  as  an  independent  national  science

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

policy  body  to  render  advice  to  the  President  and  to  Congress  on
policy  issues  related  to  science  and  engineering  research  and  edu-
cation.

During our recent Board retreat in February, Board members re-
affirmed  their  strong  commitment  to  fulfilling  these  responsibil-
ities.  Board  members,  including  the  NSF  Director,  also  discussed
the  important  role  of  the  Board  in  establishing  a  vision  in  setting
priorities for the Foundation. Approving the annual NSF budget is
one way for the Board to contribute to the setting of priorities.

I  would  like  to  provide  some  general  comments  regarding  the
NSF  fiscal  year  2006  budget  and  then  briefly  update  you  on  the
National  Science  Board  activities  over  the  last  year  and  discuss
some  of  the  priorities  for  the  coming  year.  The  written  testimony
that  has  been  provided  provides  more  detail  on  the  following
points.

First, on the 2006 budget, the Board has reviewed and approved
the  NSF  2006  budget  request  that  was  submitted  to  the  OMB  in
September of 2004, and, broadly, we support the President’s budget
request.

Given  the  overall  cut  to  non-defense  domestic  discretionary
spending,  the  Board  appreciates  that  the  President’s  budget  re-
quest  recognizes  the  importance  of  returning  NSF  to  positive
growth. We are also certain that the Members of this subcommittee
fully understand the unique and long-term value of NSF programs
to  important  national  priorities;  these  being  to  ensure  the  future
economic health of our nation, maintain the United States’ pre-emi-
nence  in  discovery  and  innovation,  and  provide  valuable  contribu-
tions to homeland security efforts.

The  Board  fully  supports  the  fiscal  year  2006  NSF  budget  focus
on the four funding priorities that Dr. Bement has indicated. These
address  the  current  national  challenges  as  well  as  making  NSF’s
core portfolio of research investment stronger. We recognize that a
budget  request  of  $5.6  billion,  representing  a  2.4  percent  increase
over  NSF’s  fiscal  year  2005  budget,  is  a  significant  investment  in
NSF  programs  in  these  difficult  times.  However,  we,  and  others,
have  noted  that  this  request  remains  below  the  level  of  the  2004
NSF operating budget.

Should  additional  funds  beyond  the  Administration’s  request  be
made  available  to  NSF  in  2006,  the  National  Science  Board  rec-
ommends the following: that we support a strong and growing role
for  the  NSF  in  the  Nation’s  investment  in  science  and  engineering
education.  There  is  no  greater—no  more  valuable  investment  than
in preparing young men and women to enter careers in science and
engineering. We should also address the backlog of Board-approved
and prioritized Major Research Equipment and Facilities Construc-
tion  projects,  the  so-called  MREFC  projects.  Further,  we  should
provide support for addressing the financial burden the Foundation
will  encounter  related  to  the  transfer  of  the  icebreaker-ships  from
the  Coast  Guard  to  the  National  Science  Foundation,  in  terms  of
financial responsibility.

Let  me  give  you  a  brief  overview  of  some  of  the  NSB  activities

during the past year.

We  have  developed  and  implemented  a  process  for  the  annual
Board  re-prioritization  of  all  approved  but  not  yet  funded  MREFC

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

projects.  We  have  provisionally  approved  the  report  Setting  Prior-
ities for Large Research Facility Projects Supported by the National
Science Foundation. We are also seeking comments from hundreds
of  individuals  and  organizations  that  would  be  expected  to  use
these facilities. We expect Board approval and full implementation
of the revised process by the fall of 2005.

The  Board  examined  our  policies  and  positions  relevant  to  the
NAPA report recommendations concerning the Board’s implementa-
tion  of  the  Sunshine  Act,  the  use  of  IPA  and  rotator-type  employ-
ees,  the  appointment  and  reporting  process  of  the  NSF  Inspector
General, and the role of the Board in oversight and in setting poli-
cies for the National Science Foundation.

There  are  a  number  of  other  important  activities  that  the  Board
engages  in.  We  are  currently  examining  issues  raised  by  the  fiscal
year  2004  financial  statement  audit  and  the  NSF  Office  of  Inspec-
tor  General  on  NSF  procedures  for  post-award  administration  of
grants  and  contracts.  The  Board  feels  strongly  that  the  reportable
conditions  surrounding  post-award  grant  monitoring  must  be  dealt
with  by  NSF  management  in  a  timely  manner.  It  is  my  under-
standing  that  NSF  management  has  developed  a  draft  corrective
action  plan  and  is  currently  discussing  it  with  the  Inspector  Gen-
eral.  I  would  expect  that  both  the  IG  and  the  NSF  management
will provide the Board’s Audit and Oversight Committee an update
at our meeting later this month.

While much can and will be done to address these issues in 2005,
the Board is also cognizant that to fully implement the auditor rec-
ommendations  for  corrective  action—with  which  the  Board  con-
curs—that an appropriate level of future funding must be provided
to support the administrative effort within the Foundation.

We  appreciate  very  much  the  budget  extended  to  the  National
Science  Board,  approximately  $4  million.  In  the  coming  year,  the
Board will expand its ongoing examinations of its role and respon-
sibilities  as  it  implements  the  new  protocol  for  the  process  by
which  MREFC  proposals  are  developed,  prioritized,  and  funded;
NSF  policies  for  long-lived  data  collections,  policies  regarding  the
identification,  development,  and  funding  of  transformative  re-
search; and policies to ensure an adequate and diverse science and
engineering workforce for the future.

Let me thank this committee for its role in enhancing the invest-
ment that will bring great strength to America in the future. There
is no better investment that you can place than in science and en-
gineering education and research.

Thank you very much.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Wrighton follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARK S. WRIGHTON

Chairman  Inglis,  Congresswoman  Hooley  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I
appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you.  I  am  Mark  Wrighton,  Chancellor,
Washington University, Saint Louis, Missouri. My testimony today is in my capacity
as Member of the National Science Board and Chairman of its Committee on Audit
and Oversight.

The  Chairman  of  the  National  Science  Board,  Dr.  Warren  Washington,  regrets
that  he  is  unable  to  provide  this  testimony  to  you  today.  However,  he  did  ask  me
to  say  that—on  behalf  of  the  Board  and  the  widespread  and  diverse  research  and
education  communities  that  we  all  serve—he  thanks  the  House  for  its  long-term

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

commitment  to  a  broad  portfolio  of  investments  in  science,  engineering,  mathe-
matics, and technology research and education.

The  Congress  established  the  National  Science  Board  in  1950  and  gave  it  dual

responsibilities:

Foundation (the Foundation, NSF); and

• oversee  the  activities  of,  and  establish  the  policies  for,  the  National  Science
• serve  as  an  independent  national  science  policy  body  to  render  advice  to  the
President  and  the  Congress  on  policy  issues  related  to  science  and  engineer-
ing research and education.

During  our  recent  Retreat,  Board  Members  reaffirmed  their  strong  commitment
to fulfilling these responsibilities. Board Members, including the NSF Director, also
discussed the important role of the Board in establishing a vision and setting prior-
ities for the Foundation. Approving the annual NSF budget is one way for the Board
to set priorities.

I would like to provide some general comments regarding the NSF FY 2006 budg-
et  request,  then  update  you  on  National  Science  Board  activities  over  the  last  year
and some of our priorities for the coming year.
FY 2006 NSF BUDGET REQUEST

The  National  Science  Board  has  reviewed  and  approved  NSF’s  FY  2006  budget
request that was submitted to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) in Sep-
tember  2004,  and  we  generally  support  the  President’s  budget  request  before  you
today.  Given  the  overall  cut  to  non-defense  domestic  discretionary  spending,  the
Board  respects  and  appreciates  that  the  President’s  budget  request  recognizes  the
importance  of  returning  NSF  to  positive  growth.  We  are  cognizant  of  the  current
federal fiscal constraints that our nation faces and that there are many worthy com-
peting interests for a limited resource. However, we are also certain that the mem-
bers  of  this  House  Authorization  Subcommittee  fully  understand  the  unique  and
long-term value of NSF programs in science and engineering research and education
to ensuring the future economic health of our nation, maintaining U.S. preeminence
in discovery and innovation, and providing valuable contributions to homeland secu-
rity efforts.

The Board fully supports the FY 2006 NSF budget focus on the four funding prior-
ities that address current national challenges as well as strengthening the core port-
folio’s  of  NSF’s  research  investment.  We  also  recognize  that  a  budget  request  of
$5.605  billion,  representing  a  2.4  percent  increase  over  NSF’s  FY  2005  budget,  is
a  significant  investment  in  NSF  programs  in  a  time  of  National  fiscal  austerity.
Nevertheless, it is incumbent on the Board to note that this request remains below
the level of the 2004 NSF operating budget.

Should  additional  funds,  beyond  the  Administration’s  request,  be  made  available
to  NSF  in  FY  2006,  the  National  Science  Board  would  recommend  support  for  a
strong and growing role for the NSF in the Nation’s investment in science and engi-
neering  (S&E)  education,  addressing  the  backlog  of  Board  approved  and  prioritized
Major  Research  Equipment  and  Facilities  Construction  (MREFC)  projects,  and  ad-
dressing  the  financial  burden  to  the  Foundation  related  to  the  transfer  of  financial
responsibility for ice-breaker ships from the Coast Guard to the NSF.

Adequate preparation of future participants in the U.S. workforce, at all levels of
education, will require increasing mathematics and science understanding and skills
if the U.S. is to sustain global preeminence in S&T. The Board has underscored its
concern about the poor performance of U.S. citizens in essential knowledge and skill
areas  in  science,  technology,  engineering,  and  mathematics  (STEM)  fields,  in  com-
parison  with  other  high  technology  countries.  It  is  impossible  to  conclude  that
growth in our National capabilities can occur without continual enhancement of the
skills  of  our  workforce.  We  have  relied  too  heavily  on  attracting  international  stu-
dents  and  professionals  to  meet  our  workforce  needs,  and,  as  a  result,  we  need  to
do a better job of preparing U.S. students for joining the S&E workforce. Other na-
tions  are  competing  with  the  U.S.  for  the  best  international  students  and  most  ac-
complished  S&E  professionals.  We  must  recognize  the  critical  challenge  our  Nation
now  faces  in  sustaining  a  U.S.  science  and  technology  (S&T)  workforce  that  will  be
competitive over the long-term in an increasingly global and competitive S&T envi-
ronment.

The Board fully supports the proposed FY 2006 funding for MREFC projects, and
appreciates the significant increase in funding for this budget category. Members of
the  House  Authorization  Subcommittee  are  aware  of  the  exciting  opportunities  at
the  frontiers  of  knowledge  that  we  are  unable  to  pursue  without  the  cutting  edge
facilities  that  are  funded  under  this  account.  While  funding  for  ongoing  MREFC
projects  is  the  highest  priority  for  the  Board,  the  lack  of  any  new  project  starts  in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

FY  2006  will  increase  the  concern  of  the  science  community  that  the  U.S.  is  losing
its  ability  to  sustain  cutting  edge  S&E  research.  Should  additional  funding  for
MREFC  projects  be  available,  the  Board  recommends,  in  priority  order,  support  for
Ocean Observatories and the Alaska Regional Research Vessel.

The third area for which the Board would recommend any additional NSF funding
be allocated is appropriate support for the costs that NSF will incur with the trans-
fer of financial responsibility for ice-breaking activities previously supported by U.S.
Coast Guard. The Administration’s FY 2006 NSF budget request allocated $43 mil-
lion.  The  Board  is  very  concerned  that  the  true  costs  to  NSF  for  these  new  respon-
sibilities  will  be  greatly  more  that  $43  million  and  will,  therefore,  drain  resources
from  NSF  research  and  related  activities.  We  understand  that  a  new  NSF-Coast
Guard Joint Working Group is discussing various options for dealing with this issue.
In  addition,  we  understand  that  the  National  Academies  Polar  Research  Board  is
studying  this  issue  and  expects  to  provide  an  interim  report  in  September  2005.
When these two groups have completed their discussions and assessments, we urge
Congress to factor their conclusions into any final budget decisions and provide ade-
quate funding to fully support this new NSF responsibility.

Again, the NSB supports the integrated portfolio of investments in S&E research
and  education  represented  in  the  NSF  FY  2006  budget  proposal.  It  thoughtfully
blends support for the core disciplines with encouragement for interdisciplinary ini-
tiatives,  brings  together  people  from  diverse  and  complementary  backgrounds,  pro-
vides  infrastructure  for  research  and  STEM  education,  and  strengthens  the  NSF’s
management of the enterprise.

Further, in this time of National emergency, this budget for NSF continues to fos-
ter  S&T  that  enhances  our  homeland  security.  NSF  activities  in  this  area  include
Critical  Infrastructure  Protection,  Research  to  Combat  Bioterrorism,  Cybercorps/
Scholarships  for  Service,  Counterterrorism,  and  Physical/Information  Technology
Security. Of course, by enabling future discovery and innovation, NSF supports our
nation’s long-term prosperity and economy security.
OVERVIEW OF NSB ACTIVITIES DURING THE LAST YEAR

During  the  last  calendar  year,  even  while  going  through  a  continuing  evolution
in  terms  of  its  operation,  the  Board  has  accomplished  a  great  deal  in  terms  of  our
mission to provide oversight and policy direction to the Foundation.

I  would  like  to  briefly  highlight  some  of  these  accomplishments,  but  will  not  at-

tempt to discuss them all here.

In terms of providing oversight for the Foundation, the Board has:

• reviewed  and  endorsed  the  Office  of  Inspector  General  Semi-annual  Reports

to Congress, and approved NSF management responses;

• approved the NSF FY 2006 budget request for transmittal to OMB;
• reviewed the Foundation’s report on its merit review system;
• provided  review  and  decisions  on  nine  major  awards  or  proposal  funding  re-

quests;

• developed  and  implemented  a  Board  process  for  re-prioritization  of  all  Board

approved, but not yet funded, MREFC projects; and

• provisionally  approved  the  report  Setting  Priorities  for  Large  Research  Facil-
ity Projects Supported by the National Science Foundation (NSB/CPP–04–20).
The Board and Foundation are implementing the principles of the revised process
described  in  this  provisionally  approved  document  for  the  FY  2006  budget.  At  the
same time, the Board Office has implemented an extensive outreach effort to invite
comments from nearly 400 individuals and organizations that would be expected to
have  particular  interest  in  large  facilities.  We  expect  final  revisions  based  on  this
additional  review  and  input,  Board  approval  of  all  revised  procedures  and  policies,
and full implementation of the revised process in the Fall, 2005.

With respect to providing policy direction to the Foundation, the Board has:

• approved  a  report  on  Broadening  Participation  in  Science  and  Engineering
Faculty (NSB 04–41) that addresses the need to increase the diversity of this
component  of  the  S&E  workforce  to  more  nearly  reflect  the  diversity  of  the
student body it serves, and

• approved  elimination  of  agency  requirements  for  cost  sharing,  beginning  this
year  (2005),  while  retaining  the  one  percent  statutory  cost-sharing  require-
ment.

In terms of advice to the President and the Congress, the Board has:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

• published  and  distributed  widely  Science  and  Engineering  Indicators  2004,
the  16th  volume  of  this  statutory,  biennial  series  and  initiated  the  Science
and Engineering Indicators 2006 report;
• published  a  policy  statement  accompanying  Indicators  2004,  An  Emerging
and  Critical  Problem  of  the  Science  and  Engineering  Labor  Force  (NSB  04–
07),  which  draws  attention  to  the  disturbing  long-term  trends  in  U.S.  edu-
cation  and  the  globalization  of  S&T  that,  if  ignored,  may  result  in  a  loss  of
U.S. leadership in innovation and high technology;
• approved the draft report on Long Lived Data Collections: Enabling Research
• reported  to  the  Congress  on  Delegation  of  Authority  in  accordance  with  Sec-
• responded to four specific IPA-related questions that NSB’s Executive Officer
received  from  the  House  Appropriations  Subcommittee  for  VA,  HUD,  and
Independent Agencies;
• published  and  disseminated  Fulfilling  the  Promise:  A  Report  to  Congress  on
the  Budgetary  and  Programmatic  Expansion  of  the  National  Science  Founda-
tion (NSB–03–151);

and Education in the 21st Century (NSB/CPP–04–21);

tion 14 of the NSF Act of 2002;

NSF and S&E issues;

• provided testimony to congressional hearings;
• interacted  with  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  (OSTP)  and  OMB  on
• provided briefings and presentations to the Congress and other policy organi-
• responded  to  specific  questions  and  inquiries  from  Senators  and  Representa-

zations concerning the Board’s reports and statements; and

tives.

In an effort to facilitate more openness of Board meetings in accord with the Sun-

shine Act, we expanded our practices for:

ister, and the NSB website;

• providing public notice of all our meetings in press releases, the Federal Reg-
• treating teleconferences of committees as open meetings;
• providing  much  more  information  to  the  public  in  a  more  timely  manner  re-
• encouraging public comment during the development of Board publications.

garding meeting discussions and decisions; and

Also, this past year the Board:

• examined  our  policies  and  positions  relevant  to  the  recommendations  of  the
National Academy of Public Administration report concerning the Board’s im-
plementation  of  the  Sunshine  Act,  the  use  of  Intergovernmental  Personnel
Act (IPA) employees and other rotators at NSF, the oversight of the NSF In-
spector  General,  and  the  role  of  the  National  Science  Board  in  oversight  and
setting policies for NSF;
• began  implementing  recommendations  of  the  Office  of  Inspector  General  to
continue  enhancing  our  procedures  and  policies  related  to  compliance  with
the Sunshine Act; and
• significantly  increased  and  improved  our  direct  outreach  and  communication
with  OMB,  OSTP,  Congress,  other  federal  agencies,  various  interest  groups
and the outside S&E research and education community.

To that end, the Board Office is contracting to develop monitoring and evaluation
tools, to expand outreach, and measure the impacts of NSB statements, resolutions
and  reports;  and  to  redesign  the  NSB  website  for  greater  accessibility  and  utility
to the public.

• One thematic area of significant accomplishment was transformative or ‘‘high
risk’’ research where the Board organized a Workshop on Identifying, Review-
ing,  and  Funding  Transformative  Research  and  established  within  the  Com-
mittee on Programs and Plans a Task Force on Transformative Research.
• Another thematic area of accomplishment this year was long-lived data collec-
tions  where  the  NSB  established  within  the  Committee  on  Programs  and
Plans a Task Force on Long-Lived Data Collections; and prepared a draft re-
port,  Long-Lived  Date  Collections:  Enabling  Research  and  Education  in  the
21st Century (NSB/CPP–04–21).
• The  year  2004  also  saw  the  Board’s  examination  of  NSF  issues  related  to
broadening participation in S&E; as well as efforts toward obtaining industry

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

perspectives on workforce issues. The Board has also continued its recognition
of  outstanding  science,  engineering  and  science  education  accomplishments
through  the  Vannevar  Bush  Award,  Alan  T.  Waterman  Award,  and  Public
Service Awards.

FY 2006 NSB BUDGET

The  Administration’s  FY  2006  Budget  Request  of  $4.0  million  for  the  NSB  will
be adequate to support Board operations and activities during FY 2006. The request
seeks  resources  to  carry  out  the  Board’s  statutory  authority  and  to  strengthen  its
oversight  responsibilities  for  the  Foundation.  We  expect  that  the  Foundation  will
continue  to  provide  accounting,  logistical  and  other  necessary  resources  in  support
of  the  NSB  and  its  missions,  including  expert  senior  S&E  staff  serving  as  a  cadre
of executive secretaries to Board committees and task forces.

At the urging of Congress, in FY 2003 the Board began examining options for aug-
menting its professional staffing levels. At its May 2003 meeting, the Board decided
to  begin  a  process  to  assess  the  feasibility  of  recruiting  for  positions  that  would
broaden its policy support, provide additional legal advice, and enhance the Board’s
capabilities  in  advanced  information  technology.  The  Board  Office  has  continued  to
implement the staff enhancement plan, adding four positions this fiscal year for sup-
port  staff,  including  information  technology  staff,  science  assistants,  national
awards assistant, and filling the vacancy for an editor/writer. The Board Office will
be  recruiting  two  senior  professionals  to  provide  policy  and  legal  support  to  the
Board  this  year.  The  Board  is  very  pleased  with  the  progress  of  the  staff  enhance-
ment process.

The  NSB  Office  staff  provides  the  independent  resources  and  capabilities  for  co-
ordinating and implementing S&E policy analyses and development. It also provides
operational  support  essential  for  the  Board  to  fulfill  its  mission.  By  statute,  the
Board  is  authorized  five  professional  positions  and  other  clerical  staff  as  necessary.
In  consultation  with  the  Congress,  the  Board  has  defined  these  professional  posi-
tions  as  NSB  senior  S&E  policy  staff,  and  the  clerical  and  technical  positions  as
NSB  staff  that  support  Board  operations  and  related  activities.  The  full  impact  of
increasing  the  number  of  professional  positions  closer  to  the  statutory  level  is  ex-
pected  to  occur  in  FY  2005,  emphasizing  a  broadening  of  professional  skills  to  sup-
port the Board.

In addition to the NSB Office’s essential and independent resources and capabili-
ties,  external  advisory  and  other  services  are  especially  critical  to  support  produc-
tion of NSB reports, and supplement the NSB staff’s general research and adminis-
tration services to the Board. These external services provide the Board and its Of-
fice with the flexibility to respond independently, accurately and quickly to requests
from  Congress  and  the  President,  and  to  address  issues  raised  by  the  Board  itself.
In  FY  2006,  the  Board  will  expand  its  ongoing  examinations  of  its  role  and  re-
sponsibilities regarding the NSF’s MREFC programs as it finalizes the development
and  implementation  of  a  new  protocol  for  the  process  by  which  major  research
equipment and facilities proposals are developed, prioritized, and funded; NSF poli-
cies for Long-lived Data Collections; NSF policies regarding the identification, devel-
opment  and  funding  of  transformative  ‘‘high  risk’’  research;  and  policies  to  ensure
an adequate and diverse S&E workforce for the future. These special activities are,
of course, in addition to NSB’s normal oversight of the Foundation.

For example, through the Board’s Audit and Oversight Committee, which I chair,
we are currently examining issues raised by the FY 2004 Financial Statement Audit
and the NSF Office of Inspector General on NSF procedures for post-award adminis-
tration  of  grants  and  contracts.  The  Board  feels  strongly  that  the  reportable  condi-
tions surrounding post-award grant monitoring must be dealt with by NSF Manage-
ment  in  a  timely  manner.  NSF  has  assured  the  Board  that  corrective  actions  will
be taken. It is my understanding that NSF Management has developed a draft cor-
rective  action  plan  and  is  currently  discussing  it  with  the  IG.  NSF  has  been  re-
quested  to  provide  updates  to  the  Board  on  progress  in  addressing  this  issue.  I
would expect that both the IG and NSF Management will provide the Board’s A&O
Committee with an update at our March meeting. While much can and will be done
to  address  these  issue  in  FY  2005,  the  Board  is  also  cognizant  that  to  fully  imple-
ment the auditor recommendations for corrective action, with which the Board con-
curs, appropriate level of future funding must be provided.

At  the  request  of  Congress,  and  consistent  with  Board  discussions  during  our  re-
cent Retreat, the Board will undertake the development and establish a new vision
for  the  Foundation  for  the  21st  Century.  This  visionary  document  will  also  include
overarching  goals  with  both  long-  and  short-term  priorities  that  take  into  account
federal fiscal realities. We expect to work closely with the NSF Director and finalize
this effort by the end of 2005.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

At  the  request  of  Congress,  the  Board  will  also  conduct  an  examination  of  the
NSF Merit Review System and report our initial findings before the end of this fis-
cal year.

The  Board  will  continue  to  review  and  approve  NSF’s  actions  for  creating  major
NSF programs and funding large projects. Special attention will be paid to impacts
of budget constraints on the S&T workforce, broadening participation in higher edu-
cation, national S&T infrastructure, and the size and duration of NSF grants.

Effective  communications  and  interactions  with  our  constituencies  contribute  to
the Board’s work of identifying priority S&T policy issues, and developing policy ad-
vice  and  recommendations  to  the  President  and  Congress.  To  this  end,  the  Board
will  increase  communication  and  outreach  with  the  university,  industry  and  the
broader  S&E  research  and  education  community,  Congress,  Federal  S&T  agencies,
and the public. These activities will support U.S. global leadership in discovery and
innovation  based  on  a  continually  expanding  and  evolving  S&T  enterprise  in  this
country,  and  will  insure  a  principal  role  for  NSF  programs  in  providing  a  critical
foundation for S&E research and education.

With our eight new Board Members, new openness, and new modes of operations,
the  Board  has  much  to  do  in  2005.  However  the  most  daunting  challenge  we  face
is making the tough choices and prioritizing NSF programs and projects in the face
of constrained federal budgets and a growing competition for those funds.
CLOSING REMARKS

This  is  a  difficult  time  for  federal  budgets  for  S&E  research  and  education  and
the institutions and individuals in the nonprofit and public sectors that rely on fed-
eral support. For over 50 years the Federal Government has sustained a continual,
visionary  investment  in  the  U.S.  research  and  education  enterprise  in  the  expecta-
tion  that  such  investment  would  redound  to  the  benefit  of  all  Americans.  That  fed-
eral effort has expanded the horizon of scientific discovery and engineering achieve-
ments  far  and  wide,  leading  to  the  realization  of  enormous  benefits  to  our  nation
and, indeed, all of humanity.

In recognition of the federal fiscal realities our nation faces, the National Science
Board pledges that we will be a force for causing the NSF to set priorities, to make
hard  programmatic  budget  decisions  and,  as  a  result,  to  obtain  the  most  benefits
from the funds provided. However, even in a time of budget constraints, as a nation
we  cannot  ignore  our  growing  dependence  as  a  society  on  innovation  for  economic
prosperity  and  the  ever-improving  quality  of  life  Americans  have  come  to  expect.
The  federal  compact  in  research  and  education  with  the  nonprofit  sectors  is  an  es-
sential pillar of our nation’s global dominance in S&T.

We  know  what  works—we  have  a  very  long  history  of  success  to  draw  on.  We
know  the  expanding  frontiers  of  knowledge  offer  enormous  opportunities  for  re-
search  and  innovation.  We  also  know  that  the  education  of  all  our  citizens  in  the
fundamentals  of  math,  science  and  engineering  must  be  addressed  if  the  U.S.  is  to
remain  eminent  in  S&T  when  we  enter  the  22nd  century.  As  other  nations  ramp
up their investment in the infrastructure for S&E research and innovation, we can-
not  be  complacent.  The  federal  investment  in  the  Nation’s  S&T  is  a  necessity  for
the  Nation’s  future  prosperity  and  security.  The  U.S.  must  sustain  its  advantages
through continued wise, adequate federal support for our S&E enterprise.

BIOGRAPHY FOR MARK S. WRIGHTON

CHEMISTRY
B.S., Florida State University, 1969
Ph.D., California Institute of Technology, 1972

Mark Stephen Wrighton was born in Jacksonville, Florida, and attended the Cali-
fornia  Institute  of  Technology,  where  he  was  awarded  the  Ph.D.  degree  in  Chem-
istry  in  1972.  Following  graduation,  he  joined  the  chemistry  faculty  at  the  Massa-
chusetts Institute of Technology (MIT), became a Full Professor in 1977, was named
the  Frederick  G.  Keyes  Professor  of  Chemistry  in  1981,  headed  the  Department  of
Chemistry from 1987 to 1990, was named the Ciba-Geigy Professor of Chemistry in
1989,  and  served  as  provost  of  MIT  from  1990  to  1995.  He  was  elected  the  14th
Chancellor  of  Washington  University  in  St.  Louis  in  1995  and  also  serves  as  pro-
fessor of chemistry. Wrighton’s research interests include transition metal catalysis,
photochemistry,  surface  chemistry,  molecular  electronics,  and  photoprocesses  at
electrodes.  He  has  authored  or  co-authored  more  than  300  articles  in  professional
and scholarly journals, and he holds 14 patents.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

Wrighton serves on the Board of Directors of the Consortium on Financing Higher
Education,  the  Donald  Danforth  Plant  Science  Center,  Cabot  Corporation,  Helix
Technology Corporation, Ionics, Inc., and A.G. Edwards, Inc. He is also a trustee of
the  Missouri  Botanical  Garden  and  the  St.  Louis  Science  Center.  Wrighton  has
served  on  numerous  editorial  advisory  boards,  councils,  committees,  and  study
groups for scientific organizations, including the National Science Foundation.

Among  Wrighton’s  many  awards  are  the  Herbert  Newby  McCoy  Award  in  1972
and  the  California  Institute  of  Technology  Distinguished  Alumni  Award  in  1992.
The  American  Chemical  Society  honored  him  in  1981  with  the  Pure  Chemistry
Award and in 1988 with the Award in Inorganic Chemistry. In 1983 he received the
E.O.  Lawrence  Award  from  the  U.S.  Department  of  Energy  and  the  Gregory  and
Freda  Halpern  Award  in  Photochemistry  from  the  New  York  Academy  of  Sciences;
the same year, he was named a MacArthur Fellow. He is also a fellow of the Amer-
ican  Academy  of  Arts  and  Sciences,  the  American  Association  for  the  Advancement
of Science, and the American Philosophical Society. He is a member of the American
Chemical  Society,  Sigma  Xi,  and  the  Electrochemical  Society.  Wrighton  was  ap-
pointed  to  the  National  Science  Board  in  2000.  He  chairs  the  Board’s  Audit  and
Oversight Committee.

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Dr. Wrighton.
Dr. Boesz.

STATEMENT OF DR. CHRISTINE C. BOESZ, INSPECTOR

GENERAL, NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION

Dr.  BOESZ.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Inglis,  Congresswoman

Hooley, and distinguished Members of this subcommittee.

I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today.  I  am
Christine  Boesz,  sometimes  called  Tina,  and  I  am  the  Inspector
General of the National Science Foundation.

The National Science Foundation, or NSF, is an innovative agen-
cy  dedicated  to  maintaining  American  leadership  across  the  fron-
tiers  of  scientific  and  engineering  research  and  education.  As  the
scientific  enterprise  changes  and  research  evolves,  new  challenges
inevitably arise.

Consequently,  my  office  has  worked  closely  with  the  National
Science  Board  and  NSF  management  to  identify  and  begin  to  ad-
dress issues that are important to the success of NSF achieving its
goals.

As  Inspector  General,  I  enjoy  a  unique  perspective.  My  office  is
responsible  for  promoting  economy,  efficiency,  and  effectiveness  in
administering NSF’s programs; for detecting and preventing fraud,
waste,  and  abuse  within  NSF  or  by  individuals  that  submit  pro-
posals  to  or  receive  funding  from  NSF;  and  for  identifying  and
helping to resolve cases of research misconduct. We also engage in
outreach  activities  in  an  effort  to  build  partnerships  within  NSF,
with  other  federal  agencies,  with  NSF  awardees,  and  with  the  sci-
entific, engineering, and educational communities.

In addition to individual audit and investigation reports, the two
primary  methods  for  communicating  with  the  Congress,  the  Na-
tional Science Board, and NSF management are through our semi-
annual reports and annual management challenges letters.

Today, I want to highlight two of the most important short-term
and  long-term  management  challenges  facing  NSF:  the  strategic
management  of  NSF  resources  and  improved  financial  perform-
ance.

First,  the  strategic  management  of  NSF  administrative  re-
sources, especially human capital, is an ongoing and pressing issue.
In 2002, NSF launched a multi-year business analysis effort to ad-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

dress  this  challenge,  yet  NSF  still  struggles  with  the  development
of a workforce plan.

While  NSF’s  workload  has  rapidly  increased  over  the  past  few
years,  the  agency  has  not  identified  the  amount  of  staffing  and
other  administrative  resources  needed  to  address  this  growing  dis-
parity. NSF’s critical staffing shortage is evident in NSF’s manage-
ment and oversight of its large facility portfolio. It is also apparent
by the lack of resources that have been assigned to carry out many
of NSF’s general post-award monitoring responsibilities.

This  brings  me  to  the  second  challenge:  improved  financial  per-
formance  through  better  post-award  administration.  For  four  con-
secutive years, auditors have found that NSF’s monitoring of grant-
ee  institutions  has  significant  weaknesses.  Specifically,  NSF’s  cur-
rent  program  is  not  comprehensive  enough  for  it  to  be  effective  in
identifying  and  resolving  issues.  An  effective  monitoring  program
would  ensure  that  awardees  are  complying  with  federal  require-
ments,  are  making  adequate  progress  towards  achieving  research
objectives, and are charging allowable costs.

Further, an audit by my office recently found that many research
reports,  which  are  used  to  monitor  progress,  are  submitted  signifi-
cantly  late  or  not  at  all.  While  NSF  has  taken  steps  over  the  past
three  years  to  improve  its  post-award  administration,  progress  is
slow and much remains to be done.

I  realize  that  resources  are  needed  for  NSF  to  fully  address  its
challenges.  While  new  resources  would  be  highly  desirable,  I  be-
lieve that realignment of certain management priorities would ease
some  of  the  current  burden.  Just  as  the  scientific  enterprise  has
changed over the past few decades, NSF must address its changing
administrative  challenges  by  reassessing  how  it  conducts  its  busi-
ness.  In  an  environment  of  increased  accountability  and  steward-
ship  of  limited  federal  funds,  effective  award  administration  is  es-
sential.

In closing, I want to point out that in my recent semi-annual re-
port  to  the  Congress  for  the  6-month  period  ending  September  30,
my  office  reported  on  numerous  audit  and  investigative  activities,
resulting  in  over  $30  million  in  questioned  costs  and  $500,000  in
investigative  recoveries.  My  written  testimony  highlights  samples
of both audit and investigative matters.

I  look  forward  to  working  with  the  National  Science  Foundation
management,  the  National  Science  Board,  and  you  as  together  we
address  the  challenges  facing  the  National  Science  Foundation,  a
unique and innovative agency.

Again,  thank  you  for  your  invitation  to  participate  in  this  hear-
ing,  and  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  that  you  may
have.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Boesz follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHRISTINE C. BOESZ

Chairman  Inglis,  Ranking  Member  Hooley,  and  distinguished  Members  of  the
Subcommittee,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today.  As  you
know,  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  is  an  innovative  agency  dedicated  to
maintaining  American  leadership  in  discovery  and  the  development  of  new  tech-
nologies across the frontiers of scientific and engineering research and education. As
the  scientific  enterprise  changes  and  research  evolves,  new  challenges  arise.  Con-
sequently,  my  office  has  worked  closely  with  the  National  Science  Board  and  NSF

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

management  to  identify  and  begin  to  address  issues  that  are  important  to  the  suc-
cess of NSF achieving its goals.

As  Inspector  General,  I  enjoy  a  unique  perspective  on  NSF  activities  and  the  re-
search  and  education  enterprise  in  general.  My  office  is  responsible  for  promoting
economy,  efficiency,  and  effectiveness  in  administering  NSF’s  programs;  detecting
and  preventing  fraud,  waste,  and  abuse  within  NSF  or  by  individuals  that  submit
proposals  to  or  receive  funding  from  NSF;  and  identifying  and  helping  to  resolve
cases of research misconduct. My office also engages in outreach activities in an ef-
fort to build partnerships within the agency, other federal agencies, NSF awardees,
and  the  scientific,  engineering,  and  education  communities.  These  partnerships  as-
sist  us  in  resolving  audit  and  investigation  matters  effectively  and  promoting  edu-
cation  on  research  misconduct  and  award  administration  issues.  In  addition  to  re-
ports on individual audits and investigations, the two primary methods for formally
communicating  with  the  National  Science  Board,  NSF  management,  and  the  Con-
gress are through our Semiannual Reports and annual management challenges let-
ters.
Management Challenges

This past October, my office conducted its annual assessment of the most serious
management  and  performance  challenges  facing  NSF.1 My  office  compiled  a  list  of
eleven  management  challenges  based  on  our  audit  work,  general  knowledge  of  the
agency’s  operations,  and  the  evaluative  reports  of  others,  such  as  the  Government
Accountability Office and NSF’s various advisory committees, contractors, and staff.
These  challenges,  which  are  essentially  unchanged  from  our  previous  assessment,2
fall into five general categories: 1) strategic management of agency resources, 2) im-
proved  financial  performance,  3)  expanded  electronic  government,  4)  budget  and
performance integration, and 5) program-specific challenges.

I  believe  that  the  two  most  important  challenges  are  related  to  the  first  two  of
these general categories, which encompass both the short-term and long-term needs
of  NSF.  The  strategic  management  of  NSF  resources  is  an  ongoing  and  pressing
issue.  NSF  needs  to  devote  more  resources  and  attention  to  making  business  and
process  improvements,  while  at  the  same  time,  planning  for  its  future  workforce
needs. Although advances in technology have enhanced the workforce’s productivity,
NSF’s rapidly increasing workload has forced the agency to become increasingly de-
pendent on temporary staff (e.g., rotators and visiting scientists) and contractors to
handle  the  additional  work.  NSF’s  efforts  in  the  past  to  justify  an  increase  in  staff
have  been  impeded  by  the  lack  of  a  comprehensive  workforce  plan  that  identifies
workforce  gaps  and  outlines  specific  actions  for  addressing  them.  Without  such  a
plan, NSF cannot determine whether it has the appropriate number of people or the
types  of  competencies  necessary  to  accomplish  its  strategic  goals.  In  2002,  NSF
launched  a  multi-year  business  analysis  effort  to  address  this  challenge.  To  date,
NSF has made few decisions regarding implementation of a workforce plan. Without
such  a  plan,  NSF  is  unable  to  assess  the  number  and  skill-level  of  rotators  and
other  personnel  needed  to  carry  out  its  work.  Of  particular  concern  is  the  need  for
resources  to  oversee  NSF’s  large  facility  projects  and  carry  out  effective  post-award
monitoring.

Throughout  my  five  years  as  Inspector  General  of  NSF,  my  office  has  increased
its  audit  attention  on  matters  related  to  NSF’s  management  and  oversight  of  its
large  facility  project  portfolio,  which  includes  projects  ranging  from  tens  of  millions
to hundreds of millions of dollars. In 2000 and 2002, my office issued reports critical
of  NSF’s  management  of  large  infrastructure  projects  and  made  recommendations
for addressing this important piece of NSF’s research portfolio.3 These recommenda-
tions  urged  NSF  to  establish  formal  guidance  for  the  programmatic  and  financial
management  of  large  facilities,  including  full-cost  tracking.  An  important  aspect  of
NSF’s plan to address these recommendations is the establishment of a Large Facil-
ity Project (LFP) Office with responsibility for managing and overseeing large facil-
ity projects. We reviewed the progress this Office is making in issuing project man-

1 Memorandum  from  Christine  C.  Boesz,  Inspector  General,  National  Science  Foundation,  to
Warren  Washington,  Chairman,  National  Science  Board,  and  Arden  Bement,  Acting  Director,
National Science Foundation (Oct. 15, 2004) (on file with NSF OIG).

2 Memorandum  from  Christine  C.  Boesz,  Inspector  General,  National  Science  Foundation,  to
Warren Washington, Chairman, National Science Board, and Rita R. Colwell, Director, National
Science Foundation (Oct. 17, 2003) http://www.nsf.gov/oig/managementchallenges2004.pdf.

3 OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL,  NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION,  AUDIT OF THE FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT OF THE GEMINI PROJECT, Report No. 01–2–001 (Dec. 15, 2000); OFFICE OF INSPEC-
TOR GENERAL,  NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION,  AUDIT OF FUNDING FOR MAJOR RESEARCH
EQUIPMENT AND FACILITIES,  Report  No.  02–2–007  (May  1,  2002)  (both  on  file  with  NSF  OIG).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

agement guidance and providing oversight of current projects.4 The Office’s progress
has  been  slow  and  constrained  by  workload  and  staffing  issues.  Currently  the  LFP
Office  has  2.5  full-time-equivalent  employees  responsible  for  overseeing  13  projects,
each of which is estimated to receive an average of $100–$400 million in total Major
Research  Equipment  and  Facilities  Construction  appropriation  funding.  While  the
LFP  Office  may  have  some  access  to  other  NSF  staff  to  support  its  activities,  I  be-
lieve  that  dedicated  resources,  specific  to  the  Office’s  oversight  responsibilities,  are
essential. In addition to resources, however, and perhaps more importantly, the LFP
Office needs organizational authority to independently oversee the management and
construction  of  these  projects,  and  a  high-level  champion  to  ensure  that  authority.
I believe Dr. Arden Bement, as NSF Director, intends to be this champion. Further,
the  Office  needs  a  more  structured  management  approach  that  includes  a  formal
mission statement, specific goals and measures, and a realistic staffing plan.

Finally,  over  the  past  five  years,  we  have  focused  increasing  audit  efforts  on  ad-
dressing  NSF’s  challenge  to  effectively  administer  and  oversee  all  of  its  approxi-
mately 30,000 active grants and cooperative agreements once they have been award-
ed.  Since  2002,  four  consecutive  independent  audits  of  NSF’s  financial  statements
have cited weaknesses in the agency’s post-award monitoring of grantee institutions
as  a  significant  deficiency.5 Specifically,  the  auditors  found  that  (1)  NSF’s  current
risk  model  for  focusing  its  monitoring  efforts  does  not  adequately  capture  all  high-
risk awardees; (2) NSF’s award-monitoring program does not address procedures for
both  baseline  and  advanced  monitoring  depending  on  the  financial  risk  of  the
award; and (3) procedures for conducting on-site award monitoring at awardee insti-
tutions are not adequate for the performance of an effective on-site review. In addi-
tion,  in  the  FY  2004  audit,  the  independent  auditor  identified  a  second  reportable
condition: contract monitoring. The auditors found that NSF does not adequately re-
view  public  vouchers  submitted  by  contractors  receiving  advance  payments  to  en-
sure  that  the  reported  expenditures  are  proper  and  allowable  under  the  contract.
Without  adequately  performing  such  procedures,  misstatements  and  unauthorized
expenditures may go undetected.

A  recent  audit  by  my  office  further  highlights  the  need  for  increased  post-award
monitoring.6 My auditors found, over a five-year period, that approximately 47 per-
cent of the 151,000 annual and final project reports required by the terms and con-
ditions  of  NSF’s  grants  and  cooperative  agreements  were  either  submitted  late  or
not  at  all.  Of  the  43,000  final  project  reports,  eight  percent  were  never  submitted,
and 53 percent were submitted, on average, five months late. Of the 108,000 annual
progress  reports,  42  percent  were  never  submitted.  This  is  due  in  part  because  of
a lack of emphasis placed on the importance of these reports, as evidenced by a lack
of policies and infrastructure that facilitate the staff’s ability to adequately address
this key facet of award administration. Moreover, in 74 of 571 occurrences over the
past five years, NSF provided additional funding, contrary to its own policy, to prin-
cipal investigators who had not submitted final project reports for prior awards.

An  effective  post-award  monitoring  program  should  ensure  that:  awardees  are
complying  with  award  terms  and  conditions  and  federal  regulations;  adequate
progress is being made toward achieving the objectives and milestones of the funded
research  project;  and  awardee  expenditures  listed  on  NSF’s  financial  statements
represent  costs  that  are  accurate  and  allowable.  While  NSF  has  taken  some  steps
over  the  past  three  years  toward  establishing  a  risk-based  program  for  post-award
monitoring  of  its  grants,  more  needs  to  be  done.  NSF  must  broaden  its  approach

4 OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL,  NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION,  SURVEY OF LARGE FACIL-
ITY PROJECTS MANAGEMENT AND OVERSIGHT DIVISION,  Report  No.  05–6–002  (Dec.  29,  2004)
http://www.nsf.gov/oig/LFP¥Report.pdf

5 KPMG Auditor’s Report, Fiscal Year 2004 National Science Foundation Financial Statement
Audit  (Nov.  12,  2004)  (page  III–45  of  NSF’s  2004  Accountability  Report  found  at  http://
www.nsf.gov/pubs/2005/nsf0501/new¥pdf/nsf0501.pdf);  KPMG  Auditor’s  Report,  Fiscal  Year
2003  National  Science  Foundation  Financial  Statement  Audit  (Nov.  17,  2003)  (page  III–43  of
NSF’s  2003  Accountability  Report  found  at  http://www.nsf.gov/pubs/2004/nsf0410/new¥pdf/
nsf0410final.pdf); KPMG Auditor’s Report, Fiscal Year 2002 National Science Foundation Finan-
cial  Statement  Audit  (Jan.  29,  2003)  (page  III–39  of  NSF’s  2002  Accountability  Report  found
at  http://www.nsf.gov/pubs/2003/nsf03023/pdf/nsf03023final.pdf);  KPMG  Auditor’s  Report,
Fiscal Year 2001 National Science Foundation Financial Statement Audit (Jan. 18, 2002) (page
71  of  NSF’s  2001  Accountability  Report  found  at  http://www.nsf.gov/pubs/2002/nsf02097/
nsf02097.pdf).

6 OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL,  NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION,  AUDIT OF PROJECT RE-
PORTING FOR NSF  AWARDS,  Report  No.  05–2–006  (Dec.  13,  2004)  http://www.nsf.gov/oig/05-2-
006Final.pdf.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

to  award  monitoring  to  go  beyond  the  relatively  few  high-risk  awardees,7 develop
more effective award oversight guidance, and increase the coordination between pro-
gram  and  financial  officers.  We  have  recently  received  and  are  currently  reviewing
an  action  plan  from  NSF  that  proposes  to  address  these  additional  award-moni-
toring activities.

All  of  these  challenges  reflect  areas  of  fundamental  program  risk  that  continue
to pose barriers to NSF’s accomplishment of its responsibilities. They will therefore
require  ongoing  attention  from  NSF  management  over  the  long-term.  While  NSF
recognizes  these  challenges,  progress  has  been  slow  and  much  remains  to  be  done
in  order  for  NSF  to  become  a  more  successful  organization  and  better  serve  the  re-
search and education communities, which so heavily rely on it. In addition, NSF has
results from its own consulting study of post-award monitoring, which includes spe-
cific recommended actions.8 Although NSF now recognizes that both post-award and
contract  monitoring  activities  are  necessary,  the  next  step  is  for  NSF  to  more  ag-
gressively implement concrete actions that will mitigate my concerns. I am particu-
larly concerned over NSF’s response to the independent auditors finding of a report-
able  condition  in  the  area  of  contract  monitoring.  NSF’s  corrective  action  plan  sug-
gests  that  my  office,  rather  than  NSF  staff,  be  responsible  for  the  periodic  testing
of  contract  vouchers  recommended  by  the  auditors.  Voucher  examination  is  a  basic
accounting  function  that  resides  with  management.  As  such,  it  would  be  inappro-
priate  for  my  office  to  take  on  this  management  function  in  light  of  our  statutory
independence.

I  realize  that  resources  are  needed  for  NSF  to  fully  address  these  challenges.
However,  I  also  believe  that  realignment  of  NSF’s  management  priorities  should
ease  the  resource  burden.  The  nature  of  the  scientific  research  enterprise  has
changed  over  the  past  few  decades.  Consequently,  the  programmatic  and  manage-
ment  challenges  facing  NSF  have  changed.  NSF’s  assessment  of  needed  resources
should address its changing administrative challenges.
Investigative and Audit Activities

In  our  most  recent  Semiannual  Report  to  the  Congress  for  the  six-month  period
ending September 30, 2004, my office reported on numerous audit and investigative
activities.9 During that time period, my office issued one interim and 10 final audit
reports that contained over $30 million in questioned costs, and made recommenda-
tions  that  would  improve  grants  management  controls  and  oversight  processes  at
both NSF and its awardee institutions. We closed 38 civil/criminal cases and 51 ad-
ministrative  cases  and  our  investigations  recovered  $522,387.  Three  cases  were  re-
ferred  to  the  Department  of  Justice  for  criminal  prosecution  and  15  administrative
cases  were  forwarded  to  NSF  management  for  action  during  this  period.  The  fol-
lowing  is  a  sample  of  investigations  and  audits  that  were  reported  in  our  most  re-
cent Semiannual Report.
Investigations

My  office  investigates  allegations  of  wrongdoing  involving  organizations  or  indi-
viduals that receive awards from, conduct business with, or work for, NSF. In inves-
tigating these allegations we assess their seriousness and recommend proportionate
action.  When  possible,  we  work  in  partnership  with  agencies  and  awardee  institu-
tions  to  resolve  these  issues.  Where  appropriate,  the  results  of  these  investigations
are  referred  to  the  Department  of  Justice  or  other  prosecutorial  authorities  for
criminal  prosecution  or  civil  litigation,  or  to  NSF  management  for  administrative
resolution.

For  example,  as  we  reported  in  our  most  recent  Semiannual  Report,  the  owner
of a company that received Small Business Innovation Research (SBIR) awards from
NSF  and  other  federal  agencies  pleaded  guilty  to  mail  fraud  and  tax  evasion  as  a
result  of  our  investigative  efforts.  The  owner  sent  a  progress  report  to  NSF  for  his

7 In  FY  2004,  NSF  identified  only  42  of  its  approximately  30,000  awards  as  ‘‘high  risk’’  and
did  not  include  some  awards  that  were  known  to  be  high  risk.  For  FY  2005,  NSF  has  revised
its risk assessment model and has identified 252 awards as ‘‘high risk.’’ While the revised model
captures  a  greater  number  of  risky  awards,  it  still  identifies  less  than  one  percent  of  NSF
awards as ‘‘high risk.’’

8 NSF  contracted  with  a  consultant  to  assess  NSF’s  post-award  monitoring  processes.  The  re-
sults  of  this  assessment,  issued  in  March  2004,  indicated  that  while  NSF  made  commendable
efforts  to  develop  policies  and  procedures,  it  still  faces  a  number  of  challenges  to  achieve  effec-
tive administration. Further, using other grant making agencies as a benchmark, the consultant
identified  gaps  in  NSF’s  post-award  administration.  IBM,  Post-Award  Monitoring  Assessment
(March  2004).  NSF  has  not  developed  an  action  plan  to  address  the  reported  opportunities  for
improvement.

9 OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL,  NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION,  SEMIANNUAL REPORT TO

THE CONGRESS (September 2004) http://www.nsf.gov/pubs/2004/oigsept2004/oig2004sept.pdf

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

SBIR  award  that  included  research  previously  conducted  by  his  company  under  an
Air  Force  SBIR  award.  He  also  used  federal  SBIR  funds  to  pay  for  personal  ex-
penses,  such  as  repairs  and  improvements  to  his  home,  thereby  evading  over
$93,000  in  income  tax  on  his  personal  tax  return  for  1999.  The  total  loss  of  federal
funds related to the subject’s fraudulent scheme is estimated at $1.4 million. Based
on  the  guilty  plea  and  our  recommendation,  NSF  recovered  $120,000  of  its  funds
that  it  withheld  from  the  NSF  grant  pending  the  outcome  of  our  investigation.  We
also recommended that NSF exclude through debarment the owner and his company
from receiving funds from any federal agency.

One  of  the  more  unique  areas  of  investigation  for  my  office  is  in  the  realm  of  re-
search  misconduct,  specifically  falsification  of  data,  fabrication  of  results,  and  pla-
giarism.  Research  misconduct  strikes  at  the  core  of  NSF’s  mission,  and  is  a  special
concern  for  my  office.  Although  there  is  a  strong  sense  of  integrity  within  the  sci-
entific  and  engineering  research  communities,  my  office  often  receives  allegations
that  result  in  misconduct  findings.  For  example,  after  receiving  an  allegation  that
a  postdoctoral  scientist  fabricated  and  falsified  data  in  a  published  research  paper,
my office concluded that the researcher knowingly and intentionally fabricated data
in  multiple  analyses  to  make  it  appear  that  replicate  experiments  had  been  com-
pleted  when  in  fact  only  a  single  analysis  had  been  performed.  The  scientist’s  ac-
tions  ultimately  led  to  the  retraction  of  the  entire  publication  in  which  the  fab-
ricated  and  falsified  data  appeared.  We  recommended  that  NSF  make  a  finding  of
research  misconduct  against  the  subject  and  prohibit  him  from  receiving  federal
funds, otherwise known as debarment, for two years.

In  addition,  my  office  recommended  to  NSF  that  it  take  action  to  protect  federal
interests  by  debarring  a  researcher  for  two  years  for  his  fabricating  the  existence
of  and  citations  for  two  manuscripts  referenced  in  his  two  NSF  awards.  An  inves-
tigation by the researcher’s university determined that he provided false biographi-
cal information as part of his NSF proposals. The researcher cited two manuscripts
as ‘‘submitted to’’ two prominent journals, and also referenced a ‘‘submitted’’ manu-
script within the text of the proposal for his NSF award. However, our investigation
revealed  that  those  manuscripts  did  not  exist.  The  investigation  also  identified  a
pattern  of  misrepresentation  by  the  researcher  that  extended  over  a  10-month  pe-
riod.

While  the  majority  of  our  investigations  involve  individual  actions,  some  involve
entire  organizations.  For  example,  my  office  received  a  complaint  that  a  university
was charging a five percent surcharge to NSF awards for technical support salaries.
We  initiated  an  investigation  and  worked  with  the  university  to  review  technical
support  charges  to  NSF  awards.  Although  we  found  no  evidence  of  fraud,  the  uni-
versity  restored  $364,539  to  NSF  for  technical  support  expenses  that  were  erro-
neously charged to its NSF awards.10 As a result of our investigation, the university
changed  its  policies  and  procedures  to  ensure  that  technical  support  is  charged  ap-
propriately  to  federal  awards.  The  university  also  identified  $518,993  of  technical
support  charges  that  had  been  wrongfully  charged  to  awards  from  12  other  federal
agencies. We notified the other federal agencies of this issue and obtained a commit-
ment  from  the  university  to  work  with  each  of  them  to  resolve  these  overcharges.
Audits

Our  audit  activities  have  two  primary  thrusts  that  often  complement  each  other.
We conduct financial audits of NSF’s awards and awardee institutions to determine
whether costs claimed by awardees are allowable, reasonable, and were incurred for
the benefit of NSF’s award. These audits also seek to identify weaknesses in award-
ee’s controls in accounting for and in administering their NSF awards to ensure that
NSF  funds  are  spent  properly.  In  addition,  we  conduct  internal  audits,  which  are
reviews  of  selected  NSF  programs  and  operations  that  provide  policy-makers  and
management  with  an  independent  appraisal  of  whether  desired  results  and  objec-
tives are achieved efficiently, economically, and in accordance with prescribed laws,
regulations, policies, and procedures.

Recent examples of both these types of audits include an audit of a foreign treaty
organization  that,  since  1996,  has  received  $16.4  million  in  NSF  awards  for  global
change  research.11 The  audit  found  that  NSF,  on  behalf  of  the  United  States,  is
funding a disproportionate share of the organization’s total costs. The U.S. contribu-

10 Generally,  technical  support  costs  can  be  charged  to  federal  grants  as  direct  costs  only  for
particular services provided for particular grants; otherwise such costs constitute administrative
support services costs that are included in the university’s indirect cost rate.

11 OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL,  NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION,  AUDIT OF INTER-AMER-
ICAN INSTITUTE FOR GLOBAL CHANGE RESEARCH,  Report.  No.  04–2–007  (Sept.  30,  2004)  http:/
/www.nsf.gov/oig/IAI-GCR.pdf

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

tion,  which  was  initially  expected  to  comprise  25  percent  of  the  organization’s  total
funds, actually represents 87 percent of its income from 1996 to 2003. This occurred
because  18  other  member  countries  did  not  provide  research  and  operational  con-
tributions in the amounts originally committed. As a result, the foreign organization
has  average  annual  expenditures  of  only  $2.6  million  or  82  percent  less  than  ex-
pected,  thereby  impeding  its  ability  to  achieve  its  research  goals.  Additionally,  the
organization  has  not  properly  monitored  its  14  research  subawards  valued  at  $10.3
million.  This  resulted  in  serious  problems  with  two  subawards  that  cannot  ade-
quately  support  their  $1.1  million  of  claimed  costs.  Given  the  lack  of  financial  sup-
port  by  other  member  countries,  we  recommended  that  NSF  work  with  the  foreign
organization’s governing bodies to promote and oversee fundraising activities; re-as-
sess the organization’s mission, goals, and staffing levels if additional funding is not
obtained;  and  ensure  that  the  organization  establishes  written  subaward  manage-
ment  policies  and  procedures.  Finally,  we  recommended  that  NSF  cease  providing
additional  research  awards  to  the  organization  until  it  has  developed  and  imple-
mented  written  monitoring  procedures  to  ensure  its  subawardees  are  properly  ac-
counting  for  and  managing  NSF  grant  funds.  NSF  has  agreed  with  the  OIG  rec-
ommendations and is implementing actions to address them.

My  office  also  recently  completed  another  audit  of  a  foreign  organization  identi-
fying similar award administration issues.12 This audit found that NSF, along with
three other federal agencies, did not establish adequate grant agreements requiring
the  foreign  organization  to  comply  with  statutory  funding  requirements  as  a  condi-
tion for receiving U.S. monies for the organization’s research endowment fund. Con-
sequently, the organization did not provide 45 percent of its required matching con-
tribution  ($5  million)  or  implement  adequate  financial  controls  to  account  for  and
administer  almost  $11  million  in  U.S.  funds.  We  recommended  that  as  the  largest
U.S. contributor, NSF bring these concerns to the attention of the President’s Office
of Science and Technology Policy (OSTP) in order to facilitate a coordinated U.S. ef-
fort  to  secure  corrective  actions  on  the  part  of  the  foreign  organization.  While  NSF
responded favorably to the audit report, it does not agree that it should take a lead-
ing role in coordinating corrective actions for the entire U.S. Government. Neverthe-
less, NSF does generally agree to implement the remaining audit recommendations
to secure improved financial controls over its own contributions to the foreign orga-
nization.  It  is  my  opinion  that  NSF  should  take  the  lead  to  bring  these  matters  to
OSTP  in  order  to  coordinate  the  U.S.  interests  in  obtaining  the  needed  corrective
actions from the foreign organization.

As another example, at NSF’s request, my office contracted with the Defense Con-
tract Audit Agency (DCAA) to perform a financial audit of NSF’s Antarctic Support
Services  Contractor.13 This  contractor  is  NSF’s  largest,  providing  logistics  and  sup-
port  services  estimated  at  approximately  $1.1  billion  over  ten  years.  In  September
2004,  DCAA  staff  reported  on  the  interim  results  of  the  first  phase  of  this  audit.
Of  the  $363  million  total  costs  claimed  by  the  Contractor  for  the  three-year  period
ending  December  31,  2002,  the  auditors  questioned  $29.2  million  because  the  Con-
tractor  improperly  billed  indirect  costs  to  the  contract.14 The  auditors  also  ques-
tioned  $6.7  million  because  the  Contractor  claimed  indirect  costs  that  exceeded  the
limitations  specified  in  the  contract  agreement.  The  remaining  phases  of  the  Ant-
arctic Services Contract audit will include a review of the Contractor’s internal con-
trols  for  administering,  monitoring,  and  accounting  for  the  NSF  contract  funds  and
a  review  of  the  direct  costs  and  remaining  indirect  costs  charged  to  the  contract
through December 31, 2004.

As  a  final  example,  my  office  conducted  an  internal,  or  performance  audit  of  the
Math  and  Science  Partnership  (MSP)  Program.15 In  FYs  2002  and  2003,  NSF
awarded  a  total  of  $436.6  million  for  35  comprehensive  and  targeted  awards  under
this program. The audit objective was to determine the effectiveness of a sample of
MSP  projects’  evaluation  methods  and  measures  to  assess  the  impact  of  the  inter-

12 OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL, NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION, AUDIT OF UNITED STATES-
MEXICO FOUNDATION FOR SCIENCE,  Report.  No.  05–2–005  (Dec.  8,  2004)  http://www.nsf.gov/
oig/USMFS05.pdf

13 OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL,  NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION,  AUDIT OF RAYTHEON
POLAR SERVICES COMPANY’S INDIRECT COSTS CLAIMED FOR FISCAL YEARS 2000 TO 2002,  Report.
No. 04–1–010 (Sept. 30, 2004) (on file with NSF OIG).

14 Specifically,  the  contractor  claimed  indirect  costs  as  direct  costs  of  the  contract,  including
$8.6  million  related  to  home  and  corporate  office  costs,  $5.7  million  related  to  facilities  costs,
$3.4  million  related  to  human  resources  costs,  $2.7  million  related  to  financial  management
costs, and over $700,000 related to sign-on bonus costs.

15 OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL,  NATIONAL SCIENCE FOUNDATION,  AUDIT OF NSF’S MATH
(May  14,  2004)  http://

AND SCIENCE PARTNERSHIP PROGRAM,  Report.  No.  04–2–003 
www.nsf.gov/oig/mspprogram.pdf

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

vention  strategies  on  student  achievement.  This  audit  reviewed  nine  partnership
projects  funded  in  FY  2002  and  found  that  five  had  effective  evaluation  plans  de-
signed  to  evaluate,  define,  and  measure  the  impact  of  the  intervention  strategies,
activities  and  outcomes  on  student  achievement  in  math  and  science.  While  the  re-
maining  four  projects  did  not  address  all  the  elements  for  an  effective  evaluation
process,  with  appropriate  guidance  and  monitoring  NSF  could  ensure  that  each
partnership had an effective evaluation process.

Through  these  audits,  and  others  like  them,  my  office  is  able  to  make  rec-
ommendations  to  NSF  management  aimed  at  correcting  specific  problems  found
with  programs  and  awards.  For  example,  as  a  result  of  the  audit  of  the  MSP  pro-
gram, NSF convened a workshop of subject matter experts to prepare an evaluation
statement for current and future MSP projects. The results of these audits and oth-
ers  help  to  inform  our  assessment  of  the  most  critical  challenges  facing  NSF,  and
help my office focus its future audit efforts.

Chairman  Inglis,  this  concludes  my  written  statement.  Thank  you  for  the  oppor-
tunity  to  share  this  information  with  you.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  addi-
tional  questions  you  or  other  Members  of  the  Subcommittee  may  have,  or  to  elabo-
rate on any of the issues that I have addressed today.

BIOGRAPHY FOR CHRISTINE C. BOESZ

Christine  C.  Boesz  assumed  the  duties  as  Inspector  General  of  the  National
Science Foundation (NSF) in January 2000, reporting to the National Science Board
and the Congress. As head of the Office of Inspector General (OIG), she recommends
policies  for  promoting  economy,  efficiency  and  effectiveness  of  NSF  programs  and
operations. She leads efforts to prevent and detect fraud, waste, and abuse, improv-
ing  the  integrity  of  NSF  programs  and  operations  and  investigating  allegations  of
misconduct in science. Dr. Boesz participates in leadership activities of the Inspector
General community by serving on the Executive Council, the Inspection and Evalua-
tion Committee, and by chairing the Misconduct in Research Working Group for the
federal  IG  community,  responsible  for  setting  standards  and  training  for  investiga-
tions into research misconduct allegations.

Prior  to  this  position,  Dr.  Boesz  served  as  Head  of  Regulatory  Accountability,  at
Aetna  U.S.  Healthcare  Inc.  While  there  she  had  broad  responsibilities  for  estab-
lishing  and  maintaining  a  compliance  program  for  the  managed  care  Medicare  pro-
gram.  She  also  served  as  senior  policy  analyst  on  federal  legislative  and  regulatory
activities. From 1995 to 1998, she served as Vice President of Government Programs
at  New  York  Life,  developing  and  operating  Medicare  and  Medicaid  managed  care
programs  in  ten  states.  She  oversaw  product  development,  pricing,  marketing,  and
compliance  with  government  contracting  requirements.  She  also  developed  legisla-
tive policy for the company.

Prior  to  1995,  Dr.  Boesz  held  several  Federal  Government  compliance  and  over-
sight  positions  over  an  18-year  period  with  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human
Services. In her last position she served as Director of Operations and Oversight for
the  Medicare  managed  care  program,  responsible  for  awarding  and  overseeing  con-
tract  compliance.  Earlier  in  her  federal  career  she  was  instrumental  in  developing
the regulatory framework for health maintenance organizations (HMO), in operating
the HMO loan fund, and in building a compliance staff for managed care oversight.
Dr. Boesz is a Past President of the National Association of Managed Care Regu-
lators,  a  member  of  the  American  Statistical  Association,  and  the  American  Public
Health  Association.  Over  her  career  she  has  received  numerous  awards,  including
the  Lifetime  Service  Award  from  Managed  Care  Regulators,  and  has  been  recog-
nized as a Distinguished Alumna from Douglass College, Rutgers University.

Dr.  Boesz  received  her  B.A.  in  mathematics  from  Douglass  College  (1966)  and  a
M.S.  in  statistics  from  Rutgers  University  (1967).  Her  Doctorate  in  Public  Health
(health  policy)  was  awarded  by  the  University  of  Michigan  School  of  Public  Health
(1997) where she was a Pew Fellow.

DISCUSSION

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Dr. Boesz.
I  am  happy  to  see  that  we  have  been  joined  by  the  Chairman  of
the  Full  Committee,  Mr.  Boehlert,  and  I  would  be  happy  to  recog-
nize him.

Mr. BOEHLERT. Short and sweet.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

I am here because of my interest in the subject matter being dis-
cussed. And as Dr. Bement knows, we are sort of cheerleaders, un-
abashed  cheerleaders  for  NSF,  and  we  will  continue  in  that  role.
But  most  importantly,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  am  here  to  welcome  you
to this first hearing as Chairman of this subcommittee, and I want
to  wish  you  well,  and  I  know  you  will  do  well,  and  we  will  be  as
cooperative as we can, because we have got important work.

Thank you very much.
Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
At  this  point,  we  are  going  to  move  to  the  first  round  of  ques-

tions, and the Chairman recognizes himself.

Dr.  Bement,  I  hear  some  tension  here  between  the  objectives  of
NSF,  and  we  all  have  tensions.  We  have  got  to  keep  them  in  bal-
ance, I suppose. But the tension between the funding of post-grad-
uate  education  and  projects  there  as  opposed  to  the  K–12  effort.
And  it  occurs  to  me  that  if  we  were  inspiring  kids  in  K–12  with
great  teachers  and,  like  this  fellow  at  General  Electric  pointed  out
to  me,  that  is  what  it  takes  is  somebody  who  really  knows  their
subject  matter  and  somebody  who  loves  to  teach  it  and  somebody
who is really excellent at it. Talk to me about the tension between
doing  that  at  NSF  and  the  exciting  things  that  we  could  be  devel-
oping  and  getting  quickly  to  market.  I  am  inviting  you  to  talk
about that tension, I suppose.

Dr. BEMENT. Okay. Thank you.
First of all, let me assure you, Mr. Chairman, there is no tension.
Our reach to K–12 pervades NSF. It is part of every program that
we  have.  It  is  one  of  our  criteria  in  terms  of  broader  impacts.  We
encourage  all  of  our  scientists  to  extend  themselves  to  K–12.  We
have  a  formal  program  called  GK-12,  which  we  are  investing  $50
million for it to enlist 1,000 graduate students and upper-level un-
dergraduate  students  to  work  at  the  schools  at  the  interface  be-
tween  universities  and  K–12  programs.  And  that  is  turning  out  to
be exceptionally exciting and effective.

In addition, in all of our cooperative agreements with our centers
programs,  as  a  requirement,  they  are  expected  to  engage  in  K–12
education  to  bring  that  excitement  and  show  why  science  is  fun
and  to  try  and  encourage  younger  minds  to  enter  into  the  STEM
fields.  So  rather  than  just  focusing  on  a  couple  programs  in  our
EHR  budget  line,  I  would  advise  you  to  look  at  the  broader  per-
spective and what we do across the board in that area.

Chairman  INGLIS.  But  are  you  comfortable  with  essentially
transferring  some  of  that  money  to  the  Department  of  Education
that is the effect of what has happened?

Dr.  BEMENT.  I  think  it  is  a  matter  of  leadership.  We  have  in-
vested now over 10 years in these types of programs. They started
out  as  Rural  Systemic  Initiatives  and  Urban  Systemic  Initiatives,
and  we  have  had  extraordinary  results.  And  then  we  tacked  on  to
that  the  MSP  program.  It  changed.  It  morphed  into  a  new  pro-
gram. So we have 10 years of experience of what works. And if you
ever look at the Appalachian project, which started as a Rural Sys-
temic  Initiative  and  it  is  now  an  MSP  program,  the  amount  of
achievement  they  have  made  in  the  last  10  years  is  remarkable.
The  same  thing  in  El  Paso,  Texas,  which  is  largely—well,  almost

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

87  percent  Hispanic,  and  they  are  now  one  of  the  top  performing
school districts in the State of Texas.

So  those  lessons  learned  and  those  best  practices  need  to  be
propagated across all of the school districts in the country. And the
place  where  the  resources  exist  and  where  the  mission  exists  is
within  the  Department  of  Education.  So  we  have  been  working
very  closely  with  them  to  develop  peer-reviewed  projects  to  carry
on  that  mission  within  the  Department  of  Education.  They  have
committed  to  putting  more  resources  into  math  and  science  edu-
cation. And the President now has established a President-level ad-
visory  board  on  education  science—or  education  research,  which  I
serve on, as a matter of fact.

So  through  this  partnership  between  NSF  and  the  Department
of Education, I can assure you we are going to try and transfer the
passion.

Chairman INGLIS. Great.
Dr.  Boesz  raised  some  crucial  objectives.  What  is  your  response,

Dr. Bement, to those—the two objectives that she laid out?

Dr.  BEMENT.  Well,  let  me  say,  first  of  all,  we  welcome  manage-
ment  challenges.  No,  I  am  quite  serious  about  that.  We  not  only
feel  we  are  an  exemplary  agency,  but  other  people  tell  us  so.  On
the  other  hand,  we  know  that  there  is  room  for  improvement,  and
management  challenges  challenge  us  to  continuously  improve.  So
we pay attention to those challenges.

Just  quoting  from  her  statement,  she  has  credited  progress,  and
on the two areas that she cited, we made significant progress. And
since  the  full  answer  to  your  question  is  very  involved  and  very
complex,  I  would  like  to  give  you  that  statement  for  the  record,  if
I may, on the progress that we have made.

Chairman INGLIS. Certainly.
Dr. BEMENT. Having said that, she also pointed out that progress
isn’t  as  rapid  as  she  wants.  She  has  indicated  that  it  is  resource
paced. That is a basis for a significant increase in our S&E account
in  our  fiscal  year  2006  budget,  because  we  need  additional  per-
sonnel. But in addition to that, we need the electronic business sys-
tems  that  will  improve  the  productivity  of  our  practices  that  will
free up additional personnel to pay more attention to some of those
challenges. So they all work together.

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Dr. Bement.
My time has expired.
Ms. Hooley.
Ms. HOOLEY. Thank you, Mr. Chair.
I am going to follow up on some educational questions, and then
I am going to go to the icebreaker, because I have a lot of questions
about that.

Dr. BEMENT. Yes.
Ms. HOOLEY. You know, I am concerned as I look at this budget,
and  the  policy  behind  the  change  in  the  treatment  of  math  and
science  programs  that  have  been  targeted  for  extinction.  And  I
know  that  they  are  going  to—some  of  that  is  going  to  the  Depart-
ment  of  Education.  You  have  built  a  lot  of  good  relationships,  K–
12,  and  you  have  got  a  lot  of  expertise  that  have  helped  you  out
in that K–12 program. I am trying to understand why you wouldn’t
continue  that,  and  the  thing  that  the  Department  of  Education,  I

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

think,  does  well  is  dissemination  and  replication  of  best  practices.
But  it  seems  to  me  that  you  have  an  equal  role  there.  So  help  me
understand  what  is  going  on  and  why  that  is  targeted  for  extinc-
tion.

Dr.  BEMENT.  I  think  the  true  picture  is  that  this  is  the  second

year in which the draw-down on the program has occurred——

Ms. HOOLEY. Right.
Dr.  BEMENT.—and  when  I  say  drawdown,  it  only  means  that  we
are not providing any new grants, but we are sustaining the grants
that  we  currently  have.  And  in  those  programs,  we  will  continue
to pursue further improvement.

A  lot  of  the  activities  under  Math  and  Science  Partnership  deal
with  teacher  development  course  and  curriculum  development  and
evaluation,  for  the  most  part;  thus,  they  are  not  entirely  research.
And  there  is  a  lot  of  research  that  still  needs  to  be  done  in  math
and  science  education  so  that  as  we  transition  or  phase  that  part
of the program over to the Department of Education, we are gener-
ating  new  programs.  I  mentioned  the  GK–12  program,  but  there
are  other  programs  within  our  overall  portfolio  that  tend  to  be
more consistent with our research mission that we will continue to
focus  on.  In  particular,  the  portfolio  of  programs  that  have  been
highly  successful  in  broadening  participation  is  an  area  where  we
are  investing  upwards  to  $400  million  just  out  of  the  EHR  direc-
torate this year. And we have kept those programs at about the en-
acted  level  from  last  year’s  appropriation,  because  we  feel  they
need to be sustained.

But in addition to those programs within EHR, we are also inte-
grating  programs  within  the  science  directorates.  And  if  we  count
those  activities,  that  adds  about  another  $200  million  to  that  gen-
eral focus area of broadening participation. So the total investment
is  about  $600  million.  We  feel  that  is  where  we  really  need  to  put
our attention for the next decade, because with the declining inter-
est  in  science  and  engineering  among  graduating  seniors,  it  is  not
enough just to stimulate interest in math and science in K–12. We
need to do that as well as we can. And I mentioned some programs
that  do  that.  But  we  also  have  to  pay  attention  to  replacing  the
current  scientists  and  engineers  who  are  going  to  be  retiring  over
the next 10 years. And right now, we are going to fall short of that
goal unless we broaden participation.

Ms. HOOLEY. But it seems to me we are going to fall short of that
goal  if  we  don’t  generate  enough  interest  in  grade  school  and  high
school.

Dr. BEMENT. Yes, your point is well taken.
Ms.  HOOLEY.  And  when  we  look  at—right  now,  I  know  through-
out this country, we have a shortage of math and science teachers.
And I mean, if you don’t get kids interested early on, you are never
going  to  have  enough  math  and  science  people  to  fulfill  the  needs
of this country.

Dr.  BEMENT.  Yes,  Congresswoman;  I  agree.  I  think  my  main
point is that the few districts we can touch, and we have improved
over  the  last  10  years,  is  only  a  very  minute  fraction  of  the  total
school districts in the country. We have to build those programs in
the  Department  of  Education,  and  we  have  to  touch  all  of  the
school districts if we are going to make the kind of impact that you

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

are  calling  attention  to.  And  that  is  what  we  are  dedicated  to
doing.

Ms. HOOLEY. Let me switch gears really quickly and talk a little
bit about—I mean, if you look at this budget, so much of the budget
really  is  an  accounting  change,  because  of  taking  over  the  ice-
breakers  for  the  Coast  Guard.  So  you  are  really  looking  at  a  0.3
percent  increase  as  opposed  to  a  2.7  percent  increase.  Tell  me  at
what  level  of  the  Administration  was  the  decision  made  to  give
NSF  the  responsibility  to  assume  more  of  the  icebreaker  operation
and  maintenance  for  2006.  Tell  me,  who  made  that  decision?  Is
that high level, lower level?

Dr. BEMENT. No, that was a high-level decision made within the
White House, and the reason for that decision was that in the new
mission  that  the  Coast  Guard  has  at  Homeland  Security,  sup-
porting  science  was  not  going  to  be  sustained  by  the  Department
of  Homeland  Security.  So  there  was  a  concern  that  if  the  current
icebreakers  were  decommissioned  because  the  Department  would
not  support  their  operation  and  maintenance,  then  our  polar  pro-
grams,  especially  in  Antarctica,  are  at  risk.  So  the  decision  was
made  to  transfer  responsibility  for  the  operation  and  maintenance
to  the  National  Science  Foundation  to  assure  that  there  will  be
continuity of support over time to maintain our polar programs.

Ms. HOOLEY. How much money is in the budget for that? What—

do you—is that 48—what did you put in the budget for that?

Dr. BEMENT. The transfer was $48 million.
Ms.  HOOLEY.  Is  that  going  to  be  enough?  I  mean,  there  is  some
indication the Coast Guard thinks it runs somewhere between $70
million and $75 million.

Dr.  BEMENT.  Well,  we  are  working  closely  with  the  Coast  Guard
to  try  and  determine  the  structure  of  that  estimate  and  to  deter-
mine whether $48 million is enough. We have an interagency work-
ing  group  now  focused  on  looking  at  all  of  the  options  of  mini-
mizing  the  cost  of  icebreaker  operations.  And  at  the  present  time,
I  don’t  really  have  an  answer  to  your  question,  but  we  will  have
an answer some time this summer.

Ms.  HOOLEY.  Do  you  have  to  use  the  Coast  Guard  icebreakers,
or  can  you  use  a  foreign  company  to  do  that?  Or  can  you  lease  for
foreign icebreakers? Is that viable?

Dr.  BEMENT.  I  think  it  is  viable.  Our  Office  of  General  Counsel
has looked into statutory obligation, and their review indicates that
there  is  no  statutory  restriction  in  our  using  other  than  Coast
Guard  icebreaker  services,  whether  they  are  commercial  or  other
nations’.  We  derived  part  of  our  guidance  from  the  Presidential
Memorandum  Number  6646  on  U.S.  Antarctic  Policy  and  Pro-
grams,  and  that  goes  way  back.  It  was  dated  February  5,  1982
when  the  Coast  Guard  was  in  the  Department  of  Transportation.
And  that  provided  the  Department  of  Defense  and  Coast  Guard  a
continuing  role  in  Antarctic  logistics  to  ensure  that  the  United
States  has  the  necessary  flexibility  and  operational  reach  in  the
area, which goes beyond research or science and engineering.

On  the  other  hand,  that  directive  also  pointed  out  that  every  ef-
fort  should  be  made  to  manage  the  United  States  Antarctic  Pro-
gram  in  a  manner  that  maximizes  cost  effectiveness.  And  then  it
goes  on  to  say  that  it  authorizes  the  NSF  to  use  commercial  sup-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

port when it is determined to be cost effective and not detrimental
to the national——

Ms. HOOLEY. Does OMB agree with you?
Dr. BEMENT. Well, this is just a finding that has just come to my
attention within the last day or two. We have not yet had a chance
to discuss this with OMB.

Ms. HOOLEY. Okay. I have used more than my time. Thank you,

Mr. Chair.

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Ms. Hooley.
At this point, I would be happy to recognize Mr. Johnson.
Mr.  JOHNSON.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  the  courtesy  of  al-
lowing  me  to  ask  the  question,  given  the  structure  to  today’s  proc-
ess back in the office. I do appreciate it.

I would like to address this question to Dr. Bement, Director.
As  you  know,  I  represent  the  University  of  Illinois,  which  is  the
home of the Beckman Center, among others, and we are very proud
of that. And so this question, at least revolves in part, around that
reality.

is,  as  we  all  know,  a  key  element  of 

In  the  fiscal  year  2006  budget  request  you  have  stated  that  pro-
viding  cyberinfrastructure  is  one  of  your  top  priorities.  Supercom-
puting 
robust
cyberinfrastructure,  and  NSF  supports  those  key  national  centers
that  provide  supercomputing  facilities  and  expertise,  including  the
National Center for Supercomputing Applications in my hometown.
The  budget  request  indicates  that  approximately,  and  this  is  a
quote, $19 million will be provided for selective cyberinfrastructure
enhancements  in  the  fiscal  year  2006.  How  much  of  this  upgrade
funding  will  go  to  hardware  for  supercomputing  centers?  And  how
and  when  will  you  decide  what  upgrades  are  needed  and  when?  I
know that sounds like a bit scripted question, but——

Dr. BEMENT. No, no. It is a good question. I might point out par-

enthetically that Champaign is very close to Bement, Illinois.

Mr.  JOHNSON.  It  is,  indeed.  That  is  one  of  the  finest  country  op-
eras  in  the  United  States,  so  in  case  you  ever  have  time  to  visit
Champaign,  see  the  supercomputer,  and  you  are  into  country
music,  come  over  with  me  to  the  Bement  Bowl,  and  we  will  have
a good time.

Dr. BEMENT. Thank you, Mr. Johnson.
Total  investment  in  cyberinfrastructure  for  2006  is  at  $509  mil-
lion,  which  is  a  substantial  increase  over  our  2005  enacted  level.
And  a  good  part  of  that  is  in  high-end  computing,  and  not  just  in
architecture,  but  also  in  software  tools  and  also  in  networking  as
well  as  interface  tools.  So  we  are  looking  at  it  as  a  total  system.
We  continue  to  support  the  supercomputing  centers,  including
the ones in San Diego, Illinois, and Pittsburgh. And we have made
investments to upgrade their facilities to the latest capabilities that
are  commercially  available.  In  addition  to  that,  we  are  trying  to
further  integrate  them  into  our  Teragrid,  which  provides  a  broad
network  for  very  high  bandwidth  computing  and  data  streaming
within  the  science  community.  They  were  just—I  just  recently  au-
thorized  an  advisory  committee  that  links  all  of  these  operations
together to further leverage their capabilities and find new ways to
serve the scientific community as part of our shared infrastructure
in cyber tools.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

So  I  think  our  program  is  well  balanced,  in  my  opinion.  I  think
we  are  paying  attention  to  at  least  the  near-term  needs  of  the  sci-
entific community within our budget flexibility, and we are looking
at all of the elements, including higher-end language and new algo-
rithm  development  that  will  be  required  to  use  super-high-end
computing.

Mr.  JOHNSON.  Well,  let  me  just  underscore  the  significances  of
NSF  to  our  specific  facility,  what  an  outstanding  job  you  do,  what
a  good  cooperative  relationship  there  is  nationwide.  And  without
sounding  provincial,  I  think  anyone  who  understands  the  area
would  understand  that  ours  is  among  the  finest,  if  not  the  finest,
facility in the country, and its impact nationwide is something that
not  only  we  are  very  proud  of,  but  the  country  is—relies  in  large
or small part on in terms of the whole matrix. And so we are very
grateful and hope that you will put us higher on your radar screen
in terms of future, not only allocations, but prioritization.

Dr. BEMENT. Thank you. We will.
Mr.  JOHNSON.  And  you  are  also  welcome  to  join  us,  not  only  at
the Bement Bowl and at the Beckman Center, but on April 5, 2005
when  we  celebrate  the  national  championship  at  the  University  of
Illinois. And we will make it a three-fer, and you will be one of our
guests as we introduce the national champions.

Dr. BEMENT. I would love to see that game. Thank you.
Chairman INGLIS. Mr. Lipinski.
Mr.  LIPINSKI.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  I  thank  the  other
Chairman  now  taking  the  seat  there  for  holding  this  hearing.  And
I  will  make  sure  I  don’t  go  too  much  over  time,  although  I  see  my
time hasn’t started, which is good.

Oh,  there  you  go.  I  know  what  a  tough  man  the  Chairman  is

here, so I will be careful.

I  have  a  rather  unique  perspective.  I  have  a  mechanical  engi-
neering  degree,  and  we  actually  have  the  head  of  a  company  that
I had applied for a job at—back 20 years ago, and I chided him jok-
ingly on how he crushed my hopes as a young mechanical engineer
by  not  offering  me  a  job  at  that  time.  And  I  have  since  moved  on,
but  one  thing  I  did  between  here  and  there  was  I  was  a  political
science  graduate  student.  I  got  my  Ph.D.  in  political  science.  And
Dr. Bement, I am happy to say that I did apply for an NSF grant,
and  I  did  receive  the  NSF  grant,  so  you  know,  you  are  in  a—from
that  perspective,  you  are  in  a  much  better  position  than  the  wit-
nesses that I have talked to before.

Okay.  I  am—because  of  my  background,  both  as  an  engineer—
well, from being an engineer of science and math education, I know
how  important  it  is  in  K–12  and  higher  education  and  also  the—
to  tell  you  the  truth,  I  didn’t  know  until  I  went  to  grad  school  in
political  science  that  social  sciences  were  funded,  also,  with  NSF
grants.

One  thing  that—I  am  echoing  some  of  Ms.  Hooley’s  concerns,  I
have  seen,  through  my  experiences,  a  real  lack  of  connection  be-
tween higher education and K–12. I always felt that more could be
done  with  university  research  and  the  faculty  at  universities  to
help  with  science  and  math  education  in  the  K–12  level.  And  I
think NSF is in a unique position to help to make that connection.
So  I  just—you  know,  I  just  want  to  say  I  would  like  to  see  NSF

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

doing  more  of  that,  and  I  encourage,  you  know,  more  of  that,  be-
cause  I  think  it  could  be  extremely  helpful,  especially  in  science
and math.

But  what  I  wanted  to  ask  Dr.  Bement  about  is  the  research
grants  for  NSF,  the  funding  has  been  increased  for—the  proposed
increase  for  research  project  support  is  0.3  percent,  but  it  also,  I
see, the budget says that, you know, for fiscal year 2006, you want
to increase the success rate while maintaining grant size and dura-
tion,  which  the  only  way  to  accomplish  that  would  be  to  somehow
discourage  proposals  from  coming  in.  And  so  I  was  just  wondering
what  the  plan  is  there.  Of  course,  I  would  like  to  see  much  more
funding  for  these  grants,  but  specifically  to  that  question,  you
know,  how  is  it  possible  to  do  both  of  those  things,  increase
success——

Dr. BEMENT. Yes.
Mr. LIPINSKI.—and maintain the same level of funding while you

are, you know, flat-lined in growth?

Dr.  BEMENT.  There  are  many  practical  ways  of  doing  that.  One
is  we  have  both  solicited  and  unsolicited  proposals.  The  one  thing
we really want to encourage is more unsolicited proposals, because
many of those are closer to the frontier, and many of them support
newer,  untenured  faculty  as  well  as  minority  faculty  coming  into
the academic workplace.

The success rate of some of our solicited proposals has been very
low,  too  low,  in  some  cases,  as  low  as  10  percent.  Part  of  that  is
because  we  weren’t  focused  enough  in  our  solicitation.  Part  of  it  is
we did not indicate to the community initially what the likely suc-
cess  rate  would  be,  so  we  are  going  to  correct  that.  And  hopefully,
that will reduce the proposal volume for a small amount of funding.
Secondly, we are going to limit our solicitations to only those key
programs  that  are  essential  to  our  major  priorities  within  the
Foundation.  So  that  will  reduce  the  number  of  solicitations.  And
that  should,  also,  automatically  help  increase  our  success  rate.  In
some  cases,  in  awards  that  we  are  making  under  solicitations,  in-
stead  of  giving  all  of  the  awards  in  one  year,  we  are  extending  it
over two years. So we are stretching our resources for each solicita-
tion.

And  then  finally,  we  are  taking  a  hard  look  at  our  centers  pro-
grams,  and  this  is  an  area  that  we  are  engaged  with  the  Board,
the  Board  will  be  working  with  us  on  this,  because  it  has  had
Board  interest,  to  look  at  the  balance  between  multi-investigator
awards  as  centers  versus  individual  and  small  group  awards
through our unsolicited proposals.

For centers that are reaching end of life where they are no longer
working at the frontier or they are not meeting the criteria that we
expect,  we  will  be  phasing  those  out  and  moving  those  resources
back  to  the  frontier  to  help  support  more  individual  and  small
group awards.

And  that  is  just  a  few  examples  of  a  large  number  of  initiatives
we  are  taking.  But  we  feel  that  by  refocusing,  by  working  more
closely with the community so that their expectations are not over-
blown,  we  will  be  able  to,  even  within  our  given  resources,  turn
around our decline in success rate. It is not going to go up dramati-
cally  without  new  resources,  but  at  least  we  will  halt  the  erosion.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

Duke.

Mr. LIPINSKI. Thank you.
Chairman  INGLIS.  The  gentleman  could  have  mentioned  that  he
has got his Ph.D. from a great school, my alma mater, from college.
So——

Mr.  LIPINSKI.  You  know,  that  is  terrible  that  I  didn’t  mention

Chairman INGLIS. There we go. There we go.
Now  that  Dr.  Lipinski  has  fixed  that,  we  are  going  to  go  down
to Mr. Sodrel to find out whether Indiana is in the NCAA. Are you
doing all right?

Mr.  SODREL.  Yes,  Mr.  Chairman.  We  are—the  reason  he  says
that,  I  use—in  the  9th  District  in  the  bulletin,  so  I  have  to  stick
up for IU.

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
You  know,  you  pointed  out  in  your  opening  statement  that  R&D
used  to  be—perform  basic  research  by  Bell  Labs,  by  IBM,  Xerox,
and  a  lot  of  the  large  corporations,  and  less  of  that  is  being  done
today.

And forgive me, but I am a new Committee Member, so this may
sound  like  an  elementary  question,  but  I  would  like  to  know  if,
when  we  develop  technology  with  public  tax  dollars,  how  do  we
then transfer that to the private sector? In other words, who main-
tains the intellectual property rights to technologies that are devel-
oped  with  taxpayer-funded  research?  And  Dr.  Bement,  would  you
be best to answer that?

Dr.  BEMENT.  I  think  there  are  two  or  three  components  of  the

question.

First of all, an investment in the National Science Foundation re-
search tends to support graduate students who do the research, so
there  is  the  education  component  at  the  higher  level  within  the
universities.  That  graduate  talent  then  goes  into  industry  and
transfers the knowledge into industry, so that is a direct technology
transfer.  And  part  of  that  intellectual  property  is  with  the  indi-
vidual.

As far as intellectual property that deals with patents and copy-
rights, those rights remain with the university, and it is the obliga-
tion  of  the  university  to  see  that  those  rights  are  broadly  applied
through  licensing  in  the  private  sector.  And  I  think,  by  and  large,
they  do  that  quite  well.  Many  universities  are  not  looking  for  rev-
enue.  They  are  looking  for  applying  those  resources  back  into  fur-
ther research in order to refine those new technologies. So it really
can work as a close partnership between the private sector and the
academic sector.

But I am only making a point that I think public sector resources
are  being  used  very  wisely  and  very  effectively  in  supporting  the
private sector in their research objectives.

Mr.  SODREL.  I  just  wanted  to  understand  how  the  relationship
worked.  And  how—what  do  we  do  to  ensure  that  the  benefit  that
we  derive  from  the  research  and  development  is  not  immediately
exported to some of our world competitors?

Dr. BEMENT. I would think that is a two-way street. I don’t think
we  have  very  much  of  a  role  in  trying  to  either  regulate  or  keep
track  of  that,  but  there  are  any  number  of  articles  that  deal  with
that.  I  would  like  to  point  out  that  a  lot  of  the  research  is  being

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

done by international students. And some of those students remain,
and some of them go back to their home countries, so there is tech-
nology  transfer  happening  both  ways  all  around  the  world.  And
most  of  the  large  corporations  that  I  know  of  bring  in  top  talent,
and  they  use  them  as  hunter-gatherer  technologists.  Their  role  is
to  go  around  the  world  and  scoop  up  anything  they  can  get,  bring
it back home, add their own intellectual property, and then get an
edge  in  the  marketplace.  So  it  is  a  worldwide  game  at  the  present
time.

Mr.  SODREL.  Thank  you.  I  just  wanted  to  understand  how  the

system worked, and thank you, Mr. Chairman.

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you.
Mr. Gutknecht.
Mr. GUTKNECHT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Since  everybody  is  talking  about  basketball,  I  don’t  know  if  the
Colorado  School  of  Mines  is  going  to  be  in  the  NCAA  tournament,
but  I  think  anybody  who  graduated  from  there  is  all  right  by  me.
And Dr. Bement, I want to just change the course just a minute,
and I apologize. Many of us have other meetings, but I think every
Member  of  this  committee  takes  the  work  of  the  National  Science
Foundation,  particularly  your  work,  very  seriously.  And  we  only
wish that budget constraints weren’t what they are. And so we are
going  to  ask  you  to  do  more  with  less,  and  we  apologize  for  that
in advance.

I  want  to  bring  your  attention,  though,  to  an  issue  that  I  have
a  great  concern  about,  and  that  is  we  have,  over  the  last  several
years,  essentially  given  you  more,  NSF,  latitude  in  how  they  deal
with  agricultural  research.  And  there  is  one  area  that  I  just  want
to  call  your  attention  to,  and  I  am  not  going  to  try  and  ask  you
to  take  a  position  on  this,  but  at  least  to  have  you  consider  this.
And that is, within that smear of agricultural research, I hope that
you  will  at  least  pay  some  attention  to  a  growing  concern  that  we
have, and that is that the potential of viruses, we know this is hap-
pening now, where they literally leap from ducks to pigs to us. And
there  are  a  number  of  interesting  research  projects  underway
around  the  country,  and  I  will  be  a  bit  parochial,  in  my  District,
in particular, and I would just encourage you to, you know, at least
reflect on the fact that you do have that latitude, and we hope that
you will use that wisely.

Dr. BEMENT. Thank you, Congressman Gutknecht.
Let me respond in this way.
We  have  now  a  robust  program  in  plant  genomics  and  also  a
grant  program  in  microbial  genomics,  which  we  carry  on  in  close
cooperation  with  the  Department  of  Agriculture,  and  that  coopera-
tion  is  to  assure  that  there  is  not  an  excessive  overlap  and  that
those programs are mutually reinforcing.

In the area of bacterial and viral diseases, we do have a program
in  the  ecology  of  infectious  disease  and  also  in  prion  diseases  that
we  are  also  carrying  out  jointly  with  the  National  Institutes  of
Health  and  also  the  Department  of  Agriculture.  So  that—first  of
all,  we  are  paying  attention  to  these  major  national  issues  and
problems.  And  secondly,  we  are  trying  to  leverage  our  programs
with other agencies, through interagency cooperation.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

Mr.  GUTKNECHT.  I  only  have  a  second  left,  but  just  let  me  tell
you  that  I  would  be  more  than  happy  to  work  with  you  and  your
office on all of those, because I do have a particular and a keen in-
terest in those particular areas.

So thank you very much, Dr. Bement.
Dr. BEMENT. And we welcome that.
Thank you.
Mr. GUTKNECHT. Thank you.
Chairman INGLIS. We now have time for a second round of ques-

tions and then I would recognize Ms. Hooley.

Ms.  HOOLEY.  Thank  you.  Unfortunately,  I  have  to  say  none  of

the Oregon teams are in the finals this year.

I  have  really  just  one  question.  Dr.  Wrighton,  in  his  testimony,
indicated  that  NSF  management  has  developed  a  draft  corrective
action  plan  in  coordination  with  the  IG’s  Office,  which  will  be  pre-
sented  to  the  National  Science  Board.  Dr.  Bement  and  Dr.  Boesz,
is this the case, and when will this plan be available?

Dr. BEMENT. First of all, it is the case. We have been negotiating
with  our  auditor,  KPMG,  on  some  of  the  issues  that  they  have
brought out in their audit a year ago. We feel we have a corrective
action  plan  that  satisfies  most  of  the  issues  that  we  raised  with
them,  but  we  haven’t  gotten  complete  closure.  But  we  do  plan  to
bring our progress before the National Science Board and the Audit
and  Oversight  Committee,  which  Dr.  Wrighton  chairs,  at  the  com-
ing March meeting, which is later this month.

Ms. HOOLEY. You need to turn on your microphone.
Dr. BOESZ. I can add that my office received this corrective action

plan about two or three weeks ago, and we are——

Ms. HOOLEY. Okay.
Dr.  BOESZ.—actively  in  the  progress  of  reviewing  it  right  now.
We  do  contract  as  part  of  the  audit  function  with  KPMG,  and  so
they are also a part of this process. And we do expect to have this
resolved by the time of the Board meeting at the end of this month.

Ms. HOOLEY. Okay. Thank you.
Just  for  all  of  you,  I  think.  I  am  concerned  about  the  cost  of  the
Coast Guard icebreakers and what that will do to your budget. And
I  guess  I  am  offering  that  if  there  is  anything  we  can  do  to  help
with  that  particular  issue,  we  want  to  make  sure  that  the  money
is  spent  as  wisely  as  possible  and  that  this  isn’t  something  that
ends up breaking your back.

Dr.  BEMENT.  Thank  you  very  much.  These  icebreakers  are  near-

ing their end of life.

Ms. HOOLEY. Right. I understand that, which——
Dr. BEMENT. And the maintenance, as it gets closer to end of life,
keeps  going  up  each  year.  And  if  it  gets  beyond  the  resources  we
have  set  aside,  then,  of  course,  it  has  an  impact  on  our  logistics
support and our research support in the polar programs. And I am
charging  myself  to  guard  against  that  as  much  as  I  can,  and  that
is going to mean that we are going to have to engage very coopera-
tively  with  the  Coast  Guard  to  determine  what  options  will  mini-
mize  icebreaker  costs  going  forward.  And  that  is  what  we  are  en-
gaged in at the present time.

Ms. HOOLEY. Thank you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

Chairman  INGLIS.  I  will,  at  this  point,  recognize  myself  for  an-

And  I  want  to  follow  up  on  Ms.  Hooley’s  question  just  then,  Dr.

other round of questions.

Bement.

I  am  concerned,  as  well,  about  the  transfer,  particularly  if  the
$48  million  turns  into  a  negotiation  for  a  $75  million  transfer  to
operate  what  had  been  a  $48  million  program.  How  can  we  help?
Dr. BEMENT. I should call on Dr. Erb to qualify my answer. Part
of  that—most  of  that  $75  million  is  for  complete  refurbishment.  It
is not for ongoing, recurring operation and maintenance.

Chairman INGLIS. Okay.
Dr.  BEMENT.  Whether  we  do  that  in  one  year  or  whether  we  do
that  in  two  years  is  something  we  really  need  to  understand,  but
let me call on Dr. Erb to amplify that.

Dr.  ERB.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  am  Karl  Erb,  Director  of  the  Office  of

Polar Programs at NSF.

We  have  been  told  by  the  Coast  Guard  in  discussions  last  fall
that  they  estimate  a  need  of  between  $70  and  $75  million  a  year
for each of the next four or five years to keep the ships operational
until  they  can  go  into  what  they  call  a  service  life  extension  pro-
gram,  which  I  believe  they  estimate  as  a  $600  million  activity.  So
we  are  talking  with  them  now  to  see  what  our  options  are  to,  as
Dr. Bement said, meet those requirements within our ability of the
funds we have. And it is just much too early for me to predict how
that is going to come out.

Chairman  INGLIS.  Well,  I  hope  as  it  goes  along  that  you  will  let

us know how we might be helpful.

Dr. ERB. Thank you, sir.
Yes, sir.
Chairman INGLIS. And I appreciate your input here.
Dr.  Wrighton,  I  wonder  if—as  the  one  who  has  involvement  at
the  Board,  what  question  have  we  not  asked  here  today  that  we
should be asking about the direction of NSF and what do you wish
we had been asking?

Dr. WRIGHTON. I think you have shown great interest, and great
questions  have  come  forward  already.  I  think,  speaking  for  the
Board,  we  see  a  great  opportunity  for  the  best  to  become  better.
And  America’s  investment  in  science  and  engineering  education
and research has been strong.

But  I  think  one  of  the  issues  that  we  face  looking  ahead  is  how
competitive  will  we  be  in  the  world,  considering  essentially  level
funding? While I think we can do more with less, as was suggested,
and  all  of  us  are  anxious  to  improve  efficiency,  I  think  we  need  to
be  cognizant  that  the  developing  world,  India  and  China  in  par-
ticular, are developing investments in science and engineering that
are destined to be very competitive in the future.

So  for  us  to  sustain  our  preeminence  in  important  areas  of
science and technology, I believe that we are going to have to make
an even greater investment in finding not only the best science and
engineering  to  support,  but  the  highest  impact  science  and  engi-
neering.  And  we,  at  the  Board,  are  certainly  interested  in  enhanc-
ing budgets. I think everybody acknowledges that probably no level
of  support  for  the  Foundation  would  be  adequate  to  support  all  of
the great ideas that the investigators could come forward with. But

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

I  think  we  need  to  keep  our  eye  on  those  areas  of  special  impor-
tance and setting the priorities for the investments will be very im-
portant. But overall, I think our competitiveness, as a Nation, will
hinge on ramping up our investment in science and engineering in
ways  that  allow  us  to  remain  preeminent.  These  investments  are
a  source  of  innovation  for  America,  and  I  think  nothing  will  be
more important than securing our economic well being.

Chairman  INGLIS.  Yes,  and  as  we  come  to  a  close  here,  I  just
want  to  underscore  that  and  point  out  that,  you  know,  if  we  enter
into  free  trade  policies  that  basically  mean  that  we  are  challenged
on  the  manufacturing  aspects  and  particularly  where  labor  is  a
major  input,  then  the  answer  is  that  we  are  the  innovators,  that
we  can  stay  ahead  of  the  competition  by  innovation.  Well,  that
means that we are looking to you all to help us innovate. And you
are,  of  course,  looking  to  us  to  get  the  appropriate  resource  level
to be able to carry that out, because if we are going to stay, as you
put  in  your  testimony,  preeminent  in  discovery  and  innovation,
then you have got to spend money on it. And you have got to spend
it  wisely,  as  Dr.  Boesz  points  out.  And  you  have  got  to  spend  it
with vision and creativity.

Thank  you  very  much  to  our  panel  for  being  here  today.  Dr.
Bement,  Dr.  Wrighton,  and  Dr.  Boesz,  we  appreciate  your  time
here this morning.

And if there is no objection, the record will remain open for addi-
tional  statements  from  Members  and  for  answers  to  any  follow-up
questions  submitted  that  the  Subcommittee  may  ask  of  the  panel-
ists. Without objection, that is ordered.

And the hearing is now adjourned. Thank you.
[Whereupon, at 11:20 a.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(57)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

Responses by Arden L. Bement, Jr., Director, National Science Foundation

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Questions submitted by Chairman Bob Inglis

Award Oversight and Management
Q1. Staffing  shortages  at  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  have  impeded
NSF’s ability to conduct post-award management and to manage its portfolio of
large  facilities  projects.  Assuming  the  Foundation  were  provided  adequate  re-
sources  to  address  these  staffing  requirements,  how  many  additional  full-time-
equivalents does NSF need to assign to each of these two areas?

A1. At  any  given  time,  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  is  managing  an  ac-
tive  portfolio  of  approximately  35,000  awards  to  over  2,000  institutions.  Effective
oversight is accomplished through the combined efforts of NSF’s program, financial,
and administrative staff. This oversight is not confined to one part of an award life
cycle but follows a continuum from solicitation through the close out of the program
activity.

NSF  has  identified  certain  factors  that  indicate  a  high  potential  for  award  and
funding risk. To address this, NSF has, over the last several years, developed a pro-
gram of on-site, post-award monitoring and oversight. A key element of the program
is a dynamic multi-level risk assessment framework comprised of objective and sub-
jective  factors  applied  to  the  overall  award  universe;  these  may  be  technical,  finan-
cial,  or  administrative.  This  risk  framework  helps  guide  decision  making  insofar  as
how  best  to  deploy  staff  resources  for  more  targeted  oversight.  Non-facility  awards
are  addressed  through  the  Post-Award  Monitoring  and  Business  Assistance  Pro-
gram Site Visit Review Guide led by the Division of Institution and Award Support,
a  division  created  to  put  additional  focus  on  this  issue.  Large  facilities  are  subject
to a Total System Business Review.

As  part  of  competitive  sourcing  initiative,  NSF  has  identified  a  number  of  activi-
ties  that  support  overall  monitoring  as  suitable  for  contract  assistance.  Given  that,
and  based  on  the  to-date  implementation  of  the  monitoring  program,  the  23  FTEs
requested  in  FY  2006  will  be  used  to  grow  NSF’s  risk-based  oversight  efforts  in  a
responsible, reasonable manner. This assumes that other resource demands remain
constant.  Note  that  because  NSF’s  award  monitoring  and  oversight  is  an  agency-
wide effort that involves program staff within the directorates as well as various ad-
ministrative  staff,  the  requested  FTEs  are  to  be  allocated  throughout  the  agency.

Post-award Monitoring
Q2. Post-award  management  is  critical  both  to  allow  NSF  program  managers  to  be
aware of the scientific results of NSF-funded research and to ensure that govern-
ment funds are spent appropriately.
What changes is NSF making to its post-award monitoring processes in response
to  the  recommendations  of  the  Inspector  General  and  the  IBM  reports  on  this
topic?

A2. IBM’s  Post-Award  Monitoring  Assessment  Report  was  prepared  at  NSF’s  re-
quest  as  a  review  and  gap  analysis  of  the  Foundation’s  monitoring  procedures  and
practices.  Overall,  IBM  noted  that  NSF  has  a  sound  program  of  post-award  moni-
toring but made several recommendations. In response, NSF management agreed to
initiate  a  series  of  information  exchanges  with  Office  of  Inspector  General  (OIG)
Audit Staff and KPMG, the external auditor for the NSF Financial Statement Audit.
Components of the NSF corrective action plan are below:

evaluate it annually for potential improvements.

• NSF management has improved the FY 2005 risk assessment model and will
• NSF  is  proceeding  with  a  plan  to  conduct  advanced  monitoring,  which  refers
to  targeted  business  system  reviews  carried  out  at  institutions  that  manage
high risk awards as determined through risk assessments (see answer below).
Advanced  monitoring  supplements  baseline  monitoring  done  for  all  NSF
awards.
• NSF is proceeding with a plan to conduct baseline monitoring. Baseline moni-
toring is carried out in a systemic and automated fashion for all awards; this
is  supplemented  by  standardized  staff  processes  and  specialized  reviews.  As
an  enhancement  to  baseline  monitoring,  NSF  is  contracting  out  for  focused

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

reviews  of  Federal  Cash  Transaction  Report  data  that  will  be  drawn  from  a
statistically valid sample of the medium and low risk universe.

• NSF is focusing on opportunities for improvement for advanced monitoring as
identified in the IBM report and underscored by the independent auditors as
being  most  significant.  This  includes  addressing  site  visit  duration,  program
participation, pre-visit communication, awardee feedback, follow-up and issue
resolution,  program  and  OIG  input  into  site  visit  plans,  communication  and
collaboration  between  NSF  and  OIG  staff,  dissemination  of  the  annual  moni-
toring plan, systems automation, post-award monitoring staffing, NSF cost to
perform  post-award  monitoring,  awardee  cost  to  participate  in  post-award
monitoring,  contracting  out  certain  post-award  monitoring  activities,  cross
training opportunities, formal post-award monitoring training, report writing,
documentation,  a  database  to  maintain  results,  and  dissemination  of  overall
findings and lessons learned.

• NSF  has  increased  the  overall  resources  deployed  for  post-award  monitoring
and  will  continue  these  increases  until  management  deems  them  to  be  suffi-
cient.

Q3. Dr.  Boesz  testified  that  NSF  provides  extra  scrutiny  to  high-risk  projects.  How
do you define high-risk and what extra monitoring procedures do you follow for
these projects? Have these procedures been effective? What protocols are in place
to oversee lower- and medium-risk awards?

A3. All  NSF  awards  are  assessed  annually  for  financial  and  administrative  risk
using  objective  criteria  such  as  type  of  awardee  organization,  dollar  amount  of
award,  whether  NSF  is  cognizant  for  federal  oversight,  whether  the  awardee  is  a
new federal awardee, complexity of the award instrument, cost sharing, sub-awards,
participant  support,  and  equipment.  High-risk  awards  are  identified  via  a  set  of
weighted  objective  factors  applied  to  the  award  universe.  Examples  of  such  factors
include  dollar  amounts  of  the  award,  sub-awards,  and  cost  sharing.  These  factors
are  assigned  point  values,  and  the  resulting  point  value,  once  all  factors  are  ac-
counted  for  and  totaled,  determine  the  classification  of  the  award  as  low,  medium
or high risk. Objective criteria applied for the FY 2005 Risk Assessment model iden-
tified 252 awards made to 167 institutions as high risk.

After  the  objective  assessment,  high  risk  awards  are  further  reviewed  using  sub-
jective  factors.  These  include  programmatic,  administrative,  financial,  and/or  OIG
concerns.  Of  the  167  institutions  previously  identified  as  high  risk,  52  were  elimi-
nated  because  they  were  subject  to  Office  of  Budget,  Finance,  and  Award  Manage-
ment site visits or OIG-conducted audits in the last four years, are currently on the
OIG audit plan, are subject to total business systems reviews, or had OIG-conducted
audit  reports  issued  within  the  last  four  years.  Also  eliminated  were  49  organiza-
tions whose high risk awards were due to expire.

Finally, of the 66 remaining institutions, NSF considered the total risk points as-
signed  to  an  organization  as  well  as  its  type.  For  example,  organizations  managing
multiple  high  risk  awards  had  higher  risk  points  assigned.  After  applying  both  ob-
jective  and  subjective  criteria  as  outlined  in  the  Risk  Assessment  model,  NSF  se-
lected  24  to  30  institutions  for  post-award  monitoring  site  visits  in  FY  2005.  This
includes tribal colleges, school districts, nonprofit organizations, and academic insti-
tutions.

NSF has communicated this plan to NSF management and program staff as well
as  OIG.  NSF  will  continue  to  assess  its  awards  annually  and  will  coordinate  with
programmatic, administrative, and financial staff as well as with OIG to ensure that
high risk awards are closely monitored.

The  monitoring  procedures  that  NSF  follows  for  high  risk  projects  are  contained
in  the  Post-Award  Monitoring  and  Business  Assistance  Program  Site  Visit  Review
Guide. The guide contains roles and responsibilities, pre-site visit activities and pro-
cedures,  on-site  review  modules  that  can  be  tailored  for  each  visit,  post  site  visit
activities,  worksheet  appendices,  and  correspondence  appendices.  On-site  review
modules include both core and targeted sections:

• Core modules (included in all site visit reviews) include general management,
accounting and financial system review, and Federal Cash Transaction Report
(FCTR) reconciliation.
• Targeted  modules  (used  by  site  visit  teams  based  on  risk  factors  identified
during  the  risk  assessment)  include  time  and  effort  records  for  personnel,
fringe benefits, travel, consultants, cost sharing, participant support costs, in-
direct costs, procurement, sub-award and sub-recipient monitoring, and prop-
erty and equipment.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

The  Post-Award  Monitoring  and  Business  Assistance  Program  Site  Visit  Reviews
conducted  by  NSF  over  the  last  several  years  continue  to  mature  as  part  of  NSF’s
comprehensive  program.  Issues  have  been  identified  during  these  visits  and  follow
up  is  conducted.  For  institutions  that  have  had  the  benefit  of  this  business  assist-
ance visit, indications are that procedures have been effective.

For lower and medium risk awards, NSF’s baseline monitoring adheres to the Sin-
gle  Audit  Act  implemented  by  OMB  Circular  A–133.  Audits  performed  by  private
CPA firms contain attestations on internal controls, compliance with federal regula-
tions,  and  the  schedule  of  federal  financial  assistance.  In  addition,  OMB  has  des-
ignated  cognizant  federal  agencies  that  have  responsibility  for  overseeing  institu-
tions  to  ensure  that  the  awardee  financial  systems  and  internal  controls  comply
with federal requirements.

Baseline  monitoring  is  conducted  in  a  systemic  and  automated  fashion  for  all
awards  including  those  that  are  lower-  and  medium-risk.  This  is  supplemented  by
standardized staff processes and specialized reviews. As an enhancement to baseline
monitoring,  NSF  is  contracting  out  for  focused  reviews  of  FCTR  data  that  will  be
drawn from a statistically valid sample of the medium and low risk universe.

Deputy Director for Large Facility Projects
Q4. What  are  the  responsibilities  of  the  Deputy  Director  for  Large  Facility  Projects?
How does he fit into NSF’s process for selection and oversight of Major Research
Equipment  and  Facilities  Construction  projects?  What  human  and  technology
resources does he have? What authorities does he have?

A4. The  Deputy  Director  for  Large  Facility  Projects  serves  as  the  principal  advisor
on  facility  construction  and  project  management  to  the  Director  of  the  Office  of
Budget, Finance, and Award Management (BFA), also known as the Chief Financial
Officer.  The  Deputy  is  the  day-to-day  point  of  contact  with  senior  agency  officials,
NSF  program  managers,  and  awardee  managers  on  project  management  and  over-
sight matters relating to NSF’s large facility projects. The Deputy Director’s respon-
sibilities include:

• Advising  the  BFA  Director  on  problem  areas  and  opportunities,  and  recom-
mending  courses  of  action;  identifying  errors  in  judgment  and/or  time  that
could have serious effects on cost or schedule;
• Providing  assistance  to  NSF  program  managers  in  planning,  budgeting,  con-
structing,  and  operating  large  facility  projects—activities  that  extend  from
pre-conceptual  design  through  engineering  criteria,  site  selection,  construc-
tion, and/or acquisition, operations, and decommissioning;
• Directing  the  development,  initiation,  and  implementation  of  NSF  policies,
• Representing  NSF  in  meetings  with  other  federal  agencies,  OMB,  Congress,
and  other  oversight  or  investigative  bodies  on  all  matters  involving  the  busi-
ness operations oversight aspects of large facility projects;
• Conducting independent cost, schedule, and management reviews of large fa-
• Managing  the  annual  validation  reviews  for  large  facility  projects  for  inclu-

guidelines, and procedures for large facility projects;

cility projects; and,

sion in the fiscal budget process.

The  Deputy  Director  serves  on  all  Project  Advisory  Teams  (PAT),  the  NSF  advi-
sory group assembled by each program officer managing a large facility project. The
PAT  is  composed  of  representatives  from  BFA,  the  Office  of  the  General  Counsel,
program managers with experience and expertise in large projects, the Office of Leg-
islative and Public Affairs, and the Office of International Science and Engineering.
Through  their  expertise  in  grants  management,  contracts,  legal,  legislative,  and
international  aspects  of  project  management,  the  PATs  provide  facility  program
managers with advice on a regular basis.

NSF  is  currently  re-evaluating  this  position  to  ensure  that  it  has  the  right  mix
of responsibilities and authority to provide maximum benefit to the Foundation. The
authority  of  the  position  is  described  above.  The  NSF  Director  fully  supports  this
position  and  has  charged  the  Deputy  Director  for  Large  Facility  Projects  with  the
authority  to  act  in  his  name  with  respect  to  NSF’s  portfolio  of  large  projects.  The
Director has specifically delegated to the Deputy Director for Large Facility Projects
the  authority  to  convene  and  conduct  external  reviews  of  any  large  facility  projects
when professional judgment indicates there is reason to do so.

The  process  of  selecting  facility  projects  to  be  funded  in  the  Major  Research
Equipment  and  Facility  Construction  (MREFC)  account  begins  with  the  NSF  pro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

gram  manager  and  the  cognizant  Division  Director  and  Assistant  Director  recom-
mending  the  project  to  the  MREFC  Panel.  The  MREFC  Panel,  chaired  by  the  NSF
Deputy Director and composed of NSF senior management including the Deputy Di-
rector  for  Large  Facility  Projects  as  a  member  ex-officio,  reviews  and  recommends
which  projects  are  sent  forward  for  final  approval  to  the  NSF  Director  and  then  to
the National Science Board.

Presently,  1.5  FTEs  report  directly  to  the  Deputy  Director  for  Large  Facility
Projects.  In  addition,  as  a  line  manager  within  BFA,  the  Deputy  Director  can  call
on  the  resources  of  the  entire  BFA  staff.  Examples  include:  The  Division  of  Con-
tracts and Complex Agreements manages the award and administration of coopera-
tive  agreements  for  MREFC  projects;  the  Policy  Office  is  responsible  for  imple-
menting and issuing proposal, award, and acquisition policy for NSF programs; the
Division  of  Financial  Management  oversees  financial  policy  and  financial  manage-
ment  of  NSF;  and  the  Budget  Division  coordinates  development  of  NSF’s  annual
budget to OMB and Congress. All divisions participate in activities related to man-
agement  of  large  facility  projects;  the  Deputy  Director  relies  on  their  expertise  in
providing  the  best  advice  and  guidance  to  NSF  program  officers  in  planning,  budg-
eting, constructing, and operating large facility projects. NSF expects to fill two ad-
ditional positions in the near future. The Deputy Director for Large Facility Projects
requires no extraordinary technical resources.

NSF Business Analysis
Q5. NSF has contracted out for a multi-year, multi-million dollar Business Analysis

of NSF workforce and procedures. What is the status of this project?

A5. In  FY  2002,  NSF  initiated  a  comprehensive,  multi-year  Business  Analysis,  the
outcomes of which are informing Organizational Excellence investments now and for
the foreseeable future. The Business Analysis:

cess.

tribution to the NSF mission.

• Documented each of the agency’s core Business Processes and defined its con-
• Defined  process  effectiveness  and  efficiency  improvements  that  leverage  past
experience,  capitalize  on  best  practices  in  the  public  and  private  sectors,  and
respond to emerging mission-related trends.
• Is  developing  future-looking  Business  Process  scenarios  and  criteria  for  suc-
• Defined  a  Human  Capital  Management  Plan  to  provide  next-generation
human  capital  capabilities.  The  Plan  identifies  future-looking  workforce  com-
petencies  and  describes  human  capital  strategies  and  approaches  to  support
the  Business  Process  scenarios  and  to  capitalize  on  opportunities  afforded  by
Technology and Tools innovations.
• Is  defining  an  Integrated  Technology  and  Tools  Plan  (business  infrastructure
tools, knowledge bases, and technologies) that describes an overall integrated
technical  and  information  architecture  for  future  systems  and  capabilities  in
support of the agency’s Business Processes.

The  outcome  of  NSF’s  Business  Analysis  will  be  a  management  and  investment
strategy  focused  on  quality,  efficiency,  agility,  and  flexibility  and  was  designed  to
realize  the  agency’s  Human  Capital,  Business  Processes,  and  Technology  and  Tools
goals.

Major products from the Business Analysis were delivered at the end of FY 2003,
including a complete baseline documentation of the agency’s core business processes,
a  first  version  of  an  agency-wide  human  capital  management  plan,  and  a  first
iteration  of  an  enterprise  architecture.  This  work  underscores  two  fundamental
challenges facing NSF as it becomes a fully integrated organization capable of work-
ing  both  within  and  across  intellectual  organizational  boundaries:  (1)  maintaining
the  highest  levels  of  quality  in  merit  review  and  the  award  process,  and  (2)  main-
taining flexibility while promoting appropriate agency-wide standards.

During FY 2004, the Business Analysis effort addressed these challenges in a va-
riety  of  ways.  The  Analysis  identified  alternative,  more  efficient  methods  for  con-
ducting the proposal review process that maintain the integrity of the process.
Q6. What does NSF hope to gain from the results? Have any recommendations been
made  to  date?  If  so,  what  were  they  and  what  changes  has  NSF  undertaken  in
response?

A6. Based  on  Business  Analysis  findings,  the  Foundation  will  develop  more  formal
procedures for managing the technical risk of awards and assessing the contribution
of  NSF-funded  projects  to  the  advancement  of  science  and  engineering.  Currently,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

a  series  of  opportunities  for  process  improvement  in  both  of  the  key  business  proc-
esses  identified  above  are  under  review  by  agency  management.  Implementation  is
expected to begin this fiscal year.

NSF  also  capitalized  on  Business  Analysis  work  (e.g.,  an  employee  workload  sur-
vey  and  analysis)  to  effectively  implement  alternative  human  capital  management
approaches  to  increase  the  use  and  effectiveness  of  the  workforce.  In  2004,  as  a  re-
sult  of  Business  Analysis  findings,  NSF  laid  the  groundwork  for  conversion  from  a
task-based to a competency-based human resource management system and consoli-
dated several hundred existing job titles into 40 job families. These changes directly
link  workforce  planning,  recruitment,  development,  and  performance  management
activities  to  agency  business  strategy,  and  simplify  and  streamline  these  activities
for  NSF  management  and  staff.  The  electronic  jacket  human  capital  pilot  project
identified  a  set  of  useful  guidelines  for  change  management  at  NSF  that  are  being
employed  to  facilitate  the  planning  and  introduction  of  new  technologies  and  busi-
ness process improvements.

The Administrative Functions Study, currently under way, is designed to address
the  impact  of  rapidly  changing  work  processes,  shifts  in  workload,  and  advances  in
technology  on  the  Foundation’s  ability  to  efficiently  perform  its  administrative  du-
ties. The study is examining the distribution of administrative functions among staff
in  the  S&E  Directorates  and  will  recommend  strategies  to  better  align  those  func-
tions  in  support  of  the  NSF  mission.  The  study  will  evaluate  existing  NSF  staffing
models;  identify  new  or  modified  staffing  models;  define  competencies  for  positions
in  the  new  models;  and  propose  high  level  migration  strategies  to  assist  Divisions
and Directorates/Offices in transitioning, as appropriate, to any chosen model. Ulti-
mately,  the  result  is  alternative  career  paths  and  new  learning  maps  and  training
plans  for  NSF  staff  who  wish  to  manage  opportunities  for  future  career  develop-
ment.  Also  likely  is  that  this  study,  in  conjunction  with  other  business  analysis
work,  will  recommend  the  realignment  of  some  administrative  functions  within  or
among Divisions/Directorates/Offices.

The  Business  Analysis  also  provided  a  framework  for  integrating  NSF’s  informa-
tion  technology  (IT)  systems  across  the  agency  and  establishing  agency-wide  stand-
ards  for  IT  security,  functionality,  and  application  development.  Recent  focus  has
been  on  the  development  of  Baseline  and  Target  Architectures,  the  Information
Technology Implementation Plan, and The NSF Technology Governance Framework.
The  baseline  architecture  includes  a  complete  inventory  of  NSF’s  major  and  non-
major systems; identification of business processes, sub-processes, applications, tech-
nology,  and  data  deployed  at  NSF;  identification  of  major  areas  of  short  and  long-
term  improvements  and  recommendations;  and  an  analysis  of  business  processes
and services to identify redundancies and opportunities to introduce efficiencies.

The  Target  Technology  Architecture,  developed  in  2004,  focused  on  establishing
the  precepts  of  a  service-oriented  enterprise  architecture  (SOEA);  provides  a  vision
of  NSF’s  future  architecture;  links  together  organizational  goals,  lines  of  business
(BRM),  Service/Capabilities  (SRM),  systems  and  technologies  (TRM),  data  and  peo-
ple; and currently provides guidance for technology capital investments and several
infrastructure  initiatives  including  NSF’s  Portal,  Directory  Services  and  Identity
Management.

The  Integrated  IT  Implementation  Plan  provides  the  links  between  the  baseline
and  the  target  architecture  and  is  described  in  terms  of  10  major  IT  projects.  The
IT  Implementation  Plan  is  currently  being  used  to  guide  implementation  decisions
and  sequencing  of  programs  (e.g.,  the  acquisition  and  implementation  of  expanded
grants management capabilities via the Strategic Information Management and the
NSF  Identity  Management  and  Directory  Services  system)  and  includes  the  con-
structs  necessary  to  establish  NSF’s  technology  roadmap  for  the  next  five  to  seven
years; essentially, the IT Implementation Plan includes the tools to ‘‘operationalize’’
NSF’s Enterprise Architecture.

Prioritizing New Personnel Hires
Q7. In the past two years, NSF has requested and received slots for 50 new employ-
ees.  What  are  your  priorities  for  the  categories  of  new  personnel  you  have  hired
to  date  and  plan  to  hire  in  the  near  future,  and  how  did  you  determine  those
priorities?

A7. NSF’s priorities for new personnel are in the two categories below:

Science  and  Engineering  Staff—Science  and  engineering  researchers  and  edu-
cators with extensive, relevant professional experience oversee assigned areas of the
NSF  portfolio.  Their  primary  responsibilities  are:  a)  to  manage  science  and  engi-
neering programmatic resources within the context of NSF’s Strategic Plan by devel-
oping  forward-looking  solicitations  using  a  quality  merit  review  process  to  identify

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

the  most  promising  projects;  and  b)  to  implement  comprehensive  award  manage-
ment  and  oversight  procedures  to  ensure  that  the  agency’s  investments  contribute
optimally  to  the  Nation’s  scientific  and  engineering  leadership.  Duties  also  include
representing NSF in the global science and engineering community, participating in
program  development  and  evaluation  activities,  coordinating  with  other  organiza-
tions  and  stakeholder  groups,  and  ensuring  diverse  participation  in  review  and
funding procedures.

Business,  Operations,  and  Information  Staff—Business,  operations,  and  informa-
tion  professionals  create  and  support  state-of-the-art  business  processes  and  proce-
dures within the agency. They provide contemporary administrative leadership and
support within NSF as well as the broader stakeholder community of grantee orga-
nizations, principal investigators, and reviewers. Additionally, they analyze and con-
tribute  to  the  development  of  agency  policy,  provide  essential  project  management
capabilities,  and  perform  an  array  of  administrative  functions.  These  professionals
uphold  the  agency’s  robust  merit  review,  award,  and  financial  management  proc-
esses,  monitor  grants  and  cooperative  agreements,  implement  and  oversee  the  evo-
lution  of  the  enterprise  architecture,  recruit  and  train  agency  staff,  and  ensure  the
ongoing  health  and  security  of  agency  assets  and  resources,  financial  systems,  and
internal  controls.  Like  science  and  engineering  professionals  who  cross  traditional
disciplinary  boundaries,  the  agency’s  business,  operations,  and  information  profes-
sionals  provide  both  breadth  of  expertise  across  all  business  processes  and  proce-
dures  and  depth  in  key  existing  and  emerging  technical,  legal,  and  administrative
areas.
Q8. What role is the Business Analysis report playing in your decisions?
A8. The NSF Business Analysis played a key role in determining these staffing pri-
orities.  In  FY  2002,  NSF  initiated  a  comprehensive,  multi-year  Business  Analysis
study,  the  outcomes  of  which  are  informing  Organizational  Excellence  investments
for the foreseeable future. This study is a key element of NSF’s Administration and
Management  strategy,  a  concurrent  analysis  of  human  capital,  business  practices,
and  technology,  which  is  now  part  of  the  Organizational  Excellence  strategic  goal.
The  Business  Analysis  identified  Workload  of  Science  and  Engineering  and  Busi-
ness, Operations, and Information Staff as a strategic area to be addressed by NSF.
An  increase  in  the  volume  and  complexity  of  proposals  impacts  the  effectiveness  of
Program Directors and other Science and Engineering staff. NSF proposal workload
increased by 48 percent from 2000 to 2004; the volume of interdisciplinary proposals
requiring  cross-directorate  coordination  (e.g.,  nanotechnology,  biocomplexity  in  the
environment,  and  cyberinfrastructure)  increased  by  more  than  50  percent  over  a
three-year  period.  In  addition,  the  agency-wide  effort  to  improve  the  effectiveness
of  management  and  oversight  of  NSF  awards  increases  workload  demand  on  both
Science and Engineering and Business, Operations, and Information staff across the
Foundation.

In hiring new staff to address these pressing and immediate needs, NSF continues
to emphasize the recruitment and training of staff who are adept at crossing bound-
aries  between  disciplines,  traditionally  stove-piped  career  fields,  and  organizations.
These  individuals  will  both  create  and  respond  to  emerging  scientific  and  business
opportunities. New staff members are contributing to the attainment of NSF’s orga-
nizational  excellence  goal,  enabling  quality  merit  review,  award  management,  and
operations for an increasing number of proposals and increasingly complex projects.

Math and Science Partnership
Q9. In May 2004, the Office of the Inspector General completed its audit of the Math
and Science Partnership (MSP) Program at NSF. Among the findings, the audit
determined that the contract for evaluation of the overall program had not been
released and it appeared that milestones, target dates and deliverables for com-
pleting  the  evaluation  were  absent  or  still  under  development.  The  audit  also
found  that  some  of  the  individual  MSP  projects  did  not  have  the  systems  in
place  to  effectively  evaluate  their  progress  in  improving  teaching  and  learning.
What  is  the  status  of  both  the  overall  program  evaluation  and  the  evaluation
of individual projects?

A9. On May 18, 2004, NSF released a Request for Proposals (DACS–040017) for the
Program  Evaluation  of  the  Math  and  Science  Partnership  Program  (MSP–PE).  In
September  2004  COSMOS  Corporation,  in  partnership  with  Vanderbilt  University,
George  Mason  University  and  The  McKenzie  Group,  was  awarded  the  overall  pro-
gram  evaluation  contract.  The  contract  specified  the  milestones,  target  dates,  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

deliverables  necessary  to  accomplish  the  evaluation  process  at  the  program  level.
COSMOS has begun its work, which is ongoing.

The  overall  program  evaluation  (MSP–PE)  contract  awarded  in  September  2004
is  but  one  aspect  of  a  much  larger  and  more  comprehensive  package  of  MSP  data
collection  and  evaluation.  The  MSP–PE  builds  on  and  uses:  (a)  the  existing  MSP
Management  Information  System  (MSP–MIS),  previously  awarded  by  contract  to
Westat;  and  (b)  the  extensive  quantitative  and  qualitative  data  collected  and  re-
ported  by  each  funded  Partnership  project  since  the  project’s  initial  funding.  The
MSP–MIS  is  a  critical  component  of  the  overall  MSP  evaluation  package,  in  that
it brings consistency to the overall MSP data effort through the collection across all
funded Partnerships of common quantitative and qualitative data, including student
achievement  data  and  teacher  data.  The  MSP–MIS  is  the  primary  data  source  for
the  MSP–PE  and,  because  of  that  function,  its  role  in  an  overall  MSP  evaluation
is at least as important as that of the program evaluation contract.

For individual projects, the status of their evaluations is one of ongoing strength-
ening.  Since  the  first  awards  were  made  at  the  end  of  FY  2002,  the  MSP  has  been
incrementally increasing its oversight of project evaluation through the use of addi-
tional  external  review  of  evaluation  plans  and  evaluator  credentials,  as  well  as
through the ongoing critical site visits required of all Comprehensive MSP projects.
The  OIG  Audit  of  the  MSP  program  focused  on  a  small  sample  of  Partnership
projects  funded  in  the  first  competition.  The  Audit  Report  acknowledged  (p.3)  that
NSF  had  been,  in  later  solicitations,  more  explicit  in  articulating  requirements
about  quantitative  measurements  and  independent  evaluators.  Consonant  with  the
nature  of  a  Research  and  Development  effort,  all  aspects  of  MSP  evaluation  have
been continually strengthened since the program began.

Retention of Science and Engineers Majors
Q10. Surveys  of  college  freshmen  show  a  high  level  of  interest  in  science  and  engi-
neering  (S&E)  fields,  with  approximately  25–30  percent  of  students  intending
to  major  in  these  areas.  However,  during  the  course  of  their  undergraduate
years, many students move out of S&E and into other majors or out of college.
What is NSF doing to improve the retention of S&E majors, and how will these
efforts be maintained in light of level or declining budgets?

A10. Many  programs  at  NSF  are  aimed  to  improve  the  retention  of  undergraduate
S&E  majors.  NSF  supports  many  collaborative  alliances  between  different  types  of
institutions  that  are  designed  to  provide  a  seamless  transition  for  undergraduate
students  as  they  move  through  their  initial  years  as  majors  in  S&E  fields.  These
programs  and  alliances  are  active  in  all  50  states,  the  District  of  Columbia,  and
three  U.S.  territories;  at  approximately  900  different  universities;  and  with  over
20,000 undergraduate students involved (FY 2004 data). Efforts will be made to con-
tinue  the  thrust  of  these  programs  and  alliances  in  light  of  tight  budgets  and  com-
peting priorities.

One of these programs is the STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering and Math-
ematics)  Talent  Expansion  Program  (STEP),  which  has  a  goal  of  increasing  the
number  of  students  graduating  with  associate  and  baccalaureate  degrees  in  STEM
fields.  Projects  supported  by  STEP  use  a  variety  of  creative  approaches  to  attract
and  retain  students  in  S&E  fields.  As  an  example  of  this  program’s  impact,  esti-
mates  are  that  the  nineteen  projects  supported  by  STEP  in  FY  2004  will,  by  the
end  of  the  grant  period,  graduate  1,640  additional  STEM  majors  annually  beyond
those graduated in FY 2003.

NSF  undergraduate  scholarship  programs,  such  as  the  Computer  Science,  Engi-
neering  and  Mathematics  Scholarship  (CSEMS)  program  (funded  by  H1–B  visa
fees),  the  Federal  Cyber  Service:  Scholarship  for  Service  (SFS)  program,  and  the
Robert Noyce Scholarship program, help to retain science and engineering students
who  otherwise  would  not  stay  in  college  due  to  financial  difficulties.  The  projects
that  supply  student  scholarships  also  provide  mentoring  and  other  academic  and
student-support programming that helps to retain students.

NSF  programs  that  address  the  quality  of  undergraduate  education  also  poten-
tially have an impact on the retention of undergraduate students in S&E fields. The
Course, Curriculum and Laboratory Improvement (CCLI) program supports develop-
ment  of  new  S&E  learning  materials  and  tools  and  creative  teaching  methods  and
strategies that increase student learning. These new materials and approaches will
engage  a  broader  group  of  students,  increase  their  academic  success,  and  enhance
retention  of  students.  Similarly,  the  Advanced  Technological  Education  (ATE)  pro-
gram provides grants to strengthen the education of students in technologically ori-
ented associate degree programs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

Questions submitted by Representative Darlene Hooley

Graduate Fellowships and Traineeships
Q1. NSF has increased the size of stipends for graduate fellowships and traineeships

to $30,000 per year.
What  has  been  the  effect  on  numbers  of  applications  for  fellowships  and
traineeships  as  a  result  of  increasing  stipends,  and  in  particular,  the  effect  on
the number of applications from individuals from under-represented groups?

A1. The  total  number  of  applications  for  the  Graduate  Research  Fellowship  (GRF)
has consistently increased in recent years. The number of applications from women
and  minorities  has  also  increased,  although  in  differing  proportions.  Between  2002
and  2004,  applications  from  women  rose  by  35  percent  and  from  under-represented
minorities  by  27  percent.  However,  it  is  important  to  note  that  as  a  percentage  of
the  total  applicant  pool,  women  and  minorities  decreased  slightly  during  the  same
period. (The program is able to report numbers representing only those who identi-
fied themselves as members of under-represented groups).

The  overall  GRF  offer  acceptance  rate  (percentage  of  students  who  accept  the

GRF award) has increased with the increase in stipend levels.

While an overall increase in applications accompanied the improvement in the ab-
solute amount of stipends, other factors may account for the increase. This includes
economic factors and the relative size of the NSF stipends as compared to other fel-
lowships.
Q2. On what basis do you determine the proportion of funding for the fellowship pro-
gram  versus  the  traineeships  programs?  How  do  the  goals  of  these  two  types  of
graduate support programs differ?

A2. The goals of the NSF fellowship program and the two traineeship programs are
complementary. They seek to attract high quality domestic students to study in the
science  and  engineering  fields  and  to  broaden  and  strengthen  their  preparation  for
career success.

Within  the  Division  of  Graduate  Education,  budgets  for  the  traineeship  and  fel-
lowship  programs  are  fairly  close,  reflecting  the  importance  of  both  approaches  to
furthering  NSF’s  goals  in  the  preparation  of  future  scientists  and  engineers.  In
2005,  the  NSF  budget  is  $96.53  million  for  the  Graduate  Research  Fellowships
(GRF) program and $118.86 million for two traineeship programs ($68.97 million for
the Integrative Graduate Education and Traineeship (IGERT) and $49.89 million for
the  Graduate  Teaching  Fellows  in  GK–12  Education  (GK–12);  both  of  these  pro-
grams make awards to institutions, not directly to individuals).

Fellowships  are  awarded  to  individuals  directly  and  they  are  portable.  Students
submit applications to NSF for awards to support their masters and Ph.D. graduate
study. Over 9,000 applications are submitted annually to the GRF program; approxi-
mately 950 new awards are made each fiscal year.

For fellowships, panels of experts review applications. Selected students may take
the  award  to  an  appropriate  institution  of  the  student’s  choice.  If  the  student  is
studying  in  the  U.S.,  the  award  is  given  to  the  institution  annually  and  consists  of
a $30,000 stipend for the student and $10,500 for the cost of education that remains
with  the  institution.  If  studying  abroad,  the  award  is  provided  directly  to  the  stu-
dent.

Traineeships are awarded in clusters as part of a grant to an institution. The in-
stitution selects students to participate as trainees. Both IGERT and GK–12 provide
the same amount as the GRF program for stipends and cost of education allowance.
The  GK–12  program  emphasizes  communication  skills  and  prepares  graduates  to
share  their  scientific  expertise  with  a  wide  audience  and  for  a  variety  of  scientific
careers. IGERT traineeships prepare graduate students to be the scientists and en-
gineers of the future, prepared for careers of the 21st century.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

Q3. Does NSF have a goal for the proportion of fellowships and traineeships relative
to graduate research assistantships, which are funded under individual research
grants?

A3. The  National  Science  Board  has  addressed  the  issue  of  distribution  of  support
for  graduate  students  on  a  number  of  occasions.  The  2003  NSB  report  The  Science
and  Engineering  Workforce:  Realizing  America’s  Potential  includes  conclusions
drawn  by  a  1996  NSB  Task  Force  on  Graduate  and  Postdoctoral  Education  (1996).
Specifically,  the  Task  Force  reported  that,  ‘‘. . .despite  extensive  study,  we  find  in-
adequate data to compel a recommendation of a major shift in funding mode among
fellowship,  research  assistantships,  teaching  assistantships,  and  traineeships  for
supporting graduate education in science and engineering’’ (National Science Board,
The Science and Engineering Workforce: Realizing America’s Potential, p. 25, 2003).
The  proportion  of  fellowships  and  traineeships  relative  to  graduate  research
assistantships  is  determined  to  a  major  degree  by  the  number  and  size  of  research
grants.  Changes  in  the  budget  for  NSF’s  Research  and  Related  Activities  account
are  accompanied  by  similar  changes  in  the  number  of  research  assistantships  sup-
ported  because  they  are  important  features  of  those  grants.  University  applicants
for  research  grant  funding  often  include  graduate  student  funding  in  their  pro-
posals.

Research assistantships are not restricted to U.S. citizens and have no specific sti-
pend  requirement;  by  contrast,  fellowships  and  traineeships  are  restricted  to  U.S.
citizens or permanent residents and require a specific stipend plus an amount budg-
eted  for  tuition  and  fees.  NSF  supports  (indirectly)  almost  five  times  as  many  stu-
dents  with  research  assistantships  as  fellowships  and  traineeships.  Because  fellow-
ships and traineeships are typically not given for the full duration of a graduate stu-
dent’s  doctoral  education,  recipients  of  fellowships  and  traineeships  often  work  as
research assistants at some point during their doctoral studies.

High-End Computing and Cyberinfrastructure
Q4. How have the findings and recommendations of the interagency High-End Com-
puting  Revitalization  Task  Force  influenced  your  fiscal  year  (FY)  2006  budget
decisions,  and  how  does  high-end  computing,  particularly  making  leading  edge
supercomputers  available 
into  your
cyberinfrastructure plans?

community, 

research 

to 

the 

fit 

A4. High-end  computing  (HEC)  is  one  essential  component  in  the  national
cyberinfrastructure.  HEC  systems  and  services  are  critical  to  discovery,  learning,
and  innovation  in  many  science  and  engineering  domains.  Consequently,  NSF  re-
mains firmly committed to making HEC resources and services available to the open
science community. Recognizing that research challenges in different science and en-
gineering  domains  are  best  served  by  different  HEC  systems,  the  agency  pursues
an  architectural  diversity  strategy  for  HEC.  For  example,  leading-edge  HEC  sys-
tems  configured  with  high  input/output  bandwidth  and  moderate  interconnect
latencies  meet  the  data-intensive  computational  challenges  inherent  in  many  bio-
logical  and  biomedical  fields.  The  needs  of  the  climate  modeling  and  cosmology/as-
trophysics  communities  are  best  met  with  tightly-coupled  leading  edge  HEC  archi-
tectures configured with high interconnect bandwidths.

Since the HEC needs of the national science and engineering communities are di-
verse,  NSF  currently  supports  a  range  of  HEC  systems  and  related  services  pro-
vided via a number of provider organizations, including the National Center for At-
mospheric  Research,  the  National  Center  for  Supercomputing  Applications,  the
Pittsburgh  Supercomputing  Center,  Purdue  University,  the  San  Diego  Supercom-
puting  Center,  and  the  Texas  Advanced  Computing  Center.  Some  of  the  resources
provided  by  a  number  of  these  organizations  have  been  integrated  into  the  NSF-
funded  Extensible  Terascale  Facility  (ETF).  ETF  uses  advanced  technology  to  pro-
vide  a  unified  user  environment  in  which  researchers  and  educators  can  easily  ac-
cess a variety of cyberinfrastructure architectures and services, including HEC, that
are  furnished  by  spatially  distributed  providers.  Other  cyberinfrastructure  re-
sources, including some HEC resources, are provided by these organizations outside
of  ETF—these  resources  remain  accessible  through  the  traditional  access  mecha-
nisms with which researchers and educators have become familiar.

The High-End Computing Revitalization Task Force (HECRTF) report ‘‘A Federal
Plan for High-End Computing’’ describes alternative approaches and planning strat-
egies for three HEC components: HEC Research and Development, HEC Resources,
and  Procurement.  Some  of  the  approaches  and  planning  strategies  discussed  are
more  directly  relevant  to  NSF’s  cyberinfrastructure  plans  than  others.  However

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

since HEC is a key element of cyberinfrastructure, all are likely to have some bear-
ing on NSF’s future cyberinfrastructure activities.

The agency recognizes that effective interagency coordination and collaboration is
essential to progress in HEC. NSF continues to work closely with its sister agencies
on HEC issues. Most notably, NSF staff are working with colleagues at the Depart-
ment of Energy (DOE). The two agencies are partners in the ETF (DOE is providing
resources to the open science community via NSF’s ETF platform), and are collabo-
rating in the investigation of the leadership-class Cray Red Storm HEC system cur-
rently  being  deployed  at  the  Pittsburgh  Supercomputing  Center  by  NSF,  and  at
Sandia  National  Laboratory  (SNL)  by  DOE.  The  architectures  of  these  systems  are
slightly  different  due  to  the  classified  nature  of  the  work  to  be  done  on  the  SNL-
deployed  system,  but  many  features  are  identical.  As  another  example,  NSF  staff
remain  fully  engaged  in  collaborations  with  DARPA  in  that  agency’s  High  Produc-
tivity Computing Systems program.

Cyberinfrastructure
Q5. Have  you  developed,  or  are  you  developing,  an  NSF-wide  plan  to  first  identify
and  then  to  meet  the  cyberinfrastructure  needs  of  the  scientific  and  engineering
research  communities?  What  are  the  roles  and  responsibilities  of  the  Computer
and Information Science and Engineering Directorate and the other scientific di-
rectorates in developing the plan, budgeting for it, and implementing it?

A5. In  March  2005,  NSF  established  the  Cyberinfrastructure  Initial  Implementa-
tion  Working  Group  (CIIWG)  consisting  of  representatives  from  all  research  and
education  directorates  and  offices,  and  including  the  Director  of  the  Division  of
Shared  Cyberinfrastructure  (SCI)  from  the  Computer  and  Information  Science  and
Engineering  (CISE)  Directorate.  The  CIIWG  is  charged  to  identify  roles  and  goals
for  NSF’s  cyberinfrastructure  investments,  and  to  recommend  management  struc-
tures and strategies needed to support integrative and long-term planning that will
lead to the development of an NSF-wide Cyberinfrastructure Plan.

In  preparing  these  recommendations,  the  CIIWG  is  to  ensure  the  involvement  of
NSF  program  staff  from  all  offices  and  directorates,  to  receive  input  from  science
and  engineering  research  and  education  communities,  and  to  frame  the  rec-
ommendations  to  build  on  past  and  current  investments.  The  CIIWG  will  also  pro-
vide  insight  into  the  current  context  of  NSF  efforts  with  respect  to  the  activities  of
others,  including  research  and  education  communities,  other  agencies,  commercial
enterprises, and international activities.

Recommendations from the CIIWG will be used to develop the NSF management
structure  that  will  carry  out  long-term  planning  and  management  of  NSF’s
cyberinfrastructure investments. The CIIWG report will be reviewed and considered
for implementation by a newly established Cyberinfrastructure Council (CI Council).
This council consists of the Assistant Directors heading each research and education
directorate  and  office.  Dr.  Bement  chairs  the  group.  The  CI  Council  will  establish
policy,  principles,  and  priorities  for  the  NSF-wide  cyberinfrastructure  investments
and  approve  the  integrated  NSF  cyberinfrastructure  plan  that  will  be  established
and  implemented  through  the  NSF-wide  integrated  management  structure.  The
NSF plan will include investments through research and education directorates, of-
fices,  and  the  SCI  Division  in  CISE.  This  management  structure  will  be  in  place
early in the summer of 2005.

National Nanotechnology Initiative
Q6. The Nanoscale Science and Engineering priority area received an increase of 32
percent for FY 2005 and seeks a two percent increase for FY 2006. However, the
breakout of funding for the initiative by research directorate shows a 40 percent
decrease in funding in the Social, Behavioral and Economic Sciences Directorate
from  FY  2004  to  FY  2005  to  a  level  of  only  $1.56  million.  The  FY  2006  request
is frozen at that level.
Explain  why  research  related  to  the  societal  implications  of  nanotechnology  ap-
pears to be de-emphasized within NSF’s nanotechnology research program.

A6. In  FY  2006,  funding  for  the  Nanoscale  Science  and  Engineering  priority  area
declines,  consistent  with  the  planned  phase-out  of  the  priority  area.  At  the  same
time,  funding  for  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  (NNI)  activities  increases
by  about  two  percent.  The  NNI  funding  request  for  FY  2006  has  been  re-organized
based on Program Component Areas (PCAs) to align it with the NNI Strategic Plan
published  in  December  2004.  The  PCA  component  on  Ethical,  Legal,  and  other  So-
cial Implications (ELSI) will be funded through several directorates. SBE is funding

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

societal implications at an increasing level, with $5.5 million estimated for FY 2004,
$7.4 million estimated in FY 2005, and $7.5 million requested for FY 2006.

The  SBE  Directorate’s  funding  for  ELSI  includes  a  specific  program  solicitation
that has remained at $1.56 million from FY 2004 through FY 2006. However, addi-
tional funds for societal implications of nanotechnology are funded through core pro-
grams in SBE. These are expected to increase in FY 2006 in competition with other
core  proposals.  SBE  spent  about  $2.59  million  for  nanoscale  science,  engineering,
and technology projects in FY 2004.

The  FY  2006  NSF  request  for  societal  dimensions  of  nanotechnology  includes  not
only the ELSI program component area but also includes environmental, health and
safety  (EHS)  and  educational  components.  FY  2006  funding  for  the  societal  dimen-
sions of nanotechnology as a whole will increase to a total of $60 million.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Mark  S.  Wrighton,  Chairman  of  the  Committee  on  Audit  and  Over-

sight, National Science Board; Chancellor, Washington University, St. Louis

Question submitted by Chairman Bob Inglis
Q1. How  does  the  Deputy  Director  for  Large  Facility  Projects  fit  into  the  National
Science  Board’s  processes  for  selection  and  oversight  of  Major  Research  Equip-
ment and Facilities Construction projects?

A1. The  National  Science  Board  feels  strongly  that  the  Deputy  Director  for  Large
Facilities  Projects  (LFP),  Office  of  Budget,  Finance,  and  Award  Management  must
have  significant  oversight  and  coordination  responsibility  for  the  construction  and
financial management aspects of all LFPs. The Board has previously discussed this
issue  with  the  National  Science  Foundation  Director,  Dr.  Arden  Bement,  who  has
confirmed  to  the  Board  that  the  LFP  Deputy  Director  position  does  have  oversight
authority for construction related and financial management of LFPs. The Board is
currently  completing  a  report  on  its  own  oversight  responsibilities  with  respect  to
major  research  facilities,  which  will  be  implemented  this  fall.  This  report  with  in-
clude  all  the  steps  on  how  the  Board  approves  and  monitors  these  projects  as  they
go through their life cycle, and the role of the Deputy Director for LFPs in that proc-
ess.

Questions submitted by Representative Darlene Hooley
Q1. The  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  budget  request  funds  only  close  out
costs  for  the  Math  and  Science  Partnership  Program.  This  action  is  exactly
counter  to  the  recommendation  of  the  National  Science  Board  (NSB)  in  NSB–
04–42,  which  was  issued  following  the  initial  proposal  to  end  the  program  in
the  FY  2005  budget  proposal.  Has  the  position  of  the  Board  changed  from  that
expressed  in  its  statement  from  last  year,  and  if  not,  does  the  Board  intend  to
press for continuation of the Math and Science Partnership Program?

A1. The National Science Board reaffirms its previous statement (NSB–04–42), and
continues  to  support  the  Mathematics  and  Science  Partnership  Program  at  NSF  as
essential to the development of stronger linkages between K–12 and undergraduate
education, and for the advancement of knowledge on what is effective in STEM edu-
cation. NSF has long-term experience in such large-scale experiments in K–12 edu-
cation in STEM fields through its Systemic Initiatives.
Q2. In general, what is the current position of the NSB on NSF’s role in K–12 math
and  science  education  and  does  the  Board  support  a  policy  change  that  would
lead to the de-emphasis, or abandonment, by NSF of instructional materials de-
velopment and teacher training and professional development activities?

A2. The  NSB  has  stated  its  support  for  high  quality  teacher  training  for  K–12
STEM  teachers,  improvements  in  instructional  materials  development,  and  profes-
sional  development  in  its  reports,  Failing  Our  Children  (1998)  (NSB–98–154)  and
Preparing Our Children (1999) (NSB–99–31) and reaffirmed them in the Board’s re-
cent  report,  The  Science  and  Engineering  Workforce:  Realizing  America’s  Potential
(2003)  (NSB–03–69)  as  critical  to  world  leading  capabilities  in  STEM  fields  for  our
future workforce.
Q3. The  FY  2006  budget  request  makes  a  substantial  cut  (-43  percent)  in  the  edu-
cation  research  component  of  the  Research,  Evaluation  and  Communication  di-
vision in the Education and Human Resources Directorate. In its December 2003
report  to  Congress,  ‘‘Fulfilling  the  Promise,’’  the  National  Science  Board  stated
that  a  ‘‘particularly  urgent  need’’  included  support  for  research  that  enhances
understanding  of  learning  and  teaching  at  the  K–12  and  undergraduate  level.
Explain  how  this  budget  decision  squares  with  the  Board’s  statement  of  prior-
ities.

A3. The NSB policy positions on K–12 and undergraduate education in the 2003 re-
port to Congress are consistently affirmed by the Board in its policy studies on edu-
cation  and  the  workforce.  In  its  written  testimony  to  this  Subcommittee  on  Re-
search,  the  Board  states:  ‘‘We. . .know  that  the  education  of  all  our  citizens  in  the
fundamentals  of  math,  science  and  engineering  must  be  addressed  if  the  U.S.  is  to
remain  eminent  in  S&T  when  we  enter  the  22nd  century.’’  Though  the  budget  re-
quest of $5.605 billion is a 2.4 percent increase over the FY 2005 budget, it is never-
theless below the level of the 2004 NSF operating budget. Should the subcommittee

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

determine  that  additional  funds,  beyond  the  Administration’s  request,  can  be  made
available  to  NSF  in  FY  2006,  the  Board  recommends  among  its  top  priorities  sup-
port  for  a  strong  and  growing  role  for  NSF  in  the  Nation’s  investment  in  science
and  engineering  education.  The  most  recent  NSB  study  on  the  K–16  system,  Pre-
paring  Our  Children  (1999)  (NSB–99–31),  states:  ‘‘The  Board  believes  that  stake-
holders  must  develop  a  much-needed  consensus  on  a  common  core  of  mathematics
and science knowledge and skills to be embedded consistently in classroom teaching
and  learning’’  and  recommends,  ‘‘Overall,  the  investment  should  increase—by  the
Federal  Government,  private  foundations,  and  other  sponsors—in  research  on
schooling,  education  systems  more  generally,  and  teaching  and  learning  of  mathe-
matics and science in particular. To focus and deepen the knowledge base, an inter-
agency Education Research Initiative, led by NSF and the Department of Education,
should  be  implemented.  It  should  be  distinguishable  as  a  joint  venture  within  the
agencies’  respective  research  missions,  and  cooperatively  funded.’’  The  more  recent
Board report, The Science and Engineering Workforce: Realizing America’s Potential
(2003) (NSB–03–69) reaffirms ‘‘the necessity of a strong curriculum in mathematics,
science, engineering and technology from the earliest grades to build the knowledge
needed  by  citizens  and  members  of  the  workforce’’  and  recommends  that,  ‘‘To  im-
prove  effectiveness  of  precollege 
collaborate
to. . .support  research  on  learning  that  better  informs  K–12  mathematics  and
science  curricula  and  pedagogy  development.’’  The  Math  and  Science  Partnership
Program  and  other  education  research  programs  at  NSF  are  designed  to  address
these  objectives.  NSF  will  focus  the  remaining  resources  on  priorities  for  education
research; however, there is no question that reduced funding for research will likely
reduce the advances in knowledge that would otherwise be possible with higher lev-
els  of  support.  The  Board  expects  to  issue  a  formal  letter  to  Congress  on  this  issue
at its May 2005 meeting.
Q4. Under  the  Administration’s  funding  projects  for  NSF,  which  are  for  flat  or  de-
clining  budgets,  what  factors  will  the  NSB  consider  in  determining  the  appro-
priate balance between support for research projects versus support for major re-
search  facilities  and  other  research  infrastructure?  In  general,  is  there  a  target
level  for  the  proportion  of  the  budget  devoted  to  research  infrastructure  versus
research project support?

teaching,  stakeholders  must 

A4. In  view  of  the  increasing  importance  of  infrastructure  to  performing  cutting
edge  science  and  engineering,  maintaining  excellence  in  federally  funded  research
requires  a  higher  level  of  funding  for  infrastructure  support.  For  that  reason,  the
Board recommended in its recent report, Science and Engineering Infrastructure for
the 21st Century: The Role of the National Science Foundation (2003) (NSB–02–190),
‘‘Increase  the  share  of  the  NSF  budget  devoted  to  S&E  infrastructure  in  order  to
provide individual investigators and groups of investigators with the tools they need
to work at the frontier’’ and argues with respect to the NSF budget for ‘‘a share clos-
er to the higher end of the historic range (22–27 percent).’’ However, the Board has
further  argued  that  the  higher  infrastructure  investment  should  be  addressed
through  growth  of  the  NSF  budget,  rather  than  reducing  research  project  support.
At  the  request  of  Congress,  and  consistent  with  Board  discussions  during  our  re-
cent retreat, the Board will undertake the development and establishment of a new
vision for NSF for the 21st century. This visionary document will also include over-
arching  goals  with  both  long-  and  short-term  priorities,  and  address  the  balances
between research projects and facilities support, that take into account federal fiscal
realities.  We  expect  to  work  closely  with  the  NSF  Director  and  finalize  this  effort
by the end of 2005.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

Responses by Christine C. Boesz, Inspector General, National Science Foundation

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Question submitted by Representative Darlene Hooley
Q1. Your testimony included the statement that ‘‘realignment of certain management
priorities  would  ease  some  of  the  burden’’  in  the  absence  of  having  all  the  re-
sources otherwise needed by NSF to address its post-award administration chal-
lenges. What are some examples of realignment that you had in mind?

A1. The  business  of  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  is  funding  basic  re-
search  and  educational  initiatives  in  science,  mathematics,  and  engineering.  Over
the  years  NSF  management  has  focused  on  pre-award  activities,  improving  the  ap-
plication process and streamlining review activities. NSF has invested in high-qual-
ity  electronic  communications  and  processing  systems  that  are  the  backbone  of  its
operations.  However,  NSF  has  not  applied  the  same  rigor  to  developing  a  robust
post-award monitoring process. NSF has relied heavily on the goodwill of its institu-
tional partners for the day-to-day monitoring of NSF grants. While this strategy has
merit,  it  is  not  enough  to  safeguard  the  billions  of  tax  dollars  that  NSF  invests  in
research and education.

NSF  has  put  in  place  an  Award  Monitoring  and  Business  Assistance  Program,
with  limited  coverage  of  its  award  portfolio.  By  focusing  on  high-risk  awards,  the
effort  is  too  narrow  and  the  effect  is  limited.  NSF  could  broaden  the  scope  of  its
monitoring  activities  by  implementing  cost-effective  monitoring  procedures  such  as
desk  reviews  of  reports  from  awardees  and  computer  assisted  screening  of  A–133
audits.

It  is  my  judgment  that  NSF  needs  a  minimum  of  five  qualified  individuals  dedi-
cated  to  post-award  administration.  An  annual  budget  of  approximately  $1  million
would be needed to support these individuals for salaries, benefits, normal office re-
quirements,  travel,  and  contractor  services  to  assist  in  the  monitoring  function.
These  five  individuals  would  coordinate  the  myriad  functions  that  constitute  post-
ward  administration.  They  would  draw  on  other  NSF  program  and  financial  per-
sonnel as needed to carry out their monitoring functions.

Current  management  priorities  include  a  Business  Analysis  study  that  is  costing
NSF  approximately  $12  million  dollars.  This  project  started  in  FY  2002  and  yet
NSF  is  still  deciding  on  what  and  how  to  implement  improvements  in  the  work
force. This effort at strategic planning has actually become an obstacle to taking ur-
gently needed actions. Therefore, my first suggestion is to reallocate resources from
this  effort  to  pay  for  contract  services,  travel  and  other  necessary  monetary  ex-
penses associated with post-award administration.

In  addition,  because  of  efficiencies  gained  by  moving  payroll  functions  to  the  De-
partment of Interior, four full-time equivalent positions could be used for post-award
administration.  Another  full-time  equivalent  position  could  become  available  by  re-
alignment  of  the  existing  financial  personnel  responsible  for  indirect  rate  negotia-
tion and audit resolution.

NSF has repeatedly stated that it has a shortage of personnel. An alternative ap-
proach  would  be  to  re-program  $1  million  from  science,  engineering,  and  education
projects  to  establish  this  unit.  The  benefits  gained  would  be  cost-effective  in  that
fewer dollars would be misspent by awardees.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(73)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

83

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

84

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

87

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

88

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

89

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

90

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

91

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

92

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

93

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

94

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 08:44 Jun 15, 2005 Jkt 099574 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\030905\99574 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

